***
A priest is taking a cab home from church
A priest is taking a cab home from church after a long day of services. It's night and it's raining heavily. Suddenly the taxi hits a pothole. The driver mutters under his breath "Fuck!" Seconds later, they hit another pothole and the driver says "Shit!" The priest has finally had enough,

"Son, don't use these words, they anger our Good Lord. Say for instance, 'Lord help us'"

The cabbie reluctantly agrees. As they drive on, they hit a really big pothole and the entire wheel falls off! The cabbie remembering the priest's words says "Lord help us!" Suddenly, the wheel stops, rolls back, and snaps back on! 

"What the fuck?" said the priest.
***
A boy and his father are playing catch
A boy and his father were playing catch in the front yard when the 
boy saw a honey bee. He ran over and stomped it.


"That was a honey bee," his father said,"one of our friends, and for 
stomping him you will do without honey for a week."


Later the boy saw a butterfly so he ran over and stomped it. 
"That was a butterfly," his father said, "one of our friends, and for 
stomping him you will do without butter for a week."


The next morning the family had sat down for breakfast. The boy ate his plain toast (no honey or butter.)


Suddenly a cockroach ran from under the stove. His mother stomped it. 


The boy looked at his father and said, "Are you going to tell her or 
should I"?
***
The milkman and the baker
There once was a milkman in a village. He was very shy but always very honest. He was always very meticulous about giving a person the exact amount of milk they wanted.

So you could imagine the milkman's surprise when he found a court summons waiting for him at his house.

He was very nervous as he had never brushed up against the law before. So, when the court day came, he put on his best suit, brushed his hair, and went on his way.

When he stepped into the court, he saw the baker in the plaintiff's bench. The milkman went into the defendant's bench and waited for the judge to speak.

   "Baker, what is your complaint?" asked the judge.

"Well, here's the situation. Everyday I order a pound of milk. But, whenever *I* go to weigh it, it's always less than a pound. I want to be compensated for all of the money that was stolen from me by that filthy milkman!"

The judge turned to the milkman and asked, "Well, how do you plead?"

"Not guilty, your honor." 

"Is it possible that your scale you use to weigh is not correct?" asked the judge.

"Well, your honor, I am not the richest man so I can't afford the most expensive scale. But I am positive that what I use is satisfactory."

The judge thought for a moment and then asked, "Is it possible that the stones you use as the counterbalance on the scale are slightly off?"

"I don't use stones." The milkman said plainly.

"So, what *do* you use?" The judge asked, exasperated. 

"I use the pound of bread I get from the baker as the counterbalance."
***
A zookeeper was making his rounds one day...
When he noticed the female gorilla was very agitated. Having worked with gorillas for many years, he recognised she was in heat. The zookeeper did not wish her to become more agitated, so he began contacting other zoo's in the area asking if they had a male gorilla.

After many days with no luck, and the female gorilla getting more frustrated, he decided to try his last option. So he tracks down the janitor of the zoo and says to him "Steve, I have to ask you a big favor... I need you to have sex with the female gorilla. It's worth 2000 dollars."

The janitor agrees so long as three conditions are met.

"Condition the first..." says the janitor "is that no one cam ever know."

"Second... I don't have to kiss her."

"Finally... I'll need some time to get the 2000 dollars."
***
A blonde was desperate for money...
so she decided to go to the richer neighborhoods around town and look for odd jobs.

At the first house, a man answered the door and told her. 'Yeah, I have a job for you. Could you paint the porch?'

'Sure,' smiled the blonde, 'I'll do it for $100.'

'Great,' the man replied. 'You'll find the paint and stuff you need in the garage.'

The man went back into the house to his wife, who'd been listening. 'A hundred bucks! Does she know it goes all the way around the house?' asked the wife.

'Well, she must. She was standing right on it!' he said.

About 45 minutes later, the blonde knocked on the door. 'I'm all done,' she reported.

The man was amazed. You painted the whole porch?'

'Yeah,' the blonde said. 'I even had some left, so I put on two coats!'

The man reached into his wallet to pay her.

'And by the way,' said the blonde, 'that's not a Porsche. It's a Ferrari.'
***
Bill pulled up a stool at his favorite bar and announced...
“My wife Suzie must love me more than any woman has ever loved any man!”

“What makes you say that?” the bartender inquired. 

“Last week,” Bill explained, “I had to take a couple of sick days from work. Suzie was so thrilled to have me around that every time the milkman or mailman came by, she’d run down the driveway waving her arms and hollering, ‘My husband’s home! My husband’s home!’”
***
A new nurse is being given the tour of his new workplace.
He and a fellow nurse walk the hallways of the hospital. Passing one of the rooms he sees a nurse mounted on top of a patient having rough passionate sex.
                
"What on earth is this nurse doing?!" He asked.
The other nurse casually replies "this man has a very rare condition. If he doesn't ejaculate 6 or more times a day, his balls fill up with pressure and literally explode."
              
The new nurse, stunned, but content with the answer continues on with his tour of the hospital. A few doors down he sees a man bored and sighing, masturbating to a hardcore porn.
       
"And this man? " the new nurse asked. 
                
The other nurse response "Oh, this man? He has the same condition as the patient with the exploding balls a few doors down. But that patient has better insurance." 
***
Fondling in bed
After 20 years of marriage, a couple was lying in bed one evening, when the wife felt her husband begin to fondle her in ways he hadn't in quite some time.
It almost tickled as his fingers started at her neck and then began moving down past the small of her neck.
He then caressed her shoulders and neck slowly worked his hands down over her breasts stopping just over her lower stomach.
He then proceeded to place his hand on her left inner arm, caressed past the side of her breast again, working down her side, passed gently over her buttock and down her leg to her calf. Then he proceeded up her inner thigh, stopping just at the upper most portion of her leg. He continued in the same manner on her right side, then suddenly stopped, rolled over and started to watch TV. 
As she had become quite aroused by this caressing, she asked in a loving voice, "That was wonderful, why did you stop?"

He said "I found the remote".  
***
The Lawyer's dog
A dog ran into a butcher shop and grabbed a roast off the counter. Fortunately, the butcher recognized the dog as belonging to a neighbour of his. The neighbour happened to be a lawyer.
Incensed at the theft, the butcher called up his neighbour and said, "Hey, if your dog stole a roast from my butcher shop, would you be liable for the cost of the meat?" The lawyer replied, "Of course, how much was the roast?" "$7.98."
A few days later the butcher received a check in the mail for $7.98. Attached to it was an invoice that read: Legal Consultation Service: $150.

***
Vet Bill
A man rushes his limp dog to the veterinarian. The doctor pronounces the dog dead. The agitated man demands a second opinion.

The vet goes into the back room and comes out with a cat. The cat sniffs the body and meows. The vet says, "I'm sorry, but the cat thinks that your dog is dead, too."

The man is still unwilling to accept that his dog is dead.

The vet brings in a black Labrador. The lab sniffs the body and barks. The vet says, "I'm sorry, but the lab thinks your dog is dead, too."

The man finally resigns to the diagnosis and asks how much he owes. The vet answers, "$650."

"$650 to tell me my dog is dead?" exclaims the man.

"Well," the vet replies, "I would only have charged you $50 for my initial diagnosis. The additional $600 is for the cat scan and lab tests."
***
A newly ordained priest...
A newly ordained priest is walking down the street on his way to his assignment at a parish in the bad part of town.  On his way he sees a prostitute who says "Hey father, how about a blow job. $25."

The young priest shyly hurries along past the woman.

Further down the street another prostitute propositions him.

"Blow job, father? $25"

Again he hurries past the lady of the evening.  He eventually arrives at the parish door and is met by the Mother Superior. The old nun shows him around the church and rectory explaining where he will be living, when meals are served, and the Sunday mass schedule.  As she is about to leave the young priest to settle into his quarters, she asks if he has any questions.

Thinking about his experience on the way to the church, he asks, 
"Mother Superior, what's a blow job?"

The old nun answers, "$25, same as they charge on the street."

***
So I was at the bar the other day...
...and suddenly, I feel a large slap on my ass.

Turning around, I spot the ugliest woman imaginable; she was large, heavily tattooed, and caked with metric tonnes of makeup.

She said to me, "Hey there, guy. I saw you over there and thought you should call me."

I looked her over once again, disgusted, then said, "Do you have a pen?"

She replied "Of course!"

"Well you'd better get back in it before the farmer realizes that you're gone."
***
A man walks into a bar... (NSFW)
He orders nine shots.

The bartender apprehensive asks, "whats the occasion?"

The man mumbles, "first blowjob."

The bartender brightens up and pours nine shots and lays them out.

The man downs all nine in a row.

The bartender still smiling says, 

"hey, make it an even ten. On the house."

The man shakes his head, 

"No thanks. If the first nine didn't wash out the taste, I doubt one more would help."
***
A man goes into a supermarket to buy a half head of lettuce... (2 punch lines for the price of 1)
He goes up to a teenager stocking the shelves and asks, "I'm looking to buy a half-head of lettuce, do you have any?" 
The teenager replies, "Not that I know of, let me go check in the back." 
So, he goes into the back, finds his manager, and says, "Can you believe there's some fuckin' asshole out there trying to buy a half head of lettuce?" 
His boss' eyes go wide and the teen turns around to see that the guy has followed him into the back. Without missing a beat, he continues, "And this fine gentleman is looking to buy the other half!"


So after the guy leaves, the manager calls the kid into his office and says "I really liked how quick on your feet you were out there today. Where are you from?"
"Canada," replies the teen.
"Ah, wonderful people, those Canadians," says the manager.
"Nah, they're just a bunch of hockey players and whores," the teen smirks.
The managers' eyes narrow and he tightly says "You know, my wife is Canadian."
"No kidding!" Says the teen, "What team does she play for?"


***
A blonde and a brunette are on an elevator...
And a short man with dandruff gets on and then comes off on the next floor. 


The brunette goes, "Wow, that guy could really use some Head and Shoulders."

The blonde says, "How do you give shoulders?"




No offense anyone...hehe



EDIT: Front page! Woot woot! Thanks, dudes and dudettes.
***
A man is driving down the road and his car breaks down near a monastery...
He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, "My car broke down. Do you think I could stay the night?" The monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car. As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a strange sound. A sound unlike anything he's ever heard before. The Sirens that nearly seduced Odysseus into crashing his ship comes to his mind. He doesn't sleep that night. He tosses and turns trying to figure out what could possibly be making such a seductive sound. The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk." Distraught, the man is forced to leave. Years later, after never being able to forget that sound, the man goes back to the monastery and pleads for the answer again. The monks reply, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk." The man says, "If the only way I can find out what is making that beautiful sound is to become a monk, then please, make me a monk." The monks reply, "You must travel the earth and tell us how many blades of grass there are and the exact number of grains of sand. When you find these answers, you will have become a monk." The man sets about his task. After years of searching he returns as a gray- haired old man and knocks on the door of the monastery. A monk answers. He is taken before a gathering of all the monks. "In my quest to find what makes that beautiful sound, I traveled the earth and have found what you asked for: By design, the world is in a state of perpetual change. Only God knows what you ask. All a man can know is himself, and only then if he is honest and reflective and willing to strip away self deception." The monks reply, "Congratulations. You have become a monk. We shall now show you the way to the mystery of the sacred sound." The monks lead the man to a wooden door, where the head monk says, "The sound is beyond that door." The monks give him the key, and he opens the door. Behind the wooden door is another door made of stone. The man is given the key to the stone door and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby. And so it went that he needed keys to doors of emerald, pearl and diamond. Finally, they come to a door made of solid gold. The sound has become very clear and definite. The monks say, "This is the last key to the last door." The man is apprehensive to no end. His life's wish is behind that door! With trembling hands, he unlocks the door, turns the knob, and slowly pushes the door open. Falling to his knees, he is utterly amazed to discover the source of that haunting and seductive sound...

But, of course, I can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk.
***
A man in his backyard....
After a stressful day, one man comes home and sits in his backyard, drinking a beer. As he's getting up to get a snack, he stops and asks, "Jesus, what is the meaning of life?"

To which Jesus replies,"You slave in the sun to support the ones you love. You make money so you can buy things for your family to keep them happy."

The man asks,"Jesus, why is life so hard?"

To which Jesus replies,"That, no one may ever know. You have to overcome many obstacles to be successful."

The man asks again,"How was the universe created?"

Jesus replies,"I'm sorry, señor, but can you stop asking questions? I'm trying to mow your lawn."

***
My math-oriented co-worker just broke this one out
A man stumbles upon a frog while walking home. While looking at the frog, it starts to speak to him.

"Hello!", it says, "If you kiss me, I will turn into a beautiful woman!"

The man smiles, puts the frog into his pocket and continues on his way. A few hours later, he hears the voice of the frog, and takes it out to see what it wants.

"Remember, If you kiss me, I will turn into a beautiful woman. I will stay the night with you!" The man smiles and puts it back into his pocket.

The next day, he hears the frog speaking again. He takes it out to see what it wants.

"If you kiss me, I will turn into a beautiful woman, and I will do absolutely anything you want!" The man smiles once more and puts the frog back into his pocket.

The frog sighs. He calls up to the man and says aloud, "I just don't understand. Why don't you want me to turn into a beautiful woman?"

"Because I'm an engineer, I don't have time for girlfriends", the man says. "But a talking frog is pretty damn cool."
***
A guy and a girl go out on a date...
It's going so well, SHE invites him back to her place. They do the horizontal mambo late into the night. Around sunrise, she leaps up in a panic. 

"What!? what!?" says the man. 

"I forgot to ask you, you don't have AIDS, do you!?" she asks. 

"No!"

"Whew! I don't wanna get that shit again."
***
"My wife's just told me she's been having an affair with Dave the milkman," the bloke from over the road confided with me earlier
"What? That fat ugly fucker I see every morning outside your house?"  
"Yes," he laughed, cheering up.  
"Why would Dave the milkman want to shag that?"  
***
A professor travels to Africa to live with a primitive tribe...
...and spends years with them, teaching them all about the wonders of science, mathematics, and formatting Reddit comments so they get the most upvotes. One day, the Chief's wife gives birth to... a white child! 

The word spreads, and the entire tribe is in shock. The chief pulls the professor aside and says, "Look, you're the only white man we've ever seen around here, and this woman just gave birth to a white child. It doesn't take a genius to figure out what happened!"

The professor replied, "No, Chief. You're mistaken. What you have here is a natural occurrence, what we in the civilized world call an albino! Look at that field over there. All of the sheep are white except for one black one. Nature does this on occasion."

The chief was silent for a moment, then said, "Tell you what. You don't say anything more about that sheep and I won't say anything more about that white child."
***
A mexican boy with the desire to be white
A little Mexican boy goes into the kitchen where his mom is baking. He puts his hand in the flour and wipes it all over his face. 

He says, "Mom, look, I'm a white boy!" His mom slaps him in the face and says, "Go show your father."

He goes to his dad in the living room and says, "Look Dad, I'm a white boy." His dad slaps him hard in the face and says, "Go show your grandmother." 

The boy goes into his grandmother's room and say, "Mira la Abuela, I'm a white boy." His grandmother slaps him in the face and sends him back to his mother. 

His mother says, "See, did you learn anything from that?" To which the boy replies, "Sure did! I have only been white for five minutes and I already hate you Mexicans!"
***
I donated $10 to Bernie's campaign
Don't worry ladies, I also donated $7.80 to Hilary.
***
After hearing Kim and Kanye are having a kid via in vitro fertilization...
Of course Kanye picked the option where he could have sex with himself and still have a kid.
***
"A Marine and his commanding officer.....!!!"
A Marine and his commanding officer were sitting in the barbershop. They were both just getting finished with their shaves, when the barbers reached for some after-shave to slap on their faces. The marine shouted, "Hey, don't put that stuff on me! My wife will think I've been in a whorehouse!" The commanding officer turned to his barber and said, "Go ahead and put it on. My wife doesn't know what the inside of a whorehouse smells like."

***
The other day I saw Denzel Washington walking down the street.
I shouted to him ,"Hey Denzel!" He responded, "Does every black man look like Denzel Washington to you?"

Classic Denzel.
***
A Woman Takes Her Secret Lover Home During The Day While Her Husband Is At Work.
Her 9-year-old son comes home unexpectedly, sees them, and hides in the bedroom closet to watch.

The Woman's husband also comes home unexpectedly. She puts her lover in the closet, not realizing that the little boy is in there already.

The little boy says, "Dark in here."

The man says, "Yes, it is."

Boy: "I have a baseball..."

Man: "That's nice."

Boy: "Want to buy it?"

Man: "No thanks."

Boy: "My Dad is outside..."

Man: "OK, how much?"

Boy: "$250"

In the next few weeks, it happens agin that the boy and the lover are in the closet together.

Boy: "Dark in here."

Man: "Yes, it is."

Boy: "I have a baseball glove."

The lover, remembering the last time, asks the boy, "How much?"

Boy: "$750"

Man: "Sold."

A few days later, the Dad says to the boy, "Grab your glove, lets go outside and have a game of catch."

The boy says, "I can't, I sold my baseball and my glove."

The Dad asks, "How much did you sell them for?"

Boy: "$1000"

The Dad says, "Thats terrible to over charge your friends like that... that is way more than those two things cost. I'm taking you to church, to confession."

They go to the church and the Dad makes the little boy sit in the confession booth and closes the little door..

The boy says, "Dark in here."

The Priest says, "Don't start that shit again, you're in my closet now!"

***
Q. 500 bricks are on a plane. One falls off. How many are left?
A. 499

Q. What are three steps to putting an elephant in a refrigerator?

A. Open Door, put elephant in refrigerator, close door

Q. What are four steps to putting a giraffe in a refrigerator?

A. Open door, take elephant out of refrigerator, put giraffe in refrigerator, close door

Q. The lion throws a huge birthday party. All the animals but one go. Which is it and why?

A. The giraffe: he's still in the refrigerator 

Q. Sally swims across an alligator infested river and doesn't get eaten. How?

A. The alligators are at the lion's birthday party

Q. Sally is found dead within the next 5 minutes: why?

A. She was hit by a brick falling from the sky
***
The Mexican Magician
A Mexican magician declares that he will disappear on the count of three. He begins to count, "uno, dos..." *POOF* The magician vanished without a tres.
***
The farmer wakes up early in the morning and finds that all his cows are dead!
A farmer wakes up early in the morning and finds that all his cows are dead. Suddenly, a beatiful naked woman walks out of a lake near his barn, the even more surprised farmer asks who is there, the woman answers:

"I am the witch of the lake"

"Did you kill all my cows?"

"I did not kill your cows and I don't know how they died either, but I will give you an offer: If you can make love to me 5 times in a row I will bring all your cows back to life; but if you can't make it you will die!" 

The farmer was very old but agreed because his cows were very precious to him. He started making love to the witch but fainted before he could get to the third time. The witch killed the old man.

Later in the morning, the oldest son came out of the house and found that his father and all the cows were dead, he was very confused. The same witch walked out of the lake again and talked to him:

"I am the witch of the lake, if you want to bring back your dad and all the cows you must make love to me 10 times in a row! If you fail, I will kill you the same way I killed your father"

The man agreed and started making love to the witch. He was a lot younger than his father but still couldn't do the witch the ten times. She killed him.

A few hours later, the farmer's retarded boy came out of the house. He was not amused with all the dead people and animals. The witch came out of the lake, he was not impressed either. The witch told him the same:

"I am the witch of the lake, if you want to bring back your dad, your brother and all the cows you must make love to me 50 times in a row! However, if you fail , I will kill you too!!"

"aight' I will do that"

"You fool!" Said the witch "Your brother couldn't make love to me 10 times, what makes you think you can do me 50 times?"

"How do you think all the cows died?"
***
An African prince falls in love with an American girl...
An African prince falls in love with an American girl and upon proclaiming his love and devotion he asks her to marry him. She- not wanting to hurt prince’s feelings - tells him she needed time to think about it. The girl asks her best friend what to do as she was not in love with him, but also didn’t want to directly say no. They come with a solution to ask him for a ridiculously expensive car and when he refuses to buy it for her, say that unfortunately she cannot marry him.


The girl presents the offer the prince; he thinks for a second and replies:


“I love you, I care for you, I buy you fancy car”


And sure enough, the next day the girl wakes up and there is a shiny new sports car with a bow on it in front of her house. 


She calls her best friend right away and they decide they needed to step up their game and ask the prince for huge villa with a pool and big driveway to park her new car in.


Upon hearing the new demand, the prince thinks for a minute and says:


“I love you, I care for you, I buy you a villa”


The girl goes home and when she wakes up she sees that her neighbour’s house is gone and where it was there is a beautiful villa and her new car parked in a driveway. She grabs the phone and consults a friend; they think and think and finally the come up with an idea to say that the girl can only marry the prince if his penis is 12 inches long. 

Relieved that she finally will get out of the situation, she presents her final demand to the prince.


The prince thinks bout it for an hour, and with a heavy sight he finally replies:


“I love you, I care for you, I chop 4 inches off for you”


***
A man and woman meet through a sneeze
A man sees a woman sitting alone at a bar.
He starts to walk over when she sneezes, and a glass eye comes flying out of her eye socket. It hurls by the man, and he instinctively snatches it from the air and hands it back to her.
"This is so embarrassing," the woman says, and she pops her eye back into place. "I'm sorry to have disturbed you. Let me buy dinner to make it up to you." He agrees.
The woman is charming, stunningly pretty, and he realizes they have a lot in common. He gets her phone number and asks, "You are the most wonderful woman I've ever encountered. Are you this nice to every guy?"
"No," she answers. "You just happened to catch my eye."
***
Three blondes are sitting by the side of a river
...holding fishing poles with the lines in the water.


A Game Warden comes up behind them, taps them on the shoulder and says, "Excuse me, ladies, I'd like to see your fishing licenses."


"We don't have any," replied the first blonde.


"Well, if **you're** going to fish, you need fishing licenses." said the Game Warden.


"But officer," replied the second blonde, "we aren't fishing. We all have magnets at the end of our lines and we're collecting debris off the bottom of the river."


The Game Warden lifted up all the lines and, sure enough, there were horseshoe magnets tied on the end of each line.


"Well, I know of no law against it," said the Game Warden, "take all the debris you want," and with that, the Game Warden left.


As soon as the Game Warden was out of sight, the three blondes started laughing hysterically.


"What a dumb Fish Cop," the second blonde said to the other two, "doesn't he know that there are steelhead trout in this river?!"
***
So the American people's choices for President will apparently be either Donald Trump or Hillary Clinton.
That is the joke. There's no punchline here.
***
Pretty woman sneezes
At a hotel restaurant, a man sees an attractive woman sitting alone at the next table.
Suddenly, she sneezes, and a glass eye comes flying out of her eye socket. It hurls by the man, and he snatches it from the air and hands it back to her.
"This is so embarrassing," the woman says, and she pops her eye back in place. "I'm sorry to have disturbed you. Let me buy dinner to make it up to you. May I join you?" He nods.
The woman is a stimulating conversationalist, stunningly pretty, and the man finds they have a lot in common. He gets her phone number and asks, "You are the most charming woman I've ever encountered. Are you this nice to every guy you meet?"
"No," she replies. "You just happened to catch my eye."
***
A piano player walks into a bar...
A piano player walks into a bar and says to the manager "I saw your sign 'Piano player needed' and I'm your man, I write all my own material." "Play me a tune." said the manager. The piano player's song was so catchy that it had the manager stomping his feet. "That was great!" the manager said, "What do you call that one?" "I call it 'Your Sister is a Dirty Fucking Whore!'" said the piano player. "Well" said the manager "that's an unusual name for a song. Let's hear another one." The piano player's song was so beautiful that it brought tears to the manager's eyes . "Now, what do you call this one?" said the manager. "I call it 'Let me Fuck you in the Ass Until your Hemorrhoids Bleed.'" said the piano player. The manager replied, "Your playing is great, and I'd like to hire you, but don't mention the names of your songs to any of the patrons, okay?" The piano player agreed. That evening, the crowd went wild when the piano player did his first set. When he could finally take a break, he rushed to the john for a long overdue piss. In his rush to get back, he forgot to zip his pants up. As he made his way back to the piano, one of the patrons stopped him and said, "Do you know your fucking dick is hanging out of your pants?" The piano player exclaimed "Know it?! I wrote it!"
***
A man buys a lie detector robot that slaps people who lie...
The man decided to try it out at dinner.

Dad:  Son, where were you during school hours?

Son:  At school.


The robot slaps the son.


Son:  Ok!  I was at my friend's house watching a DVD. 

Dad:  Which one?

Son:  Kung Fu Panda


The robot slaps the son again.


Son: Ok!  It was a porno.  

Dad:  What!?  When I was your age I didnt even know what porno was.  


The robot slaps the dad. 




Mom:  HAHAHAHAHA.  He is your son after all!


The robot slaps the mom.

***
Two whales
There were 2 whales swimming around who were very bored when they saw a boat. One whale says to the other, ''I've got an idea for a laugh, why don't we swim under the boat, blow water from our blowholes, and capsize it."

"Okay," says the other whale.


They proceed to do so and swim back down, laughing all the while.
Then the first whale then says, ''I have an even better idea, now that the fishermen are in the water, why don't we swim back up and eat them?''


The other whale then replies ''No thanks. I'm all for the occasional blow job but I never swallow the seamen."
***
Bruce Willis went shopping...
...and he overheard a fellow customer say, "Yipee-ki-yay!" Without thinking he yelled out, "Motherfucker!"

Customers gasped and stared at him, shocked.

He looked at the crowd of people and said, "Oh sorry, old habits...Die Hard."
***
All the organs of the body were having a meeting
...trying to decide who was the one in charge.

"I should be in charge," said the brain, "Because I run all the body's systems, so without me nothing would happen."

"I should be in charge," said the blood, "Because I circulate oxygen all over so without me you'd all waste away."

"I should be in charge," said the stomach," Because I process food and give all of you energy."

"I should be in charge," said the legs, "because I carry the body wherever it needs to go."

"I should be in charge," said the eyes, "Because I allow the body to see where it goes."

I should be in charge," said the rectum, "Because I'm responsible for waste removal."

All the other body parts laughed at the rectum and insulted him. So in a huff, he shut down tight.
Within a few days, the brain had a terrible headache, the stomach was bloated, the legs got wobbly, the eyes got watery and the blood was toxic. So they all decided that the rectum should be the boss.


The Moral of the story?

Even though the others do all the work...an Asshole is usually in charge!!
***
A housewife takes a lover during the day, while her husband is at work. Not aware that 9 year old son was hiding in the closet. Her husband came home unexpectedly, so she hid her lover in the closet. The boy now has company.
Boy: "Dark in here."  
Man: "Yes it is."  
Boy: "I have a baseball."  
Man: "That's nice."  
Boy: "Want to buy it?"  
Man: "No, thanks."  
Boy: "That's my dad outside."  
Man: "How much did you say the baseball was again?"  
Boy: "$250."  

In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the mom's lover are in the closet together. 

Boy: "Dark in here."  
Man: "Yes, it is."  
Boy: "I have a baseball glove."  
Man: "That's nice."  
Boy: "Want to buy it?"  
Man: "No, thanks."  
Boy: "I think I just remembered something I needed to tell my dad."  
Man: "How much did you say the glove was again?"  
Boy: "$750."  
Man: "Fine."  

A few days later, the father says to the boy, "Grab your glove. Let's go outside and toss the baseball!"  
The boy says, "I can't. I sold them."  
The father asks, "How much did you sell them for?"  
The son says, "$1,000."  
The father says, "It's terrible to over-charge your friends like that. That is way more than those two things cost. I'm going to take you to church and make you confess."  

They go to church and the father alerts the priest and makes the little boy sit in the confession booth and closes the door. 

The boy says, "Dark in here."  
The priest says, "Don't start that shit again."





***
First I got a tattoo on my cervical that said "5".
Next, I got one on my thoracic that said "4"

Then, I got one on my lumbar that said "3"

After that, I got one on my Sacrum that said 2"

And now, I'm getting one on my Coccyx that says "1"


It's the spinal countdown. 




***
A kid asks his grandmother "How come ive never seen you and grandpa fight?..."
/ - ... I see mom and dad fight from time to time, but ive never seen you and grandaddy fight... why is that?

/  - Well, says the grandma, we got married in the old church in the middle of town, after the marriage ceremony, we hopped on our horse carriage, it was a long time ago when horse carriages where still a thing, and cars where just starting to come around... And we went our way to our farm, that was a bit away from town, but half way there, the horse stopped, and it refused to start walking again, so your grandpa got down, stood in front of the horse, looked it directly at his eyes and said "one".

/ - He got up on the carriage again, and the horse started walking, i thought that would be it, but then a few miles ahead, the horse again stopped and refused to keep walking, the horse was not tired, or thirsty or hungry, he was just being stubborn!, so your grandpa got down, stood in front of the horse looked directly at his eyes, and said "TWO", he hopped on and we continued our way, with the horse walking again. 

/ - When we where almost at the farm, the horse decided to stop again, and wouldnt walk, your grandpa, he got down, looked the horse directly in its eyes, and as he said THREE! he pulled out his gun and he shot the horse right between the eyes.

/ - For a second i was just stunned, he calmly started walking towards the carriage and i started yelling at him!, WHATS WRONG WITH YOU?, WHY DID YOU DO THAT FOR?, NOW HOW ARE WE GOING TO GET THE CARRIAGE TO THE FARM?, "WHY DID YOU HAVE TO SHOOT THE HORSE!!!", he looked me directly at my eyes, and said, "one". 


***
The German Baby Joke
So there is this couple and they adopt a baby from Germany.  The baby never starts speaking,  even after 3 years. After four years of the boy not speaking the couple take the boy to the doctor, but the doctor says that everything is developing fine, and that there is nothing wrong with him. 

Then one day, when the boy is eating some apple strudel, and he says, "This apple strudel is a bit tepid".

"Wolfgang," the couple say, "you have never spoken before, why do you speak now?" 

And the boy says, "Up until now everything had been satisfactory" 


***
So to celebrate the Halloween season...
... I was going to go to a 200 year old building that was apparently set up with shriveled up old corpses, dangerous bandits, bloodsucking vampires, hellbent soulless demons, and the like. But it turns out the Capitol Building is closed for tours until a budget resolution is reached.
***
What's the difference between Saint Patrick's Day and Martin Luther King Day?
Everyone wants to be Irish on Saint Patrick's Day.
***
Astronomers got tired of watching the moon go round the earth for 24 hours, so they called it a day.
I'm sorry.

Edit: FFS guys it's a ruddy joke. It doesn't have to be scientifically accurate
***
I smell maple syrup!
A mama mole, a papa mole, and a baby mole all live in a little mole hole. One day the papa mole sticks his head out of the hole, sniffs the air and says, "Yum! I smell maple syrup!" 

The mama mole sticks her head out of the hole, sniffs the air and says "Yum! I smell honey!"

The baby mole tries to stick his head out of the hole to sniff the air, but can't because the bigger moles are in the way. So he says, "Geez, all I can smell is . . . . . 









molasses."
***
A guy goes to the supermarket and notices an attractive woman waving at him....
A guy goes to the supermarket and notices an attractive woman waving at him. 
She says hello. 
He’s rather taken aback because he can’t place where he knows her from.
So he says, "Do you know me?" 
To which she replies, "I think you’re the father of one of my kids." 
Now his mind travels back to the only time he has ever been unfaithful to his wife and says, "My God, are you the stripper from my bachelor party that I made love to on the pool table with all my buddies watching while your partner whipped my butt with wet celery?" 
She looks into his eyes and says calmly, "No, I’m your son’s teacher."
***
How I picked my career.
I was driving down the street, when I was cut off by someone. I honked frantically, applied the brakes masterfully and dodged a sure accident. At the next set of lights, I pulled up beside the perpetrators and it was a car with 4 black men in it. I gave them the finger, and they became hostile towards me. They called me a "fucking cracker" and "a stupid white boy" I told them to "learn how to drive" and " pay some fucking attention". They scoffed at me, and began to drive ahead, only to be Tboned by an on coming fire truck. Amongst our argument, the driver must not have heard the siren. I reflected on my behaviour and thought "shit, that coulda been me". So the next day I went out and became a fire fighter.
***
Son asks his dad about politics..
A small boy asks his Dad, "Daddy, what is politics?" Dad says, "Well son, let me try to explain it this way: I'm the breadwinner of the family, so let's call me Capitalism. Your mom, she's the administrator of the money, so we'll call her the Government. We're here to take care of your needs, so we'll call you the People. The nanny, we'll consider her the Working Class. And your baby brother, we'll call him the Future. Now, think about that and see if that makes sense." So the little boy goes off to bed thinking about what Dad has said. 

Later that night, he hears his baby brother crying, so he gets up to check on him. He finds that the baby has severely soiled his diaper. The little boy goes to his parents' room and finds his mother sound asleep. Not wanting to wake her, he goes to the nanny's room. Finding the door locked, he peeks in the keyhole and sees his father having sex with the nanny. He gives up and goes back to bed. The next morning, the little boy says to his father, "Dad, I think I understand the concept of politics now." The father says, "Good, son, tell me in your own words what you think politics is all about." The little boy replies, "Well, while Capitalism is screwing the Working Class, the Government is sound asleep, the People are being ignored and the Future is in Deep Shit."
***
A young Korean couple are lying in bed...
When the guy starts farting nonstop.

The girl, unable to take the smell, says, "Stop, that's disgusting!"

"Don't blame me", the guy says. "It's the dog."

"Oh, don't blame him", she says. "He was cooked perfectly."
***
A jew in his deathbed...
A jew in his deathbed is surrounded by his family. He asks if the wife is there; she was. He asks if his son was there; he was. He asked if his daughter was there, and she was.

As he finds out everyone's there, he has a heart attack. His final words were:
-Why... is no one... in the shop... 

Edit: This got me the most upvotes I've ever had, somehow.
***
10 Catholic priest all die in a bus accident
When they arrive at the pearly gates, St Peter Acknowledges them. He sees that they're all priests and immediately says "If any of you a pedophiles, there's no point waiting here. You might as well fuck off straight to hell right now!".

9 of the priests turn around and begin to walk away.

St Peter calls after them. "AND TAKE THE DEAF BASTARD WITH YOU TOO!"
***
A man walks into a bar, orders a shot and immediately...
A drunk walks into a bar, orders a shot and and immediately pukes all over his own shirt. "Wha' my gonna do now? My wifez gonna kill me."

"Relax," the bartender says, "give me a five-dollar bill." The bartender folds up the bill and puts it in the guy's shirt pocket. "Tell your wife some drunk puked on you and gave you five bucks to have your shirt cleaned."

"Thass a great idea!"

When the drunk gets home his wife answers the door. "Where have you been? What happened to your shirt?"

He tries to put on a sober voice and says, "Relaaax honey, some drunk guy puked on me and gave me five bucks to have my shirt cleaned."

The drunk's wife reaches in his pocket, grabs the money, and says, "There's $10 in here!"

"Oh yeah, he shit my pants, too."
***
Talking Clock
After a night at the bar, a guy invites his friend over to see his new apartment. During the tour, his friend sees a large gong against the wall and asks, "What's with the gong?"  "It's not a gong, it's a talking clock," says the guy. He picks up the mallet, and hits the gong. His neighbor screams from the other side of the wall, "Shut the fuck up, Its 3:30 in the goddamn morning!"
***
A teacher said to her class, "Suppose you were all millionaires, write what you would do"...
Everyone immediately began to write furiously, except little Johnny, who kicked back and put his feet on the table. The teacher walked over to him. "Why aren't you writing Johnny?" she asked. Johnny looked up. "I'm waiting for my secretary."
***
Is sex work?
A U.S. Marine Colonel was about to start the morning briefing to his
staff. While waiting for the coffee machine to finish its brewing, the
colonel decided to pose a question to all assembled.

He explained that his wife had been a bit frisky the night before and
he failed to get his usual amount of sound sleep. He posed the
question of just how much of sex was "work" and how much of it was
"pleasure?" A Major chimed in with 25-75% in favor of work . 
A Captain said it was 50-50%. A lieutenant responded with 25-75% in
favor of pleasure , depending upon his state of inebriation at the
time.

There being no consensus, the colonel turned to the PFC (Private First Class) who was in
charge of making the coffee. What was HIS opinion?

Without any hesitation, the young PFC responded, "Sir, it has to be
100% pleasure."

The colonel was surprised and, as you might guess, asked why.

"Well, sir, if there was any work involved, the officers would have me
doing it for them."
***
A man was riding a bus....
A man was riding a bus, minding his own business, when a gorgeous woman next to him started to breastfeed her baby.

The baby wouldn't take it, so she said: "Come on, drink it or ... I'll have to give it to this nice man here."

Five minutes later, the baby was still not feeding, so she said, "Come on, honey. Take it or I'll give it to this nice man here."

A few minutes later, the anxious man blurted out: "Come on, kid. Make up your mind! I was supposed to get off four stops ago!"

***
Five secrets of a perfect Relationship
1. It`s important to have a woman who helps at home, cooks, cleans and has a job.  
2. It`s important to have a woman who can make you laugh.  
3. It`s important to have a woman you can trust and who would never lie.  
4. It`s important to have a woman who is good in bed and likes being with you.  
5. It`s absolutely important that these four women never meet.
***
Murphy was walking home late at night and sees a woman in the dark shadows.
"Twenty Euros," she whispers.Murphy had never been with a hooker before,but decides what the hell, it's only twentyEuros. So they hid in the bushes. They're going at it for a minute when all of a sudden a light flashes on them. It is a Police Officer."What's going on here, people?" asks the cop."I'm making love to me wife," Murphy answerssounding annoyed."Oh, I'm sorry," says the cop, "I didn't know.""Well, neidder did I, til ya shined that bloodylight in her face!"
***
Two Muslim Brothers
Two Muslim brothers come to America and have a contest to see who can become more Americanized. A month later they get together and one proudly says "I took my son to a baseball game and we ate hot dogs!" The other replies "Fuck you, towelhead!"
***
I was at a retro night down at the club
The DJ played "The Twist", so I did the twist. Then he played "The Macarena", and I did the Macarena. When he played "Come on Eileen", that's when the police arrested me.
***
Henry Winkler on a plane
Henry Winkler is a passenger on a plane and the flight attendant asks him, "Would you like some headphones?"

He replies, "Yes, that would be very nice, but it's pronounced 'Fonz'."
***
Three fathers are talking about their sons.

The first father says, "my sons a successful doctor. He's so rich, he just bought his best friend a Lamborghini". 

The second father said, "my sons a successful hedge fund manager. He's so rich, he just bought his best friend a yacht". 

The third father says, "my sons the CEO of a big company. He's so rich he just bought his best friend a castle". 

Right then, a fourth father walks in and asks what they're talking about. 
The other three fathers say, "we're talking about our successful sons, what does yours do?" 
The fourth father says, "well my sons a gay stripper." 
The other three fathers say, "oh wow, you must be really disappointed." 

The fourth father replies with, "well not really, he's doing really well. His three boyfriends just bought him a Lamborghini, a yacht, and a castle."
***
Told an inmate to have a safe drive home.
I'm a corrections officer, getting ready to head out at shift change:

Inmate: "drive home safe"
Me: "yeah you too..."
Me: (thinking "oops, ouch")
Coworker: "Muahahaha"
Inmate: (hops into his imaginary car and shuffles to his cell making farting engine noises, screeches the brakes, steps out of his car and into his cell. Pokes his head out) "Made it home safe dad" 
Me and my coworker burst out laughing 
***
First day on the job
A taxi passenger taps the driver on the shoulder to ask him a question. The driver screams, loses control of the car, nearly hits a bus, goes up on the footpath, and stops centimeters from a shop window.

 For a second, everything goes quiet in the cab, then the driver says, "Look mate, don't ever do that again. You scared the daylights out of me!" 

The passenger apologizes and says, "I didn't realize that a little tap would scare you so much.”

 The driver replies, "Sorry, it's not really your fault. Today is my first day as a cab driver, but I've been a hearse driver for the last 25 years!"
***
The wife and her husband...
The wife and her husband sat in their trailer watching a cooking show on TV, as the wife notice a romantically involved couple next door through the window. The couple was lying down on a blanket, the girl nibbled the boys ear and he had his hand inside her T-shirt. You don’t need to be a brain surgeon to see where this would develop.
«I can not decide whether I want to watch them or the TV», the wife jokingly said to her husband. 
«Watch them», the man replied dryly, «you already know how to cook».
***
The Hitchhiker.
A man is driving across the state to see his wife when he sees a Native American hitchhiker on the side of the road. Thinking he could do with some company, he pulls over and lets the man in, offering him a ride home.

The Native man is grateful, but our driver notices that he keeps eyeing the large bottle of gin on the floor of the passenger seat. Not wanting the guy to get any ideas, he says "Ah, I got that bottle for my wife."

The Native man says nothing for a few moments, then softly replies

"Good trade."

***
So my Irish friend decided to tell his community he's an atheist...
One man in the crowd then yelled "Yes, but is it the Catholic god you don't believe in or the Protestant one?"

(Wow this exploded. Front... *wow*. Gotta say, I like the (current) top comment's version more.)
***
A guy text to his neighbor
A guy sends a text to his next-door neighbor:"Bob, I'm sorry. I've been riddled with guilt and I have to confess: I have been helping myself to your wife when you're not around, probably more than you. I know it's no excuse but I don't get it at home. I can't live with the guilt any longer. I hope you'll accept my sincerest apology. It won't happen again."Feeling outrage and betrayed, Bob grabs his gun, goes into the bedroom, and without a word, shoots his wife.Moments later the guy gets a second text: "Really should use spell check! That should be "wifi"."
***
Did you hear that Auschwitz had to ask visitors to stop playing Pokemon Go?
They got tired of people pretending to be Ash. 








Edit: Wow thank you for the gold mates! Hopefully none of you Jews will try to steal it from me... kidding.

For those of you who were offended... please try to take it easy. It's a joke. You should find humor in everything. Life's more fun that way. 
***
A redneck boy runs into his house..
A redneck boy runs into his house and proclaims, "I've found the girl that I'm gonna marry! And she's a virgin!" Incensed, his father pounds his fist on the table. "There's no way you'll marry that girl! If she aint' good enough for her own family, she ain't good enough for ours."
***
So a lady goes to a bakery...
and asks for some bagels. The man at the counter says "Sorry, we won't have bagels until next week". So the lady says ok and goes home. The next day she comes back and goes up to the same man at the counter again and asks for some bagels. The man replies, "Ma'am, I told you yesterday, we won't have bagels for another week." So the lady says ok ok and goes home. The next day, the same lady walks into the store, goes up to the man, and asks for some bagels. The man shouts, "Lady I told you! We don't have any bagels! Do you understand!?", "yes" replies the lady, and she goes home. Of course, the next day the lady walks into the store and goes up to the man at the counter and asks for some bagels. The man replies to her calmly, "Lady, do you know how to spell 'cat' as in 'catatonic?". She says, "yes C-A-T". The man then asks, "Do you know how to spell 'dog' as in 'dogmatic'?". The lady replies, "ya, D-O-G." Then the man asks the lady, "Do you know how to spell 'fuck', as in 'bagels'?" "But there's no fuck in bagels" she says. "That's what I've been trying to tell you!"
***
Construction Worker Joke
Construction worker on the 5th floor of a building needed a handsaw. So he spots another worker on the ground floor and yells down to him, but he can't hear him. So the worker on the 5th floor tries sign language. He pointed to his eye meaning "I", pointed to his knee meaning "need", then moved his hand back and forth in a hand saw motion. The man on the ground floor nods his head, pulls down his pants, whips out his chop and starts masturbating. The worker on 5th floor gets so pissed off he runs down to the ground floor and says, "What the fuck is your problem!!! I said I needed a hand saw!". The other guy says, "I knew that! I was just trying to tell you - I'm coming!
***
A Duck Walks Into A Bar
A duck walks into a bar around lunchtime, sits down and orders a beer and a sandwich.

The bartender looks at him and says, "Oh my God, a talking duck! What are you doing here?"

The duck replies, "I'm dry-walling the building across the street. I'll be in town for a few days."

The next day, the duck walks back into the bar and the bartender says,
"Hey duck, I was telling someone about you last night. They're really interested in meeting with you!"

"Is that so?"

"There's a travelling circus in town," the bartender explained. 
"The ringmaster was in here last night and thought you'd be a star attraction for them!"

The duck looked puzzled and says, "Why the hell would a circus need a dry-waller?"

***
A man in Amsterdam feels the need to confess
... so he goes to his priest. 
"Forgive me, Father, for I have sinned. During WWII, I hid a refugee in my attic." 
"Well," answers the priest, "that's not a sin."' 
"But I made him agree to pay me 20 guilders for every week he stayed." 
"I admit that wasn't good, but you did it for a good cause." 
"Oh, thank you, Father. That eases my mind. I have one more question." 
"What is that, my son?" 
"Do I have to tell him the war is over?"
***
A rather confident 007 walks into a bar
A rather confident 007 walks into a bar and takes a seat next to a very attractive woman. He gives her a quick glance, then casually looks at his watch for a moment. The woman notices this and asks, "Is your date running late?"

"No", he replies, "I've just been given this state-of-the-art watch by Q and I was just testing it."
The intrigued woman says, "A state-of-the-art watch? What's so special about it?"
"It uses alpha waves to telepathically talk to me", he explains.
"What's it telling you now?"
"Well, it says you're not wearing any knickers..."
The woman giggles and replies, "Well it must be broken because I am wearing knickers!"

Bond tut tuts, taps his watch and says, "Damn thing must be an hour fast."
***
She says, "Hello"
He's rather taken aback because he can't place where he knows her from.     
So he asks, 'Do you know me?'
To which she replies, 'I think you're the father of one of my kids.'    
Now his mind travels back to the only time he has ever been unfaithful to his wife.    
So he asks, 'Are you the stripper from the bachelor party that I made love to on the pool table, with all my buddies watching, while your partner whipped my butt with wet celery?'    
She looks into his eyes and says calmly, 'No, I'm your son's teacher.'

***
A store that sells new husbands has opened in New York City
A store that sells new husbands has opened in New York City , where a woman may go to choose a husband. Among the instructions at the entrance is a description of how the store operates: 

You may visit this store ONLY ONCE! There are six floors and the value of the products increase as the shopper ascends the flights. The shopper may choose any item from a particular floor, or may choose to go up to the next floor, but you cannot go back down except to exit the building! 
So, a woman goes to the Husband Store to find a husband. On the first floor the sign on the door reads:

Floor 1- These men Have Jobs 

She is intrigued, but continues to the second floor, where the sign reads:


Floor 2 - These men Have Jobs and Love Kids. 

'That's nice,' she thinks, 'but I want more.' 

So she continues upward. The third floor sign reads: 

Floor 3 - These men Have Jobs, Love Kids, and are Extremely Good Looking. 

'Wow,' she thinks, but feels compelled to keep going. 

She goes to the fourth floor and the sign reads: 

Floor 4 - These men Have Jobs, Love Kids, are Drop-dead Good Looking and Help With Housework.

'Oh, mercy me!' she exclaims, 'I can hardly stand it!' 

Still, she goes to the fifth floor and the sign reads: 

Floor 5 - These men Have Jobs, Love Kids, are Drop-dead Gorgeous, Help with Housework, and Have a Strong Romantic Streak. 

She is so tempted to stay, but she goes to the sixth floor, where the sign reads: 


Floor 6 - You are visitor 31,456,012 to this floor. There are no men on this floor. This floor exists solely as proof that women are impossible to please. Thank you for shopping at the Husband Store. 

PLEASE NOTE:

To avoid gender bias charges, the store's owner opened a New Wives store just across the street. 

The first floor has wives that love sex. 

The second floor has wives that love sex and have money and like beer. 


The third, fourth, fifth and sixth floors have never been visited.

***
Murderous neighbor
A judge asks a defendant to please stand. 
"You are charged with murdering a garbage man with a chain saw."

From the back of the courtroom a man shouts, "You lying bastard!"

"Silence in the court!" The judge turns to the defendant again and says, "You are also charged with killing a paperboy with a shovel."

"You tightwad!" blurts the spectator.

"Quiet!" yelled the judge. "You are also charged with killing a mailman with an electric drill."

"You cheap son of a... " the spectator starts to shout.

The judge thunders back, " I will hold you in contempt! What is the reason for your outbursts?"

"I've lived next to that lying bastard for 10 years now, but do you think he ever had a tool when I needed to borrow one?"
***
"Commissioner, we've found 20 kilograms of cocaine."
"10 kilograms you say?"

"Yeah, 5 kilograms"
***
The Happy Marriage
A man and woman had been married for more than 60 years. They had shared everything. They had talked about everything. They had kept no secrets from each other except that the little old woman had a shoe box in the top of her closet that she had cautioned her husband never to open or ask her about.

For all of these years, he had never thought about the box, but one day the little old woman got very sick and the doctor said she would not recover.

In trying to sort out their affairs, the little old man took down the shoe box and took it to his wife's bedside. She agreed that it was time that he should know what was in the box. When he opened it, he found two crocheted dolls and a stack of money totalling $95,000.

He asked her about the contents.
'When we were to be married,' she said, ' my grandmother told me the secret of a happy marriage was to never argue. She told me that if I ever got angry with you, I should just keep quiet and crochet a doll.'

The little old man was so moved; he had to fight back tears. Only two Precious dolls were in the box. She had only been angry with him two Times in all those years of living and loving. He almost burst with Happiness.

'Honey,' he said, 'that explains the doll, but what about all of this money? Where did it come from?'

'Oh,' she said, 'that's the money I made from selling the dolls.'
***
Piano Man
A pianist responds to an ad for a Piano Player wanted at a swanky bar.  The manager interviewing him asks  the pianist to play something.  

The pianist plays and sings, and it's beautiful.  The manager is really impressed.  The pianist admits that he wrote and composed it himself.  The manager asks what the song is called and the pianist replies, "Fuck you and your mother, you shit eating whore".

Clearly upset by the title of the song, the manager attempts to regain his composure and asks the pianist, "um, do you know any other songs?"

The pianist starts right in on the most beautiful piece the manager had ever heard, and by the time the pianist finished, the manager had tears in his eyes.

Afraid to ask, the manager asked what that one was called.  The pianist said it was one of the first songs he ever wrote, and it was called "Suck my hairy white ass, you commie fuck!"

Clearly impressed with the skill of the pianist but fearful for the effect the song titles might have on his business the manager makes a deal with the player.

"I will hire you, and pay you with $100 bar tab per night and 5% of the door, but you're not allowed to tell anyone what your songs are called."

The pianist agrees, just happy to have a gig.

So he's playing the first night, really enjoying himself, drinking for free and all of the patrons are enjoying the music as well.  At some point, very drunk, the pianist needs to go relieve himself so takes a break from playing.

When he returns from the bathroom, a beautiful woman approaches him and quietly asks him, "Do you know your dick is out and everyone can see it?"

The piano player's eyes get wide, and he excitedly replies, "Know it!?  I fucking *wrote it*!"

***
$400a night
A man came home from work one day to find his wife on the front porch with her bags packed.
‘Just where the heck do you think you’re going!’, said the man.
‘I’m going to Las Vegas’, said the wife, ‘I just found out I can get $400 a night for what I give you for free!
‘The man said, ‘Wait a minute!’, and then ran inside the house only to come back a few minutes later with his suitcases in hand.
‘Where the heck are you going?’, said the wife.
The man said, ‘I want to see how you’re gonna live on $800 a year!’
***
Mickey Mouse is getting a divorce from Minnie. The Judge says: "I'm sorry Mickey, but I can't grant you a divorce because you say she is insane."
Mickey Says: "Judge, I didn't say she was insane, I said she's fucking Goofy." 
***
The Hypnotist at the senior's center
One day the local senior's center brought in a hypnotist to entertain the elderly. He pulled out an old family heirloom pocket watch and waved it back and forth, slowly, repeating 'watch the watch' in a calm, soothing voice. 
Back and forth it went, 'watch the watch, watch the watch' until the whole room was entranced. 
Suddenly, the watch's chain slipped out of the hypnotist's hand and the watch fell to the ground and smashed into a thousand pieces. 

"Shit!" Said the hypnotist. 

It took 3 days to clean up the senior's center. 
***
I had a blind date last night
I had a blind date last night. But I was concerned -- What do I do if she's really unattractive? I'll be stuck with her all night.

Turns out, There's an app for that.

It's called "Mom Are You Ok". It schedules your phone to ring just after you meet her.

If you like her, you ignore it.

If you want to cut short the date, you answer with, "Mom? What's the matter? Are you okay?"

It works every time.

So I knocked on the girl's door. Turns out I needn't have worried.

She was gorgeous!

I couldn't get over how attractive she was!!

Just as I was about to speak to her, her phone rang!!!

She answered it and said, "Mom, what's the matter? Are you okay?" !!! 
***
A man walks into a bar
and he sees this small man playing the piano. The man, astounded, asks the bartender why there is a small man playing the piano in the bar. The bartender pulls out a dusty old lamp and says that there is a genie in there and that he would grant one wish to anyone who frees him.

So the man walks outside the bar with the lamp, rubs it and sure enough a genie comes out. "Thank you for freeing me. For this, you can have one wish." So the man thinks for a bit and shouts, "I want a million ducks!" and as soon as he said it, money fell from the sky, hundreds and thousands of cash scattered everywhere. So the man collects all the cash and walks back into the bar to return the lamp. The bartender, who witnessed the whole event asks, "Wow, how did you know that the genie was hard of hearing?"

"Well," the man replies, "I see this joke posted here every day."
***
Fuck cheesy chat-up lines, we need better break-up lines:
Hey baby, are you being followed? Because I've been seeing people behind your back.

Is it hot in here, or are you just suffocating me in this relationship?

I didn't know angels flew this close to the ground. Maybe that's because this angel's gained a little weight since we started going out.

You and me love, we're like six balls in cricket. OVER!

I'm leaving you on religious grounds. I've decided to become a Jew, and you're a fucking pig.

***
Canine Names
A girl was visiting her blonde friend, who had acquired two new dogs, and asked her what their names were. The blonde responded by saying that one was named Rolex and one was named Timex.

Her friend said, "Whoever heard of someone naming dogs like that?"

"Isn't it obvious?" the second blonde responded. "They're watch dogs!" 
***
An Ancient Roman walks into a bar.
He sits down and says 

"I'll have a martinus please."

"Don't you mean a martini?" The bartender asks

The Ancient Roman replies

"If I wanted a double I would have asked for it."
***
Open and Shut
A man’s wife disappears and he’s accused of killing her. At the trial, his lawyer tells the jury, “Ladies and gentlemen, I have amazing news. Not only is my client’s wife actually alive, but she’ll walk through that door in ten seconds."

An expectant silence settles over the courtroom, but nothing happens.

“Think about that,” the lawyer says. “The fact that you were watching the door, expecting to see the missing woman, proves that you have a reasonable doubt as to whether a murder was actually committed.”

He sits down confidently, and the judge sends the jury off to deliberate. They return in ten minutes and declare the man guilty.

“Guilty?” says the lawyer. “How can that be? You were all watching the door!”

“Most of us were watching the door,” says the foreman. “But one of us was watching the defendant, and he wasn’t watching the door.”
***
FRESH HARAMBE OF BELL AIR....
In west Cincinnati I was born and raised on the zoo grounds is where I spent most of my days,Chillin out hangin out acting all cool, eating bananas out by the pool When a mom and her kid, they were up to no good, crawled over the fence into my neighborhood,I got in one little fight and my zoo keeper got scared, heard a gunshot just before I stopped breathing air.......

***
I don't see why we Brits don't celebrate 4th of July
Surely 240 years of being officially seperate from America is something to be happy about
***
Sex without light
There was this couple that had been married for 20 years. Every time they made love the husband always insisted on shutting off the light.


Well, after 20 years the wife felt this was ridiculous. She figured she would break him out of this crazy habit. So one night, while they were in the middle of a wild, screaming, romantic session, she turned on the lights.

She looked down. and saw her husband was holding a battery-operated leisure device … a dildo! Soft, wonderful and larger than a real one.

She went completely ballistic. “You impotent bastard,” She screamed at him, “How could you be lying to me all of these years? You better explain yourself!”


The husband looks her straight in the eyes and says calmly: “I’ll explain the toy … you explain the kids.” 
***
An old lady decides to check on his 3 son-in-laws
She wanted to see who respects/cares for her the most. She goes to the lake near the eldest son-in-laws place and jumps. The son-in-law dives in and rescues her. Next day, he sees a toyota corolla parked in front of his house with a letter -- Thanks from your Mother-in-law.


Then she goes to her second son-in-law places and jumps in a lake near his house. The second son-in-law also saves her. Next day he too gets a toyota corolla as a gift with a letter -- Thanks from your Mother-in-law

Now the old lady goes to her third son-in-law's place and jumps in the lake. He does not save her and she drowns. Next day he sees a Ferrari parked in front of his house with a letter -- Thanks from your Father-in-law.

edit: An old lady decides to check on HER 3 SONS-in-law
***
A hot blonde goes to the gynaecologist for a check up...
When she enters his office, the doctor is overcome by his primal urges, and immediately tells her to take off her clothes.  

"Do you know why I asked you to do that?" He asks, hesitantly. 
"Sure, you want to check everything to make sure I'm fine."
"That's right!" He says.

After she strips, he starts groping her breasts.
"Do you know what I'm doing now?
"Sure," she says, "you're checking for lumps."

The doctor, growing more bold, slips his finger between her legs.
"Do you know what I'm doing now?"
"Yes, you're checking for any problems down there."
"That's exactly right!" The doctor says.  

He can't contain himself any longer and proceeds to pull out his cock and begin thrusting it in and out of her like a crazed animal. 

"Do you know what I'm doing now?" The doctor asks, panting.
The woman responds, "Yes, you're getting herpes."
***
The vaccine conspiracy
Linda had a heart attack and was brought to the emergency room while in clinical death. The doctors managed to revive her, but during her coma she saw a bright light and God appeared to her. She asked him:

"Tell me, God, is it true that vaccines could cause autism?"

"No, autism is a condition that develops during pregnancy"

After getting well, she met her friends and told them about her experience:

"Girls, I have awful news: the conspiracy goes way higher than we've thought"
***
Bass Solo
A couple goes to see a marriage counselor. They say their marriage is on the rocks because they never speak to each other.

The counselor tries to get them to talk, but they just sit there with their arms folded and their mouths closed. He tries playing games. He tries tricking them. Nothing he can do can get them to talk to each other.

Finally, he pulls out an electric bass and starts playing a solo.

Instantly, the couple turns to each other and starts conversing for the first time in months.

“How on earth did you know that would work?” they ask.

“Simple,” he says, “Everyone always talks during the bass solo.”
***
Just a typical, Wednesday taxi ride...
Last Wednesday a passenger in a taxi heading for the airport leaned over to ask the driver a question and gently tapped him on the shoulder to get his attention.

The driver screamed, lost control of the cab, nearly hit a bus, drove up over the curb and stopped just inches from a large plate glass window.
For a few moments everything was silent in the cab. Then, the shaking driver said "Are you OK? I'm so sorry, but you scared the living daylights out of me."

The badly shaken passenger apologized to the driver and said, "I didn't realize that a mere tap on the shoulder would startle someone so badly."

The driver replied, "No, no, I'm the one who is sorry, it's entirely my fault. Today is my very first day driving a cab. I've been driving a hearse for 25 years."﻿

-Credits to a friend, who has an internet-phobia.  
***
Sexual Harassment joke....
Every day at the office, a male co-worker walks up very close to a lady
standing at the coffee machine, inhales a big breath of air
and tells her that her hair smells nice.

After a week of this, she can't stand it anymore,  takes her complaint to a
supervisor in the personnel department and states that she wants to file a sexual harassment
grievance against him.

The Human Resources supervisor is puzzled by this decision and asks, "What's
sexually threatening about a co-worker telling you your hair smells nice?"
The woman replies, "It's Keith, the midget." 
***
Blonde goes to the gynecologist
A blonde goes into the gynecologist. When he asks her what the problem is she replies, "Something is extremely wrong. I keep finding postage stamps from Costa Rica in my vagina!" 

He takes a look and laughs, "Dear, those aren't stamps. Those are stickers from the bananas.” 

***
A woman who is 3 months pregnant falls into a deep coma. 6 months later, she wakes up and asks the doctor about her baby.
Doctor: You had twins, a girl and a boy. Fortunately, your brother was there to name them for you.

Woman: Oh no, not my brother! He's an idiot! What did he name the girl?

Doctor: Denise.

Woman: Well, that isn't so bad. What did he name the boy?

Doctor: Denephew.
***
Judas: C´mon Jesus we´re gonna be late for last supper
Jesus: The what??
Judas: The supper.. we´re gonna be late for supper.
***
Little Johnny
"Hey, Mom," asked Johnny "Can you give me twenty dollars?" 

"Certainly not." 

"If you do," he went on, "I'll tell you what dad said to the maid when you were at the beauty shop." 

His mother's ears perked up and, grabbing her purse, she handed over the money. "Well? What did he say?" 

"He said, 'Hey, Marie, make sure you wash my socks tomorrow.' "
***
A blonde is on vacation and runs out of money...
A blonde is on vacation and runs out of money. She wants to write an e-mail to her mother so that her mother can send her some. She goes to an internet café and goes up to the guy at the desk. 

She says: "I'm sorry, but I'm broke and I really need to contact my mother. Is there any way I could do that for free? I don't even have enough to pay the fee here."

The guy at the front desk asks her in his creepiest voice: "Do you *really* need to contact your mother?"

"Yes" she answers. "I really need to contact my mother." 

"And you would do *anything*?"

"Yes I would do anything to contact my mother."

"Really anything?"

Exasperated, the blonde answers: "Yes, yes, yes, I would do anything."

"Well, then." the guy says "Why don't you just follow me to the back room."

So she does. The guy pulls down his pants. The blonde is a bit irritated at first, but thinks that what must be must be. He pulls down his underpants. 

"Well," He says "Do it!"

So the blond gets down on her knees in front of him. She licks her lips. She bends forward and whispers: "Hello, mom? Can you hear me?" 
***
Never Mess with Kids
A man was seated next to a kid in an airplane.
The man turned to him and said, “Let’s talk”.

Kid: Ok, what do we talk about ?

Man (making fun of d kid): How about nuclear power?

Kid:
Very interesting topic. But let me ask you a question…
Horse, cow & deer, all eat grass. Yet deer excretes pellets, cow flat potty & horse clumps.
Why?

Man: I don’t know.

Child: Do you really feel qualified enough to discuss nuclear issues when you don’t know shit.. ?
***
No sex since 1955.
A crusty old Sergeant Major found himself at a gala event, hosted by a local liberal arts college. There was no shortage of extremely young, idealistic ladies in attendance, one of whom approached the Sergeant Major for conversation.  

She said, "Excuse me, Sergeant Major, but you seem to be a very serious man.  Is something bothering you?"

 "Negative, ma'am," the Sergeant Major said, "Just serious by nature."  

The young lady looked at his awards and decorations and said, "It looks like you have seen a lot of action." 

The Sergeant Major's short reply was, "Yes, ma'am, a lot of action." 

The young lady, tiring of trying to start up a conversation, said, "You know, you should lighten up a little.  Relax and enjoy yourself."  

The Sergeant Major just stared at her in his serious manner.  

Finally the young lady said, "You know, I hope you don't take this the wrong way, but when is the last time you had sex?" 

The Sergeant Major looked at her and replied, "1955."  

She said, "Well, there you are.  You really need to chill out and quit taking everything so seriously! I mean, no sex since 1955!  Isn't that a little extreme?"

The Sergeant Major, glancing at his watch, said in his matter-of-fact voice, "You think so?  It's only 2130 now." 
***
James Bond hits upon hard times and finds himself facing a job seeker interview...
James Bond hits upon hard times and finds himself facing a job seeker interview,

"Well Mr Bond we have two positions we can offer you, one is giving lectures to children on the benefits of a career in military intelligence, and the other is in the fabric staining department of a yarn mill. "

"Do you expect me to talk? "

"No, Mr Bond, I expect you to dye. "
***
TIL Jehovah's Witnesses don't celebrate halloween..
guess they don't appreciate random people knocking on their doors
***
Jim had been out for a few days with the flu. Back at work,...
...he ran into a friend of his, who asked him, "Jim, how are you feeling?"

"I'm better, thanks. You know, it was a wonderful experience," Jim replied.

"Wonderful? How can the flu be wonderful?"

"Well, I learned that my wife really loves me. You know, whenever the mailman came by or a delivery man headed toward the door, my wife ran out to meet them? I could hear her excitedly saying 'My husband is home! My husband is home!'"
***
The lion and the fox
A lion and his wife lived in a cave, and everyday there was this fox who would come sit in front of the cave and start making fun of the lion and teasing him: "You call yourself a king? You're nothing but a pussy who's afraid of his own shadow. If you're a real lion come out here and fight me! Oh, you think you're so fierce, you sissy!". The lion's wife would get so annoyed "Why are you letting him get away with this? If you're not gonna do something about this, I WILL!", and the lion would say "Just ignore him, he's a freaking fox, he's not worth it, just let it go". 

One day, she felt that she couldn't take it anymore, and decided to handle the situation by herself. She came out of the cave and started running after the fox. The fox ran and ran, but the lioness was close on his heel. He entered a pipe and got out on the other end. When she tried to get in, she got stuck, so the fox came from behind and fucked her in the ass.

The lioness went back to the cave, angry and frustrated. The lion looked at her and said: "So... He took you to the pipe didn't he.."
***
A lady goes to the doctor for help with her sex life...
Doctor: Give your husband viagra.

Lady: I can't, he hates pills.

Doctor: Just put it in his coffee.

Next week she returns, unhappy.

Doctor: Was it good?

Lady: It was the worst sex I ever had. He had a few sips of coffee, then he pushed everything off the table and fucked me on it right then and there.

Doctor: Well, then what's wrong?

Lady: I'll never be able to show my face at Starbucks again.

----

Edit: To the guys saying that's not how Viagra works. Use some imagination damnit! Assume details if you have to.
***
Wife vs. Girlfriend vs. beard
A married man was visiting his “girlfriend” when she requested that he shave his beard.

“Oh James, I like your beard, but I would really love to see your handsome face.”

James replied, “My wife loves this beard, I couldn’t possibly do it, she would kill me!!”

“Oh please?” the girlfriend asked again, in a sexy little voice…

“Oh really, I can’t,” he replied. “My wife loves this beard!!”

The girlfriend asked once more, and he sighed and finally gave in and shaved his face smooth.

That night James crawled into bed with his wife while she was sleeping.

The wife was awakened somewhat, felt his face and replied, “Oh Michael, you shouldn’t be here, my husband will be home soon!”
***
What is a Linux user's favorite game?
sudo ku

EDIT: First post with 100+ upvotes. Thanks all you people :D
***
When life starts
A Priest, a Muslim and a Rabbi are having a discussion. They are trying to determine the exact point when life starts. The Muslim argues that life starts at conception. The Priest disagrees and says that life starts at birth. The Rabbi turns to the two men and says, you are both wrong. When the dog dies and the kids move out, that is when life begins.
***
Parent Teacher conference
A boy tells his father, "Dad, our math teacher is asking to see you." 

The father asks, "What happened?" 
"Well she asks me, 'how much is 7 * 9?' I answer '63' , then she asks, 'and 9 * 7?' so I ask 'what's the fucking difference?'" 
"Indeed, what is the difference?" asks the father. ''Sure, I'll go.'' 

The next day, the boy comes home from school and asks, "Dad, have you gone by the school?" 
"Not yet," the dad replies. 
The boy says, "Well when you do, come and see the gym teacher also." 
"Why?" asks the father. 
The boy answers, "Well we had a gym class today, and he asked me to raise my left arm, so I did. Then my right arm, so I raised it. Then he asked me to lift my right leg, so I did. 'Now,' he says, 'lift your left leg,' so I answer 'What, am I suppose to stand on my cock!?'" 
"Exactly," says the father. "Alright, I'll come." 

The next day, the boy asks his father, "Did you go by the school?" 
"No, not yet." 
"Don't bother, I got expelled." 
The father asks surprised, "Why did you get expelled?" 
"They summoned me to the principal's office, and there were the math teacher, the gym teacher, and the art teacher." 
"The fuck was the art teacher doing there?" the father asked. 

"That's what I said" the boy replies. 
***
A man is following the Oregon Trail. He meets a man named Terry...
"Terry? What a stupid name!"

Terry killed him.

He died from dissin' Terry.
***
A high school English teacher reminds her class of tomorrow's final exam...
She tells the class there would be no excuse for not showing up, except for serious injury or illness, or a death in the student's immediate family. A smart-ass jock in the back of the room asks, "What about extreme sexual exhaustion?" The entire class does its best to stifle their laughter and snickering. When silence is restored, the teacher smiles sympathetically at the
student, shakes her head, and sweetly says:

"That's not an excuse. You can use your other hand to take the exam."
***
A chihuahua??
Two women were walking their dogs one evening when they came across a club. One woman, having never been to a club before said she wished she could go in right now except they wouldn't let her dog in. The other woman proclaimed that was nonsense and to follow her lead. She pulled a pair of dark sunglasses out of her purse and walked up to the bouncer. They bouncer explained that they don't allow pets in the club.
"No, this is my seeing eye dog," she responded.
"A boxer?? That's unusual."
She said it was a new thing they were trying with her and then the bouncer let her in. The second woman didn't really know how to follow up with that since two blind women together trying to get into a club might be suspicious. She goes up to the bouncer anyway who tries to stop her from coming in with a pet. She also says that it's her seeing eye dog.
"A chihuahua? I've never seen one as a seeing eye dog before," the bouncer says to her.
She responds, "They gave me a fucking chihuahua????"
***
A girl climbed a tree at the back of the church
A girl climed a tree behind the church to pick fruits. While picking her fruits high above the tree a priest happens to walk by and sees the girl up above him and realized that the girl was not wearing any underwear. .
He calls the girl down and tells her that it's dangerous to climb tress and gives her $20 to buy a pair of underwear to cover herself up. 
The girl went home and informed her mother how she got the $20.
The next day, the mother went to the back of the church without an underwear and climbed the tree and waited for the priest to show up. 
The priest walks by and sees the mother in all her glory ...  calls her down, and tells her that it's dangerous to climb trees and gives her $3.
The mother then asked the priest why is only getting $3?
The priest replied that's for you to by a disposable razor ...



Go easy my first post. 


***
A teacher asks her class
A teacher asks her class, "If there are 5 birds sitting on a fence and you shoot one of them, how many will be left?" She calls on little Johnny. "None, they all fly away with the first gunshot." The teacher replies, "The correct answer is 4, but I like your thinking." Then Little Johnny says, "I have a question for YOU. There are three women sitting on a bench having ice cream. One is delicately licking the sides of the triple scoop of ice cream. The second is gobbling down the top and sucking the cone. The third is biting off the top of the ice cream. Which one is married?" The teacher, blushing a great deal, replies, "Well I suppose the one that's gobbled down the top and sucked the cone." "The correct answer is the one with the wedding ring on... but I like your thinking.
***
A man and a woman are riding next to each other in first class
The man sneezes, pulls out his wang and wipes the tip off. The woman can't believe what she just saw and decides she is hallucinating.

A few minutes pass. The man sneezes again. He pulls out his wang and wipes the tip off. The woman is about to go nuts. She can't believe that such a rude person exists. A few minutes pass. The man sneezes yet again. He takes his wang out and wipes the tip off. The woman has finally had enough.

She turns to the man and says, "Three times you've sneezed, and three times you've removed your penis from your pants to wipe it off! What the hell kind of degenerate are you?"

The man replies, "I am sorry to have disturbed you, ma'am. I have a very rare condition such that when I sneeze, I have an orgasm."

The woman then says, "Oh, how strange. What are you taking for it?"

The man looks at her and says, "Pepper."
***
The new father
A proud new father sits down with his dad to have a drink. 

"Well son, now that you have a son of your own its time I gave you something."

"Dad you dont mea-"

"Yes I do. You've earned it." Says the father as he passes a copy of '1001 Dad Jokes 5th Edition' to the son.

"Dad I dont know what to say...I'm honored."

"Hi honored," Replies the father. "I'm dad."
***
So, this guy has a 12 inch...
...cock. He's always wanted to know what it feels like to get it all the way inside a girl, but the girls he has been with have all had shallow vaginas. So, he goes to a whore house and asks the front desk manager "I'd like your 3 best and deepest girls please." The man gives him three keys, charges him $75, and points to rooms 1, 2, and 3. Inside room 1 he finds a redhead. They start going at it - 10 inches in, and he can't go any deeper. Inside room 2 he finds a brunette. He climbs on top - 11 inches in, almost there but not quite. Inside door 3 he finds a blonde. He puts himself inside her and holy shit, he's in all the way! 12 fuckin inches! He can't believe it, finally he know what it feels like! He starts to come but just then the blonde starts foaming at the mouth. He freaks out and runs out to get help. He yells for the front desk manager "Hey man! Girl in room 3 is foaming at the mouth! I think she needs help!" The manager calmly leans back and yells for his co-worker "Hey Tom, dead girl is full again."
***
A boss said to his secretary I want to have SEX with you I will make it very fast.
A boss said to his secretary I want to have SEX with you I will make it very fast.  
I'll throw $1000 on the floor, by the time you bend down to pick it I'll be done. 
She thought for a moment then called her boyfriend and told him the story.  
Her boyfriend then said to her, do it but "Ask him for $2000, pick up the money very fast he wouldn't even have enough time to undressed himself."  
So she agrees. 
Half an hour goes by, the boyfriend decides to call girlfriend, he asks, what happened?  
She responds, "The Bastard used coins I'm still picking and he is still fucking!"
***
Fuck cheesy chat-up lines, we need better break-up lines:


Hey baby, are you being followed? Because I've been seeing people behind your back.

Is it hot in here, or are you just suffocating me in this relationship?

I didn't know angels flew this close to the ground. Maybe that's because this angel's gained a little weight since we started going out.

You and me love, we're like six balls in cricket. OVER!

I'm leaving you on religious grounds. I've decided to become a Jew, and you're a fucking pig.
***
A man and a woman were...
A man and a woman were sitting beside each other in the first-class section of an airplane. The woman sneezed, took out a tissue, gently wiped her nose, then visibly shuddered for ten to fifteen seconds. 

The man went back to reading a magazine but, a few minutes later, the woman sneezed again, took a tissue, wiped her nose, then shuddered violently once more. 

Assuming the woman had a cold, the man was curious about the shuddering, but went back to his reading. A few minutes later the woman sneezed yet again and, again, took out a tissue, wiped her nose, her body shaking more than before. 

At this, the man said, "I couldn't help but notice that you've sneezed three times, wiped your nose, and the shuddered violently. Are you okay? 

"I'm sorry if I disturbed you," the woman replied, "but I have a very rare medical condition - whenever I sneeze I have an orgasm." 

"I've never heard of that condition," the man said. "Are you taking anything for it?" 

"Yes," the woman said. "Pepper."
***
How many LGBT supporters does it take to change a lightbulb?
The lightbulb is fine the way it is. Society just needs to change the way it looks at it.

Edit: Wow front page. Didn't expect this big a response.

***
I hope Rand Paul doesn't pick Scott Walker as his VP
I have a feeling Paul/Walker would crash and burn.

Edit: thanks for the gold! It's my first!
***
3 Drunk guys entered a taxi.
3 drunk guys entered a taxi. The taxi driver knew that they were drunk so he started the engine & turned it off again. Then said, "We have reached your destination". The 1st guy gave him money & the 2nd guy said "Thank you". The 3rd guy slapped the driver. The driver was shocked thinking the 3rd drunk knew what he did. But then he asked "What was that for?". The 3rd guy replied, "Control your speed next time, you nearly killed us!"
***
Drinking Again
An Irishman had been drinking at a pub all night.
The bartender finally said that the bar was closing.
So, the Irishman stood up to leave fell flat on his
face.
He tried to stand one more time; same result.
He figured he'll crawl outside and get some fresh air
and maybe that will sober him up.
Once outside, he stood up and fell on his face again.
So he decided to crawl the four blocks home.
Again, he fell flat on his face.
He crawled through the door and into his bedroom.
When he reached his bed he tried one more time to
stand up.
This time he managed to pull himself upright,
but he quickly fell right into the bed and is sound asleep
as soon as his head hit the pillow.

He was awakened the next morning
to his wife standing over him, shouting,
"SO YOU'VE BEEN DRINKING AGAIN!"

Putting on an innocent look,
and intent on bluffing it out he said,
"What makes you say that?"

"The pub just called;
you left your wheelchair there again."
***
I fucked a girl with one leg last night
Probably should have used my cock

 http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/2j7aff/z/cl9844o
***
A man goes to see his rabbi...
... "rabbi, I am very troubled. My son, he went off traveling the world, and came back a christian!" The rabbi replies, "you know, it's so strange you say that. My son also left home, and came back a christian!" The two decide to pray to God about this, and God replies, "you know, it's so strange you say that..."
***
NSFW Nearly humped a ladyboy
In Thailand and man it was so close, she looked like a lady, walked like a lady, talked like a lady, kissed like a lady.. It was only when she drove me home and reversed perfectly into my drive 1st time, I thought to myself, "hang on a fuckin minute"!
***
An old man is concerned that his wife is starting to go deaf...
The old man goes to the doctor and says, "My wife can't hear very well anymore and I am getting worried. What should I do to help her?"

The doctor thinks for a minute and says, "First we need to understand how serious the problem is. Stand 25 feet away from her and ask her a question. If she doesn't respond, walk 5 ft closer and ask again. Repeat this until she can hear you and then let me know how far away you were standing."

The man is so concerned for his wife that he agrees to do what the doctor suggested. When he gets home, he sees his wife cooking in the kitchen. He stands 25 feet from his wife and says, "What's for dinner?"

The wife does not answer and he walks closer, "What's for dinner?"

The man does this 2 more times until he is standing only 5 feet from his wife. The man is now very worried and tries one last time, "What's for dinner?"

The wife looks over and yells at him, "I HAVE TOLD YOU 4 TIMES ALREADY, WE ARE HAVING LASAGNA!"
***
A good zinger that my friend carpenter used on a doctor
So this Dr hired my friend (who's a carpenter) to do some work around the house, the doc was curiously looking over my friends shoulder as he was putting a piece of molding to cover his uneven cut. The doc said with a cavalier attitude "that's an easy way to hide your mistakes!" and without thinking, my friend replied "yeah, to hide my mistakes I don't need 6 feet of soil!"
***
Girls from England?
A guy walks into a bar and hears two women speaking in a British accent.  He asks, "Are you ladies from England?"  One says to him "No, it's Wales, you idiot!"  So, then the guy says, "Okay, sorry.   So, are you two whales from England?"
***
A redneck finds out his girlfriend is a virgin...
A redneck finds out his girlfriend is a virgin. Upon hearing this, he stands up, turns away from her, and leaves without a word.

Later, when his buddies at the bar ask what went wrong, he explains...

"If she ain't good enough for her daddy, her uncle, her brother, and her cousin, she ain't good enough for me!!"
***
One day I'll pretend to be gay. I'll make lots of female friends, gain their trust. Become their confidant, and when they least expected...BAAM!!!
I'll have sex with their boyfriends
***
An elementary teacher wanted to introduce physiological notions to her students.
She asks her class: Whoever feels stupid at times stand up! 
After a while, little Johnny stands up, grudgingly. 
The teacher asks: So Johnny, you feel stupid from time to time?
Little Johnny replies: No ma’am, it’s just painful to see you standing all alone.
***
What's the difference between a Taliban outpost and a Pakistani Elementary school?
I don't know, I just fly the drone.
***
A father put his 3 year old daughter to bed
A Father put his 3 year old daughter to bed, told her a story and listened to her prayers which ended by saying, "God bless Mommy, God bless Daddy, God bless Grandma and good-bye Grandpa."

The father asked, 'Why did you say good-bye Grandpa?'

The little girl said, "I don't know daddy, it just seemed like the thing to do."

The next day grandpa died. The father thought it was a strange coincidence.

A few months later the father put the girl to bed and listened to her prayers which went like this, "God bless Mommy, God Bless Daddy and good-bye Grandma."

The next day the grandmother died.

"Holy crap" thought the father, "this kid is in contact with the other side."

Several weeks later when the girl was going to bed the dad heard her say, "God bless Mommy and good-bye Daddy."

He practically went into shock. He couldn't sleep all night and got up at the crack of dawn to go to his office.

He was nervous as a cat all day, had lunch and watched the clock.. He figured if he could get by until midnight he would be okay. He felt safe in the office, so instead of going home at the end of the day he stayed there, drinking coffee, looking at his watch and jumping at every sound. Finally midnight arrived; he breathed a sigh of relief and went home.

When he got home his wife said, "I've never seen you work so late. What's the matter?"

He said, "I don't want to talk about it, I've just spent the worst day of my life."

She said, "You think you had a bad day, you'll never believe what happened to me. This morning my boss died in the middle of a meeting.."
***
A clearly exhausted Pao walks into a pub and orders a drink....
The bartender asks "long day?"

"No, all days are 24 hours long" Pao replies, amazed at how uneducated the bartender is.
***
A factory owner is trying to come up with innovative ideas to save money and therefor save his business from going under.
The owner calls a meeting with all of his 200 employees out on the plant floor. 
"Ok everyone, we are in deep trouble. I will give $2000 dollars to the first person that comes to me with a cost saving idea."
Immediately a guy in the front row shoots up his hand. 
Owner says "Yes, Barry. That was fast, what's your cost saving plan?"

Barry says "make it $1000". 
***
Nudist colony
Q- How can you tell the blind guy at a nudist colony?
A- It's not hard.

Q- Who is the most popular guy at the nudist colony?
A- The one carrying a cup of coffee in each hand and a dozen donuts.

Q- Who is the most popular girl at the nudist colony?
A- The one who can eat the last donut.
***
An officer, a gentleman and a penguin.
One day a man is walking down a London street when he comes across a penguin. Not sure what to do, he picks up the penguin and continues his journey. A police patrol spots the man,
"What are you doing with that penguin!?" the officer asks
"I don't know...I just found it standing in the middle of the road..." replies the man, still confused by the ordeal. 
"Then take it to the zoo!" the officer exclaims
The next day the same officer spots the same man walking around with the same penguin!
"Oi, I thought I told you to take that penguin to the zoo!"
"I did" replied the man, "we thoroughly enjoyed it, now we're off to the movies!"
***
A Catholic priest is drowning in the Ocean.
A Catholic priest is drowning in the Ocean. A lifeguard swims past and asks the priest: "Do you need help?"  
Priest replies: "Don't worry. God will save me."  
A few minutes go by and another life guard swims past. He says: "Here, grab my hand I can help you get back to shore"  
Priest replies: "Never fear, God will save me."  
A few more minutes go past and the Priest is really struggling. A fishing boat comes along and they ask: "Do you need help? Climb aboard we can help you."  
Again the priest replies: "I have faith, God will save me."


&nbsp;

Priest drowns and goes to heaven. He meets God and asks "Why God? I have been a devout Catholic why did you not save me?!"  God replies "What are you talking about I sent you two lifeguards and a boat!"

***
A dad walks by his son's bedroom...
And hears the kid praying. "God bless mommy, daddy and grandma. Tata, grandpa." The dad can't help but scratch his head. Still, he was glad his kid was praying. And so he went to bed.

The next morning, Grandpa was found dead on the floor of a heart attack. The dad is weirded out again, but decides it's just coincidence.

That night, the kid prayed again. "God bless mommy and daddy. Tata, grandma." He is a little worried, but decides to brush it off.

The next morning, grandma is dead. He is starting to freak out now, and decides to wait by the bedroom door when the kid prays again.

"God bless mommy. Tata, daddy." He absolutely flipped out, stayed awake that night and went to the doctor in the morning. When he got back, he found his wife waiting for him. And she said,

"Thank god you're here! I found the milkman dead on the porch this morning!" 
***
My friend lived in China for a long time, this was the only joke that he heard that made sense in English.
Xi went to Guangxi and spoke with the governor about the fine people of China.

The governor: Fine people...I don't know.

Xi: I will show you. Hey you! Come here! What do you do?

Farmer: I'm a farmer.

Xi: Let me ask you, if you had two houses, would you give one to the government?

Without hesitation the farmer says yes.. Xi turns to the governor who isn't convinced.

Xi asks: if you had two cars, would you give one to the government? Immediate yes from the farmer. The governor asks if he may asks a question and Xi says, of course.

Governor: if you had two cows, would you give one to the government.

Farmer: No. Never. Please don't ask.

Xi is confused: But you'd give a house and car, why not a cow?

Farmer: I *actually have* two cows.

***
A British man is visiting Australia.
The man at customs asks him

"Do you have a criminal record?"

The British man replies

"I didn't think you'd need one to get into Australia any more."
***
Prom
The "geeky" kid in the grade asked the "hot" girl to the prom. Much to his and everyone's surprise, she said yes. While there, she knows she can get him to do anything. And so upon seeing the long buffet line, she asked him to go get her a plate of food. He happily agrees, and while he's gone to get the food, she dances with her friends and has a good time. He comes back, and she thanks him, they sit down and eat together. While eating she spills some food on her shawl. She says "oh no, it's going to stain quickly unless it comes out, can you go to the bathroom and wash it for me" he does so a bit perturbed, realizing she's getting the best of him. But he decides not to argue the point, and so waits in the line at the bathroom, goes in and washes her shawl. When he comes back she says, "this food was spicy, my mouth is burning! can you go get me some punch to quench my thirst?" he does so happily because there's no punch line
***
A man doing market research for Vaseline knocked on a door...
...and was greeted by a young woman with three small children running around at her feet. He says, "I'm doing some research for Vaseline." Have you ever used the product?'

She says, "Yes. My husband and I use it all the time,"  
The researcher then asks, "And if you don't mind me asking, what do you use it for?"

"We use it for sex."

The researcher was a little taken back. "Usually people lie to me and say that they use it on a child's bicycle chain or to help with a gate hinge. But, in fact, I know that most people do use it for sex. I admire you for your honesty. Since you've been frank so far, can you tell me exactly how you use it for sex?"

The woman says, "I don't mind telling you at all...My husband and I put it on the door knob and it keeps the kids out."

And you thought it was gonna be a dirty joke.
***
A lawyer named Strange died.
His friends asked the tombstone inscriber to write "Here lies Strange, an honest man and a lawyer" on the headstone. The inscriber suggested this would confuse people, who would think three men were buried there. He suggested "Here lies a man who was both honest and a lawyer." "Whenever anyone walks by," he explained "they'll be certain to remark, 'That's Strange.'"
***
An old German man goes to confession one Sunday
An old German man goes to confession one Sunday. He enters the confession, sits down and says "Forgive me Father for I have sinned, and I want to confess". The Priest says "Well my child, what are your sins?". The old man responds "During the war I hid a young Jewish woman from the Nazis in return for sexual favours". The Priest, while surprised, says "It was a difficult time, you risked your life to help this woman despite the immoral exchange". "I understand that father" the old man says "But, do you think I should tell her the war is over?".
***
Tim is out drinking one night...
He wants to go home but is extremely drunk so he decides to walk. After two steps he falls down. He stands up, walks another two steps and falls down again. This continues all the way home where he climbs up the stairs in agony but doesn't utter a single groan since he doesn't want his wife to notice and gets into bed next to her, makes sure he didn't wake her up and sleeps.  
The next day, his wife tells him: "Tim, you moron! Didn't I tell you not to go out drinking??? You're a dead loss!" - "But how did you know?" - "You forgot your wheelchair at the bar, that's why!"
***
Magic Trick

A cruise ship hired a magician to entertain the passengers. Since the passengers changed every four or five days, the magician was able to perform the same tricks over and over. 

Unfortunately, the Captain of the ship had a parrot who sat around and watched the magician perform his tricks, over and over. Eventually, the parrot learned how the tricks were done and would interrupt the act. 

"It's in his sleeve," the parrot would say. "He switched balls." "It's in his pocket." Etc., etc. 

Naturally, the magician was quite disturbed by the parrot but could do nothing about it, since it belonged to the Captain. 

Unfortunately, the cruise ship had the misfortune of hitting an iceberg and sank to the bottom of the sea in a matter of minutes. As fate would have it, the magician and the parrot managed to grab hold of the same floating piece of furniture. 

For 3 days, neither said anything. The magician stared at the parrot and the parrot stared back. Finally, on the 4th day, the parrot cracked and said, "OK, I give up, where on Earth did you put the ship?" 

***
A British soldier meets an Australian soldier on a warzone
**British soldier**: Did you come here to die?

**Australian soldier**: Nah mate, I came here yesterday!
***
A teacher asks her class...
A teacher asks her class "if there are 5 birds sitting on a wall and you shoot one of them how many are left?" She calls on little johnny "none they all fly away at the first gunshot" the teacher replies "the correct answer is 4 but I like your thinking" then little johnny replies "now I have a question for YOU. There are 3 women sitting on a bench eating ice cream. One is delicately liking the sides of a triple scoop ice cream, the second is gobbling down the top and sucking the cone and the third is biting of the top of the ice cream. Which one is married?" The teacher blushes and replies "well I guess the one that is gobbling down top and sucking the cone" "the correct answer is the one with the wedding ring on, but I like your thinking" 

***
Two hillbillies walked into a restaurant...
While having a bite to eat, they talked about their moonshine operation.
 
Suddenly, a woman at a nearby table who is eating a sandwich, began to cough. After a minute or so, it became apparent that she was in real distress.
 
One of the hillbillies looked at her and said, "Kin ya swallar?"  The woman shook her head no.  
  
Then he asked, "Kin ya breathe?"   The woman began to turn blue and shook her head no.
 
The hillbilly walked over to the woman, lifted up her dress, yanked down her drawers, and quickly gave her right butt cheek a lick with his tongue.
 
The woman was so shocked that she had a violent spasm, and the obstruction flew out of her mouth.  As she began to breathe again, the Hillbilly walked slowly back to his table.
 
His buddy said, "Ya know, I'd heerd of that there 'Hind Lick Maneuver' but I ain't niver seed nobody do it!"
***
The Three Types of Breasts as told from father to son
A family is at the dinner table. The son asks the father, "Dad, how many kinds of boobs are there?" The father, surprised, answers, "Well, son, a woman goes through three phases. In her 20s, her breasts are like melons, round and firm. In her 30s and 40s, they are like pears, still nice, hanging a bit. After 50, they are like onions." "Onions?" the son asks. "Yes. You see them and they make you cry." This infuriates his wife and daughter. The daughter asks, "Mom, how many different kinds of penises are there?" The mother smiles and says, "Well, dear, a man also goes through three phases. In his 20s, his penis is like an oak tree, mighty and hard. In his 30s and 40s, it's like a birch, flexible but reliable. After his 50s, it's like a Christmas tree." "A Christmas tree?" the daughter asks. "Yes: Dead from the root up, and the balls are just for decoration.” 
***
I feel really bad for the Mexican Olympian disqualified from weightlifting for excessive use of protein.
They told him, "No whey, José."
***
A man goes to a zoo.......
While standing in front of the gorilla's cage, a gust of wind swept some dust into his eye. As he rubbed his eyelid, the gorilla went crazy, bent open the bars, and beat the guy senseless.


When the guy came to his senses, he reported the incident to the zookeeper. Nodding, the zookeeper explained that pulling down your eyelid means "Fuck you! " in gorilla language. The explanation didn't make the victim feel any better and he vowed revenge.


The next day he purchased two large knives, two party hats, two party horns, and a large sausage. 


Putting the sausage in his pants, he hurried to the zoo and over to the gorilla's cage, where he tossed a hat, a knife, and a party horn.


Knowing that gorillas were natural mimics, he put on a party hat. 


The gorilla looked at him, looked at the hat, and put it on. Next, he picked up his horn and blew on it. The gorilla picked up his horn and did the same. 

Then the man picked up his knife, whipped the sausage out of his pants, and sliced it in half.


The gorilla looked at the knife, looked at his own crotch, looked at the man, and pulled down his eyelid."
***
A older husband and wife are laying in bed...
...when the husband lets go a fart, and the wife says what was that?

the husband says that was a touchdown, 7-0.

about 5 minutes later the wife also lets a fart go and says its 7-7.

then a short while passes and the husband lets another ripper go and says its 14-7.

then the wife lets another one go right after that, 14-14.

then a couple minutes later the wife let a little toot go and says field-goal! 17-14.

The husband is laying there trying not to be outdone desperately trying to squeeze one out when all of a sudden he shits the bed!

The wife frantically says what was that?!?

The husband says it's half time, switch sides.
***
Owner of a wine shop...
...gets a call in the middle of the night.  

A slightly panicky voice on the other end asks, "It's kind of an emergency. When does your shop open?" He replies in an exasperated voice, "I just closed half an hour ago. So it won't open till tomorrow morning."  

Sometime later the owner is woken up with another call, " How long till you open? My need is urgent.", says the same, but slightly inebriated, voice. The slightly puzzled owner replies, "I told you, it won't open till morning."  

A few hours later, "When will your shop open?", shouts a drunk voice. The owner, now at the cusp of righteous wrath, shouts back, "You shit! I told you - in the morning! And you don't sound like you need any wine by the way your night's been going, anyway."  

A slightly puzzled, but heavily intoxicated voice replies, "I've plenty of wine. What I need is a way out from your shop."
***
My wife found me in the kitchen in the middle of the night, naked, with a pot on my head and a gun in my hand...
"What the hell are you doing?" she screamed, shocked at my appearance. 

"Quiet woman! I'm hunting decepticons!" I whispered back harshly. 

She put her hands on her hips. "You've been sleep walking again! There are no such thing as decepticons!" 

I blinked, realizing how stupid I looked. 

"I guess you're right! Man I must look like and idiot!" I said. 

She laughed.

I laughed. 

The toaster laughed. 

I shot the toaster. 

All in all, a good night.  
***
Missionaries.
A priest and a nun are traveling across the Sahara on a missionary trip when the camel they were traveling on died, falling and crushing their water supply. The priest looks at the young, attractive nun and thinks "If we are to die in the service of our lord, surely he will forgive an old man one indulgence." He looks to the nun,takes of his pants, and tells her, "I have something to show you." "My Goodness!" the young, naive nun exclaims. "What is that?" The priest responds "It's my staff of life. A man puts it inside a woman to bring life into this world." "Staff of life?" she says. "Thank God! Shove that thing up the camels ass and let's get the hell outta here!" 
***
LPT: If you ever get cold and don't have a sweater, stand in a corner for a few minutes; they're usually about 90 degrees.
( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
***
Dorm Rules
On the first day of college, the dean/principal addresses the students pointing out some of the rules. "The female dormitory will be out-of-bounds for all male students, so too the male dormitory to the female students. Anybody caught breaking this rule will be fined $20 the first time. Anybody caught breaking this rule the second time will be fined $60. Being caught a third time will incur a hefty fine of $180.  
  
ARE THERE ANY QUESTIONS?".  
  
To this, a male student in the crowd inquires: "HOW MUCH FOR A SEASON PASS?" 
***
Breastfeeding a Baby
A man was riding a bus, minding his own business, when a gorgeous woman next to him started to breastfeed her baby. 

The baby wouldn't take it, so she said: "Come on, drink it or ... I'll have to give it to this nice man here." 

Five minutes later, the baby was still not feeding, so she said, "Come on, honey. Take it or I'll give it to this nice man here." 

A few minutes later, the anxious man blurted out: "Come on, kid. Make up your mind! I was supposed to get off four stops ago!" 
***
A tourist is lost in the deepest part of the Amazon...
Once there was a tourist lost in the deepest part of the Amazon. After a few days, he finds himself suddenly surrounded by hundreds of blood-thirsty natives. He looks up to the sky and says, "Oh my God, I'm screwed!!"

All of a sudden, the sky opens up, and there is a beam of light streaming down on him, and a voice booms out, "No, you are NOT screwed. Pick up that stone at your foot, and smash it onto the skull of the chief."

So the tourist looks down, and sees the stone. He picks it up, and bashes the life out of the chief, who is standing right in front of him. The chief is down on the ground, bleeding and lifeless, with his tribesmen in shock and disbelief.

Now, the sky opens up once again, and the voice booms out... "NOW, you're screwed."
***
Scale of Justice
For three years, the young attorney had been taking his brief vacations at this country inn. The last time he'd finally managed an affair with the innkeeper's daughter. Looking forward to an exciting few days, he dragged his suitcase up the stairs of the inn, then stopped short. There sat his lover with an infant on her lap!
"Helen, why didn't you write when you learned you were pregnant?" he cried. "I would have rushed up here, we could have gotten married, and the baby would have my name!"
"Well," she said, "when my folks found out about my condition, we sat up all night talkin' and talkin' and decided it would be better to have a bastard in the family than a lawyer."

***
A sweet little girl runs out to the backyard where her father is working...
...and asks him, "Daddy, what's sex?" 

So, her father sits her down and tells her all about the birds and the bees. He tells her about conception, sexual intercourse, sperms and eggs. He tells her about puberty, menstruation, erections and wet-dreams. Then he thinks, what the hell, and goes on to tell her the whole works, thinking that to tell it all is the only way to tell the truth. 

The girl is quite awestruck with this sudden influx of bizarre new knowledge. Her father finally asks, "So what made you wish to know about sex?" 

"Oh, mommy said lunch would be ready in a couple of secs..." 
***
Breastfeeding a baby
A man was riding a bus, minding his own business, when a gorgeous woman next to him started to breastfeed her baby.

The baby wouldn't take it, so she said: "Come on, drink it or ... I'll have to give it to this nice man here."

Five minutes later, the baby was still not feeding, so she said, "Come on, honey. Take it or I'll give it to this nice man here."

A few minutes later, the anxious man blurted out: "Come on, kid. Make up your mind! I was supposed to get off four stops ago!"
***
A guilty neighbor . . .
A man received the following text from his neighbor:


I am so sorry Bob. I've been riddled with guilt and I have to confess. I have been helping myself to your wife, day and night whenever you're not around. In fact, probably more than you. I do not get it at home, but that's no excuse. I can no longer live with the guilt and I hope you will accept my sincerest apology and with my promise that it won't ever happen again.


The man, anguished and betrayed, went into his bedroom, grabbed his gun, and without a word, shot his wife and killed her.


A few moments later, a second text came in:


Damn autospell! I meant "wifi, not "wife" . . . . . 
***
So a man went to a whore house
A man visits Japan and his buddy tells him about this whore house on a corner downtown. He goes to the address, nervous he knocks on the door. 
A little eyehole opens up, "what."
The man answers "I want to get fucked"
"Slide $20 under the door."
The man slides a $20 bill under the door and waits.
After a few moments, nothing happens.
The man knocks again, angry.
"What this time" the man behind the door says.
"I said I want to get fucked!"
The man behind the door answers "Again?!"
***
A gorilla dies at the Zoo...
Just before the zoo opens. It's the only gorilla that that the zoo can afford, and it was by a large margin, the zoo's most popular attraction, so the owner goes to the former gorilla keeper and offers him an extra $300 every day if he'll put on a gorilla suit, go in the gorilla exhibit, and pretend to be a gorilla until the zoo can replace the deceased gorilla.

After a bout a week, word catches on that the gorilla has been acting more and more interesting, and people are coming in from all over the state to see the new gorilla. The zoo is getting more and more money, and due to this the former gorilla keeper asks for a raise of $200 more dollars a day to keep up the act. The zoo owner agrees, so long as the patronage keeps up.

Come another month, the interest in the gorilla has started to wear off, and the former keeper gets word. He creates an elaborate stunt to get more patrons and keep up his raise, by climbing over the enclosures fences, and climbing on top of the lions den. After dangling above the den for a good half hour, the man gets tired and slips into the den, and starts shouting "Help me! Help me I don't want to die!", Quickly a lion pounces on him and whispers in his ear "Shut the fuck up before you get us both fired!".
***
A woman is lying in bed with her lover
"You should leave, my husband can come back home any minute now."  
"Don't worry, whenever we hear the doorbell ring I will jump out of the window."  
"Are you crazy? It's 11th floor."  
"Everything is arranged. I asked my friends to stretch out and hold a big canvas for me to jump on."  
Suddenly, the doorbell rings. Without a second thought, the lover quickly jumps out of the bed and leaps through the window. The woman stands up and opens the door where she sees an impatient man standing.  
"I'm sorry, mam. Could you tell Bill that we coudn't find the canvas?"
***
A physicist, an engineer, and a statistician
A physicist, an engineer, and a statistician go on a hunting trip, they are walking through the woods when they spot a deer in a clearing. The physicist calculates the distance of the target, the velocity and drop of the bullet, adjusts his rifle and fires, missing the deer 5 feet to the left. The engineer rolls his eyes. 'You forgot to account for wind. Give it here', he snatches the rifle, licks his finger and estimates the speed and direction of the wind and fires, missing the deer 5 feet to the right. Suddenly, the statistician claps his hands and yells "We got him!"


original credit: /u/vcyias
***
An old farmer gets pulled over by a state trooper...
While the trooper is talking to him, he keeps swatting at a swarm of flies around him.

The farmer says “Having trouble with them circle flies, officer?”

The trooper says “Yeah– why do call them circle flies?”

The farmer says “Well they’re usually seen circling round the back end of horses.”

The trooper asks “Are you calling me a horse's ass?”

The farmer says “Oh no officer, I got too much respect for the police to do that. Hard to fool them circle flies though.”
***
A cop pulls over a 90 year old woman...
He exits his car and walks up to the old woman's window. 

"Do you realize how fast you were going?"

"No." She answers, looking forward, making no eye contact.

"Twice the speed limit!  Ma'am, can I see your license and registration?"

"I can't give you my license," she answers.

"Why not?"

"I don't have a license"

"What about your registration, ma'am?"

"I can't give you that, either." she responds, still looking forward.

"Well, why not?"

"This isn't my car, I stole it."

Confused now, the cop asks "Do know who owned this vehicle?  Where did you steal it from?"

"I got it from the man I killed." 

Confusion now turning to caution he asks, "And where is the man you killed?"

"I chopped him up and placed his body in the trunk."

Stunned and worried, the cop places his hand on his holster and cautiously says to the old woman, "Stay in the vehicle with your hands in view." 
 The cop then proceeds to call for back up.

Ten minutes later 5 police cars show up and the cop speaks to his senior officer. 
 
The senior officer walks up to the woman's window with his hand on his firearm and demands: "Ma'am, step out of the vehicle with your hands where I can see them!"

The woman complies without hesitation. 

"Ma'am, do you have your license and registration?"

"Sure do!  They're right here," she says as she pulls them out of her purse and hands them to the senior officer.

Confused, the senior officer continues, "Ma'am, can you open your trunk for me?"

"Sure I can!"  She walks over to the trunk and opens it.  There's nothing in there.

The senior officer steps back, perplexed.  
After a minute he finally speaks, "Ma'am, I'm confused...My officer told me that you didn't have a license, this car was stolen, AND you had a dead body in the trunk..."

With a scoff she replied, "I bet that liar said I was speeding, too!" 
***
A young Programmer and his Project Manager board a train...
A young Programmer and his Project Manager board a train headed through the mountains on its way to         Wichita. They can find no place to sit except for two seats right across the aisle from a young woman and her grandmother.     

After a while, it is obvious that the young woman and the young programmer are interested in each other, because they are giving each other looks. Soon the train passes into a tunnel and it is pitch black. There is a sound of a kiss followed by the sound of a slap. When the train emerges from the tunnel, the four sit there without saying a word. 

The grandmother is thinking to herself, "It was very brash for that young man to kiss my granddaughter, but I'm glad she slapped him." The Project manager is sitting there thinking, "I didn't know the young tech was brave enough to kiss the girl, but I sure wish she hadn't missed him when she slapped me!" The young woman was sitting and thinking, "I'm glad the guy kissed me, but I wish my grandmother had not slapped him!" The young programmer sat there with a satisfied smile on his face. 

He thought to himself, "Life is good. How often does a guy have the chance to kiss a beautiful girl and slap his Project manager all at the same time!"

Edit: Fixed wall of text.
***
Difference between I.T and management
A man flying in a hot air balloon suddenly realizes he’s lost. He reduces height and spots a man down below. He lowers the balloon further and shouts to get directions, “Excuse me, can you tell me where I am?” The man below says: “Yes. You’re in a hot air balloon, hovering 30 feet above this field.” “You must work in Information Technology,” says the balloonist. “I do” replies the man. “How did you know?” “Well,” says the balloonist, “everything you have told me is technically correct, but It’s of no use to anyone.” The man below replies, “You must work in management.” “I do,” replies the balloonist, “But how’d you know?” “Well”, says the man, “you don’t know where you are or where you’re going, but you expect me to be able to help. You’re in the same position you were before we met, but now it’s my fault.”
***
The horny man and the nun.
A man gets on a bus, and ends up sitting next to a very attractive nun. captivated by her, he asks if he can have sex with her. Naturally, she says no, and gets off the bus. The man goes to the bus driver and asks him if he knows of a way for him to have sex with the nun.

"Well," says the bus driver, "every night at 8 o'clock, she goes to the cemetery to pray for a man she once loved. If you dress up as the ghost of him, I'm sure you could convince her to have sex with you."
The man decides to try it, and transforms himself into looking like the ghost of the the man she loved. At eight, he sees the nun mourning and appears before her.

"Hello my love, I came back to see you once more and then forever i'm gone, so we should have sex before it's too late. The nun says yes, but tells him she prefers anal sex because she does't want to lose her virginity. Before you know it, they're getting down to it, having nasty, grunty, loud sex. After it's over, the man pulls off his  disguise.

"Ha, ha! I'm the man from the bus!"

"Ha, ha!" says the nun, removing her costume. "I'm the bus driver!"
***
God sees Adam in the Garden of Eden...
...and asks him how things are going with him and Eve. "Great!" Says Adam. "We just finished having sex! Sex is wonderful!" God asks, "Speaking of Eve, where is she?". To that Adam Replies "Oh, she's down at the beach washing up." God is furious. "WHAT? NOW I'LL NEVER GET THAT SMELL OFF OF THE FISH!"

***
A priest is being honored at his retirement dinner...
A Priest was being honoured at his retirement dinner after 25 years in the parish. A leading local politician and member of the congregation was chosen to make the presentation and to give a little speech at the 
dinner.
However, he was delayed, so the Priest decided to say his own few words while they waited: Thank Goodness we Catholics have a wonderful sense of humour!

“I got my first impression of the parish from the first confession I 
heard here. I thought I had been assigned to a terrible place. The 
very first person who entered my confessional told me he had stolen a television set and, when questioned by the police, was able to lie his way out of it. He had stolen money from his parents; embezzled from 
his employer; had an affair with his boss’s wife; had sex with his 
boss’s 17 year old daughter on numerous occasions, taken illegal drugs; had several homosexual affairs; was arrested several times for public nudity and gave VD to his sister in-law.

I was appalled that one person could do so many awful things. But as the days went on, I learned that my people were not all like that and I had, indeed, come to a fine parish full of good and loving people.”

Just as the Priest finished his talk, the politician arrived full of 
apologies at being late. He immediately began to make the presentation and gave his talk:

“I’ll never forget the first day our parish Priest arrived,” said the 
politician. “In fact, I had the honour of being the first person to go to him for confession.”


***
My daughter saw me eating prosciutto
True story: my daughter saw me eating prosciutto and clucked her tongue.  "I think eating prosciutto is like, the worst thing a Jew can do."

I am Jewish, so I asked, "Why is that?"

"Well, it's pork and it's expensive."
***
An Irishman is drinking whiskey at a bar...
It's closing time, and he's pretty drunk. He gets up to leave and...boom! Falls over and smacks into the floor. He tries to get up again, but only succeeds in losing his balance and falling back down. He thinks to himself "wow I'm more drunk than I thought, maybe if I could just get some fresh air and sober up a little". So he crawls his way to the door, throws it open, and crawls outside. He tries to get up again, no luck. "Ok, it's not too far, I'll just crawl home and sleep it off". So the Irishman crawls all the way home and passes out on his couch. The next morning he wakes up to his wife yelling at him "god damnet Seamus, the bar just called, you left your wheelchair there again!" 
***
Three women are going back to visit the Catholic school that they grew up in, and they find the nun who taught them as children.
"So what have you young ladies been doing with your lives?" the nun asks.

The first woman responds, "Well, I've become an engineer, I'm married and I have three kids."

The second woman says, "I've become an accountant, and I'm happily married with two children!"

The third woman slowly responds, "Well... Um, I'm... I'm a prostitute..."

"You're a WHAT???" says the nun, furiously.

"Well... I'm a prostitute."

"Oh, thank God," the nun says, "I thought you said you were a Protestant!"
***
A little kid is tossing a nickel in the air and catching it in his mouth...
The little kid says "Hey dad watch this!" and does it again. This time he actually inhales the nickel and starts choking.

The dad realizes what is happening and slaps the kid on the back trying to dislodge the nickel. Nothing. The gives the kid the Heimlich maneuver, still nothing.

In his desperation the father calls out, "Help! My son is choking on a nickel. Someone help!"

Up walks an attractive woman dressed in a business suit, brief case in hand. She reaches out and grabs the kid by the balls and gives a hard squeeze, with a cough and a spurt, out pops the nickel. Without missing a beat, she catches the nickel in mid air and pops it in her pocket.

Amazed the dad asks, "Are you a doctor? I've never seen anyone do that for a choking victim."

"No, sir." Says the attractive woman. "Im a divorce lawyer."
***
The Pope and Hillary are on the same stage in Yankee Stadium in front of a huge crowd. The Pope leans towards Hillary and said,
"Do you know that with one little wave of my hand I can make every person in this crowd go wild with joy? This joy will not be a momentary display, but will go deep into their hearts and they'll forever speak of this day and rejoice!"
     Hillary replied, "I seriously doubt that! With one little wave of your hand....Show me!"
     

So the Pope backhanded her and knocked her off the stage!
***
Jack wakes up with a huge hangover...
Jack wakes up with a huge hangover after attending his company's party. He is not normally a drinker, but the drinks didn't taste like alcohol at all. He didn't even remember how he got home from the party. As bad as he was feeling, he wondered if he did something wrong.

He forced himself to open his eyes, and the first thing he sees is a couple of aspirins next to a glass of water on the side table. And, next to them, a single red rose!!

He sits up and sees his clothing in front of him, all cleaned and pressed! He looks around the room and sees that it is in perfect order, spotlessly clean. So is the rest of the house.

He takes the aspirins, cringes when he sees a huge black eye staring back at him in the bathroom mirror. Then he notices a note hanging on the corner of the mirror written in red with little hearts on it and a kiss mark from his wife in lipstick: 'Honey, breakfast is on the stove, I left early to get groceries to make you your favorite dinner tonight. I love you, darling! Love, Jillian'

He stumbles to the kitchen and sure enough, there is hot breakfast, steaming hot coffee and the morning newspaper.

His 16 year old son is also at the table, eating. Jack asks, 'Son.what happened last night?'

'Well, you came home after 3 A.M., drunk and out of your mind you fell over the coffee table and broke it, and then you puked in the hallway, and got that black eye when you ran into the door.'
Confused, he asked his son, 'So, why is everything in such perfect order and so clean? I have a rose, and breakfast is on the table waiting for me??'

His son replies, 'Oh THAT... Mom dragged you to the bedroom, and when she tried to take your pants off, you screamed, 'Leave me alone bitch, I'm married!!'
***
3 surgeons walk into a pub...
...The first claims to be the best surgeon of Texas: "the world's best piano player lost 7 fingers in an accident. I sewed them back on and yesterday, he played a private concert for the queen of England."

The second one answeres: "That's nothing. A young man lost both arms and both legs in an accident and I sewed them back on. 2 years later, he won a gold medal at the olympic games." 

The third physician, who had been silent to this point says: "Amateurs! A couple of years ago, a young businessman overdosed on coke. He rode his horse in front of a train, tried to stop the train and was ripped into pieces. The only thing left was the man's butt and the horses forelock. I patched him up and two weeks ago, this man was sworn in as President of the United States.
***
forgive me father for i have sinned...
... "go on" says the priest.
"I swore the other day" says the man.
"continue" says the priest.
"I was on the golf course the other day and i hit my drive, it was looking perfect, heading dead straight. About 200 yards down my ball hit a power line crossing the fairway".
"and this is when you swore?" asked the priest.
"No father, my ball then ricocheted of the power lines and flew off into the deep rough" continued the man.
"this must have been when you swore?" the priest exclaimed.
"No father, not yet. As i was walking over to the rough to hit my second shot a hawk flew down from the trees, picked my ball up in his beak and proceeded to fly off with it" continued the man.
"Ahhh I see" says the priest "this must have been the point where you swore"
"Nope not yet, as the bird flew over the green the ball fell from its mouth and landed two feet from the hole"
The priest pauses for a few seconds "you missed the fucking putt didn't you?"


***
The farmer ordered a new bull
Three bulls were standing around the farm yard one day, talking about how the farmer had just bought a new bull.

The first bull, the biggest and strongest of the group, says "He's in for a surprise when he gets here. I'll be damned if he thinks he can take any of my 500 cows."

The second bull chimes in, "I know that's right. He's not touching any of my 250 cows."

The third bull, the youngest of the bunch, pipes up and says "I've only been here a year, I know I'm not as big and strong as you guys but I've earned my 10 cows and he's not getting a single one!"

About this time, a large truck pulling a trailer backs in to the ranch and begins to unload a 4,000 pound monster of a bull. He is so big that the steel ramp is bending with every step he takes.

The youngest bull begins huffing and grunting and scraping the ground with his foot. The oldest bull looks at him and says "Son, use your head. Give up a few cows and live to tell about it."

The youngest bull replies "Hell, he can have all of my cows, I'm just making sure he knows I'm a bull!"
***
A young man wants to be an actor...
...and is visiting an agent. The agent asked him all sorts of questions about what types of movies he wants to play in, his experience, and where he was from and at the end said "You sounds quite promising, I can arrange some auditions and keep you informed about whats available. What is your name?" and the young man responds "Penis van Lesbian."

At first the agent thinks he is joking, but the man is serious. The agent tells him "I think you'll need to change your name or use a stage name, no one will hire you with a name like Penis van Lesbian." Mr. Lesbian is quite perturbed and says he'll think about it.

The next day, he comes back. He tells the agent that he decided to change his name so that he could act, even though he liked his name and was quite attached to it. The producer asks him what his new name is, and he responds.

"Dick van Dyke"
***
Interesting accents!
3 hefty women walk into a restaurant, and sit down at a table. The server comes to take their drink orders. When they're done ordering he says, "What an interesting accent! Are you broads from Scotland?"

One woman looks at him with surprise and disgust and says, "WALES!"

The bartender says, "Okay, fine. Are you whales from Scotland?"
***
There are three naked men outside a Halloween party.
The one guideline to enter the party was that the person trying to get in must have a costume. Near the Halloween party, there was a trash can. None of the men had costumes, obviously, so they agreed to search through the trash can to look for anything to wear as a costume.

The first man found a bucket of red paint. He decided to cover his whole body in red paint. He walked up to the bouncer of the party. The bouncer asked "What is your costume?" The first man said "I'm anger." He was let in

The second man found a bucket of blue paint. He covered his whole body in blue paint, and walked up to the bouncer. The bouncer asked "What's your costume?" The second man replied "I'm sadness." He was also let in.

The third man found an old, rotten pear in the trash can. He couldn't find anything else worthy of putting on his body, so he jammed his dick into the pear. Confidently, he walked up to the bouncer.

The bouncer was disgusted. "What the hell is your costume supposed to be?!" He exclaimed.

The third man replied "Don't you see? I'm fucking despair."
***
A general, air marshal and admiral were arguing over whose men were the toughest.
The general says, “Alright, I’ll prove the army has the toughest men in the country. Private, get overhere!” 

The private reports as ordered, “Yes sir?”
The general says, “See that man over there? Kill him!” Without hesitating, the private kills the man. 
The general says, “See? That man has balls!” 


The air marshal says, "That’s nothing. AC, get over here!” The aircraftsman reports, “Yes, sir?” 
The air marshal says, “See that man over there? Kill him and then kill yourself.” 
Without blinking, the aircraftsman pulls out his M-16 and blows away the guy, then turns the rifle on himself and unloads several rounds. 

The air marshal says, “See? Now that man has balls!” 

The admiral says, “That’s nothing.” He calls to a seaman high up on a tower, “Hey, seaman, jump off that tower!” The seaman answers, “Excuse me, sir?” The admiral repeats, “JUMP OFF THAT TOWER!” The seaman replies, “Go to hell, sir!” 

The admiral says, “See? That man has balls and he’s got brains too!”
***
The Sexist Professor
The anthropology professor was well known for making sexist comments and jokes in class much to the dismay of the feminist female students. The women students got together outside class and decided that after the next sexist comment from the professor they would stand up and walk out of class in solidarity.
The next day the professor, while lecturing on a certain African tribe, said: " and you ladies will be glad to know that the average penis size of the tribesmen is 12 inches!"
At that moment all the women in the class stood up and began filing out. The professor then said: "Wait! Wait ladies! The next flight to Nairobi doesn't leave until tomorrow morning!"
***
Can't serve drink to the drunk...
A man, clearly the worse for drink, staggers into a bar and orders a pint.

The barman says to him "I'm afraid I can't serve you, as you are obviously drunk. Would you like me to call you a taxi?"

Mumbling something or other along the lines of "no", the man clumsily makes his way back out the door without causing any fuss.

A few minutes later, the man comes back in through the side door of the pub, and tries to order a pint.

"I'm afraid, sir, that I still cannot serve you as you are drunk," comes the reply, "are you sure you don't want me to call you a cab?"

Once again the man mutters and makes his way out through the door he came in.

Several more minutes pass, and who should come in the back door of the pub but this same boozed-up individual. This time staggers up to the bar, looks the bartender in the eyes, and a look of surprise spreads over his face.

"Jesus," he manages to say, "how many bars in this town d'you work in?"

***
Marylou
One day, as a husband was reading the Sunday paper, his wife smacked him upside the head with a frying pan. 

"What was that for?" cried the husband. 

"I was doing your laundry when I found a piece of paper with the name of Marylou on it!" screamed the wife. "Who is she? Are you cheating on me?" 

"Honey don't worry. Remember when I went to the horse race three weeks ago with my friends? Marylou was the name of the horse I was betting on. 

Satisfied, the wife continued doing the laundry. A few hours later, the wife smacked the husband with a frying pan again. 

"What was that for?" said the annoyed husband. 

"Your horse called."
***
Man and his wife are trying to spice up their marriage
So the husband comes home with a packet of flavoured condoms. He says to his wife;   
"We'll play a game. I'll turn the light off, I'll put on the condom and you try and guess the flavour".  
His wife goes down on him and after a few moments she calls out, "Cheese and Onion" as the husband responds,  
"I've not put it on yet"
***
May I have a piece of gum?
Two gay guys are in a large passenger plane flying across the Pacific. In the middle of the flight, one turns and tells his partner: "Let's have sex. Right here and now." His partner says: "Are you crazy? In front of all these people?" The first gay guy says: "Don't worry. They're all asleep. Here, see for yourself." He leans out into the aisle and yells: "Excuse me, can anybody let me have a piece of gum?" There's no answer or any kind of interest. His partner is convinced and they have sex right then and there.

The plane lands and as the passengers are disembarking there is a stewardess by the exit asking everyone if they had a good flight. One man says, "The flight was fine but I have a horrible headache". The stewardess says: "Oh you poor thing, why didn't you ask for some aspirin?" And the man says: "Are you kidding? I saw what happened to that poor guy who asked for a piece of gum."

***
Two men went to the barbers for a shave......
They were both almost done  when the barber reached for the aftershave when the first man said  “Don't put that shit on me‚ my wife will think I've been in a whore house.”
  
The other man then turned to his barber and said “ you can put it on me ‚ my wife doesn't know what the inside of a whore house smells like.”

Edit-words







***
Are you a VIRGIN?
Joe had a blind date with Maria for the prom and, as the evening progressed, he found himself more and more attracted to her.

 After some really passionate embracing, he said: "Tell me, do you object to making love?"

 "That is something I have never done before," Maria replied.

 "Never made love? You mean you are a virgin?" Joe was amazed!

 "No, silly," she giggled, "I've never objected!"
***
A boy asks his father...
"What's the difference between 'potentially' and 'reality'?"

The boy's father studies him for a moment before saying "Go ask your mother, sister, and brother if they would have sex with a Ryan Reynolds for 1 million dollars. Then come back and tell me what they said."

So the son goes off. He asks his mother, who replies "If you're father would be OK with it I would." His sister, who responded enthusiastically that she'd do it for free. And his brother who hesitantly says he would so long as nobody found out.

The boy runs back to his father and says "Dad! They all said yes. What does that mean?"

The father replies "potentially we have 3 million dollars. In reality we have two sluts and a fag."
***
The lost son
A guy was in a supermarket when he noticed an old lady following him around. Whenever he stopped, she stopped, and she also kept staring at him. She finally overtook him just before the checkout where she turned to him
and said:
"I hope I haven't made you feel
uncomfortable - it's just that you look so much like my late son."
"Oh, that's ok," he said.
"I know it's silly," she continued, "but if you called out 'Goodbye, Mother' as I leave, it would make me ever so happy." The old lady
proceeded through the checkout and as she left the supermarket, the man called out "Goodbye Mother." The old lady waved back,
and kindly smiled.
Pleased he had brought a bit of sunshine to someone's day the man went to pay for his
groceries.
"That'll be 105 dollars 35," said the clerk.
"How come?" inquired the man. "I've only bought a few things
 "Yeah, but your mother said you'd pay for her"
***
18 inch harry..
A first-time John went to a whorehouse. He entered a private room, put $50 on the table and dropped his pants.

At the sight of the man's 18-inch penis, the hooker almost fainted.

"Hold on, pal," she said. "I'll lick it, I'll suck it, but you are not sticking that in me."

The man pulled up his pants, picked up his money and said, "Screw you bitch. I can do those things myself."
***
Obama and Trump are running laps around the White House...
Obama and Trump are running laps around the White House, after three laps Trump excitedly yells "10 minutes exactly, well that has to be a new record!".

Obama says "I don't think so, Bush did 9:11".
***
Three construction workers are sitting down for lunch on the roof.....
The first construction workers says, "I swear to god if my wife packed me another bologna sandwich I'm going to kill my self by jumping off this roof." He opens his lunch and there is a bologna sandwich. He goes and jumps off the roof. 

The second construction worker says, "If my wife packed me cold pizza for lunch again I'm going to kill my self by jumping off this roof." He opens his lunch and there's cold pizza. He goes and jumps off the roof. 

The third construction worker says to himself, "If my wife packed me a fish sandwich I too will jump off this roof and kill my self." He opens his lunch and there is a fish sandwich. He follows suite and jumps off and kills himself. 

Later on the three wives meet at the cemetery after the funerals. 

The wife of the first construction worker says while crying, "If only I would have packed him a turkey sandwich he would still be here with me."

The wife of the second construction worker is also crying. "If only I would have packed him meatloaf instead he would still be here."

The third wife is just standing there looking frustrated with a more confused look. The other two look at her and ask her why she isn't crying and wishing she packed his lunch a different way. 

"Don't look at me the dumbass packs his own lunch."

***
Ok - I finally understand my life.
On the first day, God created the dog and said, "Sit all day by the door of your house and bark at anyone who comes in or walks past.  For this, I will give you a life span of twenty years."The dog said, "That's a long time to be barking.  How about only ten years and I'll give you back the other ten?"

So God agreed......
On the second day, God created the monkey and said, "Entertain people, do tricks, and make them laugh.  For this, I'll give you a twenty-year life span."

The monkey said, "Monkey tricks for twenty years?  That's a pretty long time to perform.  How about I give you back ten like the dog did?"

And God agreed......

On the third day, God created the cow and said, "You must go into the field with the farmer all day long and suffer under the sun, have calves and give milk to support the farmer's family.  For this, I will give you a life span of sixty years."

The cow said, "That's kind of a tough life you want me to live for sixty years.  How about twenty and I'll give back the other forty?"

And God agreed again......
On the fourth day, God created humans and said, "Eat, sleep, play, marry and enjoy your life.  For this, I'll give you twenty years."

But the human said, "Only twenty years?  Could you possibly give me my twenty, the forty the cow gave back, the ten the monkey gave back, and the ten the dog gave back; that makes eighty, okay?"

"Okay," said God.  "You asked for it."

So that is why for our first twenty years, we eat, sleep, play and enjoy ourselves.  For the next forty years, we slave in the sun to support our family.  For the next ten years, we do monkey tricks to entertain the grandchildren.  And for the last ten years, we sit on the front porch and bark at everyone.

Life has now been explained to you.


***
A family is at the dinner table
The son asks the father, “Dad, how many kinds of boobs are there?” The father, surprised, answers, “Well, son, a woman goes through three phases. In her 20s, a woman’s breasts are like melons, round and firm. In her 30s and 40s, they are like pears, still nice, hanging a bit. After 50, they are like onions.” “Onions?” the son asks. “Yes. You see them and they make you cry.” This infuriated his wife and daughter. The daughter asks, “Mom, how many different kinds of willies are there?” The mother smiles and says, “Well, dear, a man goes through three phases also. In his 20s, his willy is like an oak tree, mighty and hard. In his 30s and 40s, it’s like a birch, flexible but reliable. After his 50s, it’s like a Christmas tree.” “A Christmas tree?” the daughter asks. “Yes, dead from the root up and the balls are just for decoration.” - 
***
The army had to fire three of their generals..
They decided that a monetary compensation would be fitting, so they lined the three generals up and said:

"You will be paid a thousand dollars for each centimeter of distance you create from one body part to another"

The first general stretched his arms as far from each other as he possibly could, and said 
"Measure the distance from the fingertips on my left hand, to the fingertips on my right hand." they paid the general and went on to the next.

The second general stretched his arms as far above his head as possible and said 
"Measure the distance from the tip of my fingers to the tip of my toes" he was paid, and left with even more money than the first general.

They got to the final general, who promptly said 
"I want you to measure the distance from my left nut to my right nut"
The soldier with the measuring tape didn't understand what was happening but did as he was told. A few moments later the confused soldier said "Sir, i don't understand. I can only see your right nut"

The general said with a big smile on his face:
 "I know, i lost my left nut in 'nam" 
***
A 54 year old woman had a heart attack and was taken to the hospital.
While on the operating table she had a near death experience. Seeing God she asked 'Is my time up?' God said, 'No, you have another 43 years, 2 months and 8 days to live.'

Upon recovery, the woman decided to stay in the hospital and have a face-lift, liposuction, breast implants and a tummy tuck. She even had someone come in and change her hair color and brighten her teeth! Since she had so much more time to live, she figured she might as well make the most of it. After her last operation, she was released from the hospital.

While crossing the street on her way home, she was killed by an ambulance. Arriving in front of God, she demanded, 'I thought you said I had another 43 years? Why didn't you pull me from out of the path of the ambulance?'




God replied: 'I didn't recognize you.'
***
Heisenberg, Schrodinger and Ohm are in a car
They get pulled over. Heisenberg is driving and the cop asks him "Do you know how fast you were going?"

"No, but I know exactly where I am" Heisenberg replies.

The cop says "You were doing 55 in a 35." Heisenberg throws up his hands and shouts "Great! Now I'm lost!"

The cop thinks this is suspicious and orders him to pop open the trunk. He checks it out and says "Do you know you have a dead cat back here?"

"We do now, asshole!" shouts Schrodinger.

The cop moves to arrest them. Ohm resists.
***
Two guys wanna go out and get real hammered, but they only have $1
So, they go to a 7-11, buy a sausage and decide to have some fun. They go into the first bar and order a pint each. Just before they're done the pints and haven't paid yet (on a tab I guess), the one guy takes the sausage puts it between his legs, and the other guy bends down and begins to suck on it. Of course, the bartender thinks something else is going on, so he kicks them out, forgetting that they haven't paid yet. 

These two young men end up doing this at around 15 more bars and are totally drunk. The one guy says "My back is soooo sore from bendin over so much." 

The second guy then says "Well you think that's bad? I lost the sausage around 7 bars ago!"
***
Four men are waiting for their wives in a marital ward.
edit: maternity ward, sorry my vocab is crap

They're all very anxious about becoming a father. After waiting some time, the doctor appears and congratulates the first man. 

"Congratulations, your wife had twins!"

The man was relieved, but was a bit surprised. "What a coincidence," he told the doctor. "I work for the Minnesota Twins!" 

Some time later again, the doctor comes out and congratulates the second man.

"Congratulations, your wife had triplets!"

The second man was even more surprised. "That's funny. I work for the 3M tape company!"

After waiting another long while, the third man received his results. 

"Congratulations, your wife had quadruplets!" 

"Wow! I work for the Four Seasons hotel! That's interesting."

After waiting enough time, the fourth man gets up and starts to leave. The doctor stops him before he can make it out the door.

"Where are you going?" the doctor asks.
 
"I'm going to rent a van," the man replies.

"Why?"

"'Cause I work for 7-Up."
***
Who is calling?
The phone rang at the motor pool and an authoritative voice demanded to know how many vehicles were operational. 

Paddy answered, "We've got twelve trucks, ten utilities, three staff cars and that Bentley the fat-arsed colonel swanks around in." 

There was a stony silence for a second or two. 

''Do you know who you are speaking to?''

''No,'' said Paddy. 

''It is the so-called fat-arsed colonel you so insubordinately referred to.'' 

''Well, do you know who you are talking to?'' asked paddy

''No,'' roared the colonel. 

''Well thank goodness for that,'' said paddy and hung up the phone.
***
tiny pianist
An oldie, but goodie:

A man walks into a bar and sees a 12 inch pianist playing the piano.  He talks to the bartender and says, "That's amazing! Where did you find a 12 inch pianist?"

The bartender replies, "Oh, I have a genie in the back room who grants wishes.  Give it a try if you want."

The man goes to the genie and says, "Oh genie, I wish I had a 100 million bucks."  The genie nods his head and a few seconds later there's a puff of smoke and 100 million ducks fly over the man's head.

The man goes back to the bartender and complains, "I wished for 100 million bucks, not 100 million ducks!"

And the bartender says, "Do you really think I wished for a 12 inch pianist?"
***
Heard this one from a scientist last night
Two scientists walk into a bar:

“I’ll have an H2O.”

“I’ll have an H2O, too.”

The bartender gives them both water because he is able to distinguish the boundary tones that dictate the grammatical function of homonyms in coda position as well as pragmatic context.
***
A British man is visiting Australia.
The man at customs asks him
"Do you have a criminal record?"
The British man replies
"I didn't think you'd need one to get into Australia any more."
***
An old Sergeant Major
A crusty old Marine Sergeant Major found himself at a gala event hosted by a local liberal arts college. 

There was no shortage of extremely young idealistic ladies in attendance, one of whom approached the Sergeant Major for conversation.

"Excuse me, Sergeant Major, but you seem to be a very serious man. Is something bothering you?"

"Negative, ma'am. Just serious by nature."

The young lady looked at his awards and decorations and said, "It looks like you have seen a lot of action."

"Yes, ma'am, a lot of action."

The young

lady, tiring of trying to start up a conversation, said, "You know, you should

lighten up. Relax and enjoy yourself."

The Sergeant Major just stared at her in his serious manner.

Finally the young lady said, "You know, I hope you don't take this the wrong way, but when is the last time you had sex?"

"1955, ma'am."

"Well, there you are. No wonder you're so serious. You really need to chill out! I mean, no sex since 1955! She took his hand and led him to a private room where she proceeded to "relax" him several times.

Afterwards, panting for breath, she leaned against his bare chest and said, "Wow, you sure didn't forget much since 1955."

The Sergeant Major said, after glancing at his watch, "I hope not; it's only 2130 now."
***
A guy with a Speech impediment walks into a jeweller's
And asks for a cock. 

The jeweller thinks for a moment and asks "You mean a clock?". 

The man replies "That's what I said", and buys the clock, and leaves to continue shopping.  

He's now getting a little hungry so he walks into a bakers. 

The man asks for a bum. 

The baker, a little confused, thinks for a moment and asks "Do you mean a bun?". 

The man replies "That's what I said.". 

The man gets his bun and leaves the bakers. 

He then goes to a train station and asks for a licket. 

The assistant is confused until the man points to what he wants. 

The assistant replies "Ah, you want a Ticket." 

The man buys the Train Ticket and continues on to the Train Platform to wait for his Train

A Women walks up to him and asks "Do you have the time?"

The man replies, "Of course. Just hold my bum and licket while I get my cock out."
***
Black Testicles
Black Testicles
A male patient is lying in bed in the hospital, wearing an oxygen 
mask over his mouth and nose, still heavily sedated from a difficult 
four hour, surgical procedure.
A young student nurse appears to give him a partial sponge bath.
'Nurse', he mumbles, from behind the mask 'Are my testicles black?'
Embarrassed, the young nurse replies 'I don't know, Sir. I'm only 
here to wash your upper body and feet.'
He struggles to ask again, 'Nurse, are my testicles black?'
Concerned that he may elevate his vitals from worry about his 
testicles, she overcomes her embarrassment and sheepishly pulls back the covers. She raises his gown, holds his p*nis in one hand and his testicles in the other, lifting and moving them around.
Then, she takes a close look and says, 'There's nothing wrong with 
them, Sir !!'
The man pulls off his oxygen mask, smiles at her and says very 
slowly, 'Thank you very much. That was wonderful, but listen very, 
very closely......
' A r e - m y - t e s t - r e s u l t s - b a c k ‘
***
A 7 year old and a 5 year old are upstairs in their bedroom
'You know what?' says the 7 year old, 'I think it's about time we started swearing.'

The 5 year old nods his head in approval, so the 7 year old says, 

'When we go downstairs for breakfast I'm gonna swear first, then you swear after me, ok?'

'Ok' the 5 year old, agrees with enthusiasm. 

The mother walks into the kitchen and asks the 7 year old what he wants for breakfast. 

'Shit mom, I don't know, I suppose I'll have some Fruit Loops '

WHACK...she spanks him

He flew out of his chair, tumbled across the kitchen floor, got up, and ran upstairs crying his eyes out. 

She looked at the 5 year old and asked with a stern voice, 'And what do YOU want for breakfast, young man?' 

'I don't know mom, but it won't be fucking Fruit Loops'
***
Why hasn't Africa ever won Olympic gold in basketball?
Because Africa isn't a country.
***
Doctor has a point.
A Lexus mechanic was removing a cylinder head from the motor of a LS460 when he spotted
a well-known cardiologist in his shop.
 
The cardiologist was there waiting for the service manager to come and take a look at his car
when the mechanic shouted across the garage,
"Hey Doc, want to take a look at this?"
 
The cardiologist, a bit surprised walked over to where the mechanic was working.
 
The mechanic straightened up, wiped his hands on a rag and asked,
"So Doc, look at this engine. I opened its heart, took the valves out, repaired or replaced anything damaged,
and then put everything back in, and when I finished, it worked just like new.
So how is it that I make $48,000 a year and you make $1.7M when you and I are doing
basically the same work?
 
The cardiologist paused, leaned over, and then whispered to the mechanic.
 
"Try doing it with the engine running."

***
A man is driving down the road and his car breaks down near a monastery.
He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, "My car broke down. Do you think I could stay the night?"

The monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car. As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a beautiful sound. A sound unlike anything he's ever heard before. The Sirens that nearly seduced Odysseus into crashing his ship comes to his mind. He doesn't sleep that night. He tosses and turns trying to figure out what could possibly be making such a seductive sound.

The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk." Distraught, the man is forced to leave.

Years later, after never being able to forget that sound, the man goes back to the monastery and pleads for the answer again.

The monks reply, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk."
The man says, "If the only way I can find out what is making that beautiful sound is to become a monk, then please, make me a monk."

The monks reply, "You must travel the earth and tell us how many blades of grass there are and the exact number of grains of sand. When you find these answers, you will have become a monk."

The man sets about his task. 

After years of searching he returns as a gray-haired old man and knocks on the door of the monastery. A monk answers. He is taken before a gathering of all the monks.

"In my quest to find what makes that beautiful sound, I traveled the earth and have found what you asked for: By design, the world is in a state of perpetual change. Only God knows what you ask. All a man can know is himself, and only then if he is honest and reflective and willing to strip away self deception."

The monks reply, "Congratulations. You have become a monk. We shall now show you the way to the mystery of the sacred sound."

The monks lead the man to a wooden door, where the head monk says, "The sound is beyond that door."

The monks give him the key, and he opens the door. Behind the wooden door is another door made of stone. The man is given the key to the stone door and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby. And so it went that he needed keys to doors of emerald, pearl and diamond.

Finally, they come to a door made of solid gold. The sound has become very clear and definite. The monks say, "This is the last key to the last door."

The man is apprehensive to no end. His life's wish is behind that door!
With trembling hands, he unlocks the door, turns the knob, and slowly pushes the door open. Falling to his knees, he is utterly amazed to discover the source of that haunting and seductive sound......

...

...

...

...

...

...

...

But, of course, I can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk.
***
are you sure I'm drunk?
A completely inebriated man was stumbling down the street with one foot on the curb and one foot in the gutter. 

A cop pulled up and said, "I've got to take you in pal. You're obviously drunk." 

The wasted man asked, "Officer, are you absolutely sure I'm drunk?" 

"Yeah buddy, I'm sure," said the cop, "Let's go." 

Breathing a sigh of relief, the wino said, "Thank goodness. I thought I was crippled."
***
A little Johnny...
One day in math class little Johnny's teacher asked him to look out the window, where three birds were sitting on a fence.  She then asks "Johnny, if I shoot one of those birds how many are left?"  Johnny replies "None, they would all have flown away when they heard the gun shot."  The teacher smiles and says "The correct answer was two, but I like the way you think."  

Johnny looks at the teacher and says "I have a question for you."  "There are three women in an ice cream shop and they all have an ice cream cone, one is licking it, one is biting it, and one is sucking it, which one is married?"  The teach thinks about it a bit and says "The one sucking it."  Johnny looks at her and say "The right answer was the one wearing the wedding ring, but I like the way you think."
***
I walked in to a supermarket today and noticed an attractive woman waving at me...
She said hello and I was rather taken aback because I couldn't place where I knew  her from.

So I asked, "Do you know me?"

To which she replied, "I think you’re the father of one of my kids."

Now. my mind traveled back to the only time I have ever been unfaithful to my wife and I said, "My God, are you the stripper from my bachelor party that I made love to on the pool table with all my buddies watching while your partner whipped my butt with wet celery?"

She looks into my eyes and said  calmly, "No, I’m your son’s teacher."
***
A lady walks into a pet store...
She sees a beautiful parrot with a sign on its cage: $10 OBO
The lady asks the pet shop owner, "Why so cheap?" The owner says "This bird used to live in a brothel, so he says a lot of inappropriate things." The lady can't pass up the deal and decides to get the bird anyway. 
She gets the bird home and the first thing the bird says is "Finally cleaned up this dump, and the new madam isn't bad looking." The lady finds it amusing. 
Her two teen daughters get home and the bird says "New whores in the house, business will be booming tonight." The girls are shocked but laugh it off. 
A few hours later the woman's husband gets home and the bird says "Hey Jim."
***
The FBI had an open position for an assassin.
After all the background checks, interviews and testing were completed, they had narrowed the field down to 3 possible agents. For the final test, the FBI agents took one of the men to a large metal door and handed him a gun. "We must know that you will follow your instructions no matter what the circumstances."

Inside the room you will find your wife sitting in a chair... we need you to kill her. The man said, "You can't be serious. I could never shoot my wife."' The agent said, "Then you're not the right man for this job. Take your wife and go home."

The second man was given the same instructions. He took the gun and went into the room. All was quiet for about 5 minutes. The man came out with tears in his eyes, "I tried, but I can't kill my wife." The agent said, "You don't have what it takes. Take your wife home."

Finally, the last man was given the same instructions, to kill his wife. He took the gun and went into the room. Shots were heard, one after another. They heard screaming, crashing, banging on the walls. After a few minutes, all was quiet. The door opened slowly and there stood the man, wiping the sweat from his brow. "Some idiot loaded the gun with blanks' he said. 'I had to strangle that bitch to death."
***
A drill sergeant and his cadet..
A drill sergeant had just chewed out one of his cadets. As he was walking away, he turned to the cadet and said, "I guess when I die you'll come and dance on my grave." The cadet replied, "Not me, Sarge...no sir! I promised myself that when I got out of the Army I'd never stand in another line!"
***
There are 500 bricks on a plane...
- There are 500 bricks on a plane. One falls off. How many are left?

499

- What are the three steps to putting an elephant in a refrigerator?

Open fridge, put elephant in, close fridge

- What are the four steps to putting a giraffe in a refrigerator?

Open fridge, take elephant out, put giraffe in, close fridge

- The Lion king is having a birthday party. All the animals attend but one. Which animal is it and why?

Giraffe. He's stuck in a refrigerator.

- Sally wants to cross an alligator infested river. There is no bridge and the only way she can get across is by swimming. She swims across and makes it to the other side safely. Why?

The alligators are all at the birthday party.

- Sally dies anyways. Why?

She got hit in the head by a flying brick
***
A women was in bed with her lover...
when she heard her husband opening the front door. 

"Hurry!" she said, "Stand in the corner." 

She quickly rubbed baby oil all over him and then she dusted him with talcum powder. 'Don't move until I tell you to." she said, "Just pretend you're a statue."

"What's this, honey" the husband inquired as he entered the room.

"Oh, it's just a statue," she replied nonchalantly. "The Joneses bought one for their bedroom. I liked it so much, I got one for us too."

No more was said about the statue, not even later that night when they went to bed. 

Around 2 in the morning, the husband got out of bed went to the kitchen and returned with a sandwich and a glass of milk.

"Here," he said to the statue, "eat something. I stood like an idiot at the Joneses for 2 days, and nobody offered me as much as a glass of water."  
***
A man buys a parrot...
And after bringing it home, he discovers it has the filthiest mouth. It constantly swears, racial epithets, dirty jokes, the whole lot! It embarrasses the man to no end. He keeps trying to train the bird, but it doesn't listen, just cackles back at him.

In a rage, he finally throws the bird in the freezer and closes the door. The bird squawks once, then goes very quiet. The man waits a minute, then opens the door. The bird looks sorry, so he puts it back in the cage.

"I'm terribly sorry for my earlier behavior, I assure you that I won't be speaking as such anymore," the bird apologizes. "On a related note, what did the chicken do?"
***
A guy stuck his head into a barbershop and.....
A guy stuck his head into a barbershop and asked, "How long before I can get a haircut?"
The barber looked around the shop full of customers and said, "About 2 hours."
The guy left.
A few days later, the same guy stuck his head in the door and asked, "How long before I can get a haircut?"
The barber looked around at the shop and said, "About 3 hours."
The guy left.

A week later, the same guy stuck his head in the shop and asked, "How long before I can get a haircut?"
The barber looked around the shop and said, "About an hour and a half."
The guy left.

The barber turned to his friend and said, "Hey, Bob, do me a favor, follow him and see where he goes. He keeps asking how long he has to wait for a haircut, but he never comes back."
A little while later, Bob returned to the shop, laughing hysterically.
The barber asked, "So, where does he go when he leaves?"
Bob looked up, wiped the tears from his eyes and said, "Your house!"
***
A doctor had sex...
A doctor had sex with one of his female patients and felt guilty all day long. 

No matter how much he tried to forget about it, he just couldn't.

The guilt and sense of betrayal of his patient were overwhelming. 

But every once in a while he'd hear an internal, reassuring voice in his head that said: "Don't worry about it. You aren't the first medical practitioner to have sex with one of his patients and you won't be the last. And you're single. Just let it go."

But, invariably, another voice in his head would bring him back to reality, whispering...

"You're a veterinarian, you sick sex fiend."
***
A Texan says to a Harvard student...
Texan: where are ya from?

Harvard Student: well, where *i'm* from, we don't end sentences with prepositions.

Texan: oh, alright. where are ya from, jackass?
***
If you loiter in a Tibetan spiritual leaders sandwich shop every day, then...
... you dilly dally in the Dalai's deli daily.
***
A kid asks his dad, "what's the difference between 'realistically' and 'potentially'"?
His dad responds, "realistically you've heard this joke before, potentially, you will hear it again".
***
Two white gay guys are walking on a beach...
when one of them trips over a shiny lamp buried in the sand. One picks it up and rubs it, and a genie pops out. "I will grant you three wishes" says the genie. They decide not to use them right away, and to save them for a rainy day. About one year later, they decide they've waited long enough, so they summon the genie and wish for a luxurious, 10 bedroom mansion. Around 2 years later, it burns down. They're devastated, but then they think, well we're back where we were, no use in wasting another wish. 1 more year goes by and they decide to treat themselves. They summon the genie and wish for a Lamborghini. Two months later it gets stolen, but like before they decide to break even and to save their last wish. Then, one day, the KKK busts open their door, takes them to the tree in their backyard and puts a noose on each of them. They're getting ready for death when one guy says, "hey, I think that last wish would sure come in handy!" The other guy gets a nervous look on his face and says "well, you see, I kinda already used it..." "WAIT, WHAT?!" "Yeah uh, I wished we were hung like black men"

EDIT: I FUCKING FIXED THE THEY'RE's, SHUT UP!
***
5 Jokes about Boiling Water
1. Perhaps I shouldn't joke on here about boiling water, it might be too steamy.
2. RIP Boiling Water. You will be mist.
3. How do you make holy water? You boil the hell out of it.
4. What do you get when your pour boiling water down a rabbit hole? Hot cross bunnies
5. One cannibal says to the other cannibal "hey I ate a missionary the other day and he gave me an upset stomach." The second cannibal says "That's too bad. How'd you cook him?" The first cannibal says "Oh, I threw him in the giant pot of boiling water like always." The second cannibal says "Makes sense. And what did he look like?" The first cannibal says "The usual. Brown robe, rope belt, sandals." And the second cannibal says "Well there's your problem. You boiled him, and he was a friar."

Bonus Related Joke: How does Moses make his tea? Hebrews it.
***
Two lesbians named Rachel walk in to a bakery...
To buy a cake for their upcoming wedding. After learning that the cake will be for their own wedding, the baker refuses service. Offended, the couple can't believe the guy is so opposed to gay marriage that he won't even bake a cake. The baker replies, "No no I'm fine with gay marriage-- I just can't support inter-Rachel marriage."  

  
(posted before but I felt it was an appropriate time for it to rerun.)
***
A man walks into a bar with his pet monkey
A guy walks into a bar with his pet monkey. He orders a drink, and while he's drinking, the monkey jumps all over the place, eating everything behind the bar. Then the monkey jumps on to the pool table and swallows a billiard ball.

The bartender screams at the guy, "Your monkey just ate the cue ball off my pool table -- whole!"

"Sorry," replied the guy. "He eats everything in sight, the little bastard. I'll pay for everything."

The man finishes his drink, pays and leaves.

Two weeks later, he's in the bar with his pet monkey, again. He orders a drink, and the monkey starts running around the bar. The monkey finds a maraschino cherry on the bar. He grabs it, sticks it up his ass, pulls it out and eats it.

The bartender is disgusted. "Did you see what your monkey did now?" he asks.

"Yeah," replies the guy. "He still eats everything in sight, but ever since he swallowed that cue ball, he measures stuff first."
***
A British man visits Australia
A British man visits Australia. The customs officer asks "Do you have a previous criminal history?"

The visitor replies "I didn't realize that was still a requirement"
***
There's a support group for people addicted to plastic surgery...
The head of the group walks in and says, "I'm seeing a lot of new faces this week, and I have to say I'm pretty disappointed."

Edit: Wow, thanks guys. This made me win a bet with my friend to see who could get frontpaged first :D

Edit #2: I just won $1, lol.

Edit #3: We made the bet On Friday the 14th, and this is my first post since the bet had begun.
***
A taxi passenger taps the driver on the shoulder to...
A taxi passenger taps the driver on the shoulder to ask him a question. The driver screams, loses control of the car, nearly hits a bus, goes up on the footpath, and stops centimeters from a shop window. For a second, everything goes quiet in the cab, then the driver says, "Look mate, don't ever do that again. You scared the daylights out of me!" The passenger apologizes and says, "I didn't realize that a little tap would scare you so much.” The driver replies, "Sorry, it's not really your fault. Today is my first day as a cab driver. I've been driving a funeral van for the last 25 years."
***
The boy went to say his nightly prayers....
His father listened from the door as the boy said "God bless mommy, God bless Daddy, God Bless Grandma, goodbye grandpa"
The next day the family awoke to found the grandpa dead, but brushed it off as an awful coincidence.
A few days go by and the boy is saying his prayer "God bless mommy, God bless Daddy, goodbye Grandma."
Sure enough the next day she is dead, and the father is starting to really freak out.
A week goes by and the boy is saying his prayers "God bless mommy, goodbye Daddy"
The next day the father wakes up, goes to work, and stresses the entire day about his fate. When he gets home he is upset and wants to console with his wife. She is also upset and he asks what wrong.
She says "You'll never believe what happened today the mailman came to deliver the mail and dropped dead right on the doorstep"
***
Little bit of dark humour for you!
The FBI had an open position for an assassin. After all the background checks, interviews and testing were completed, they had narrowed the field down to 3 possible agents. For the final test, the FBI agents took one of the men to a large metal door and handed him a gun. 'We must know that you will follow your instructions no matter what the circumstances.'  Inside the room you will find your wife sitting in a chair... we need you to kill her' The man said, 'You can't be serious. I could never shoot my wife.' The agent said, 'Then you're not the right man for this job. Take your wife and go home.'  The second man was given the same instructions. He took the gun and went into the room. All was quiet for about 5 minutes. The man came out with tears in his eyes, 'I tried, but I can't kill my wife.' The agent said, 'You don't have what it takes. Take your wife home.'  Finally, the last man was given the same instructions, to kill his wife. He took the gun and went into the room. Shots were heard, one after another. They heard screaming, crashing, banging on the walls. After a few minutes, all was quiet. The door opened slowly and there stood the man, wiping the sweat from his brow. 'Some idiot loaded the gun with blanks' he said. 'I had to strangle that bitch to death'.
***
A black man is driving his Mercedes when he gets pulled over by a cop.
The cop asks him for his license and regristration and begins to question him about his car. "Where'd you get the money to buy such a nice Benz?" The man replies, "I'm a specialty surgeon, I enlarge assholes." Skeptical, the officer asks more about the procedure. The man explains, "First you work a finger in, then two, three, until you can get your whole hand in...then you do the other and slowly pull and work the rim until you can get a foot in for more leverage, then both feet and pull and stretch it until it's about 6'. The cop asks, "What the hell do you do with a 6 foot asshole?" The black man replies, "Give it a badge and a radar gun".
***
Kinda scared for 2017
Because 2+0+1+7 is 10 - the exact number of nipples Hitler would have if he had 8 more
***
A drunken man walks into a biker bar
He sits down at the bar and orders a drink, looking around, he sees 3 men sitting at a corner table, he gets up, staggers to the table, leans over, looks at the biggest,meanest one in the face and says " i went by your grandma's house today, saw her in the hallway butt naked, man, she is a fine looking woman"
The biker looks at him and doesn't say a word, his buddies are confused, because he is one bad biker and would fight at the drop of a hat, the drunk leans over to the table again and says "i got it on with your grandma, she is good, the best i ever had"
The biker's buddies are starting to get really mad, but the biker still says nothing
The drunk leans over to the table one more time and says " i'll tell you something else, boy, your grandma liked it"  at this point the biker stands up takes the drunk by the shoulders and says " grandpa, go home, your drunk"

Thanks for your time
***
A father buys a lie detector robot
A father buys a lie detector robot that slaps people when they lie.

He decides to test it out at dinner one night. The father asks his son what he did that afternoon.

The son says, "I did some schoolwork."

The robot slaps the son.

The son says, "Ok, Ok. I was at a friend's house watching movies."

Dad asks, "What movie did you watch?"

Son says, "Toy Story."

The robot slaps the son.

Son says, "Ok, Ok, we were watching porn."

Dad says, "What? At your age I didn't even know what porn was."

The robot slaps the father.

Mom laughs and says, "Well, he certainly is your son."

The robot slaps the mother.

Robot for sale.
***
An office girl complains about sore throat to a coworker...
she says she's not feeling well and wants to go home early.

Her coworker pulls her aside and says: "I'll tell you a little secret. Whenever I have a sore throat, I go home to my husband, give him a blowjob, and swallow it all. Works like magic every time!"

The next day, the girl bounces into the office, fully recovered.

"Well, did it work?"

"Yes, just like you said! It's amazing!

And by the way, I love the new drapes in your living room."
***
The blonde girl at school.
Jenny, a blonde girl came skipping home from school one day.

"Mommy, Mommy," she yelled, "we were counting today, and all the other kids could only count to four, but I counted to 10. See? 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10!"

"Very good," said her mother. "Is it because I'm blonde?" Jenny asked.

"Yes, it's because you're blonde," said the mommy.

The next day the girl came skipping home from school. "Mommy, Mommy," she yelled, "We were saying the alphabet today, and all the other kids could only say it to D, but I said it to G. See? A, B, C, D, E, F, G!"

"Very good, Jenny," said her mother. "Is it because I'm blonde, Mommy?"

"Yes, it's because you're blonde."

The next day Jenny came skipping home from school. "Mommy, Mommy," she yelled, "we were in gym class today, and when we showered, all the other girls had flat chests, but I have these!"

And she lifted her tank top to reveal a pair of 36Cs "Very good," said her embarrassed mother. "Is it because I'm blonde, mommy?"

"No Honey, it's because you're 24."
***
His wife suggested that he should see a sex therapist

Bill worked in a pickle factory. He had been employed there for a number of years when he came home one day and confess to his wife that he had a terrible compulsion. 

He had an urge to stick his penis into the pickle slicer. 

His wife suggested that he should see a sex therapist to talk about it, but Bill indicated that he'd be too embarrassed.

 He vowed to overcome the compulsion on his own. One day a few weeks later, Bill came home absolutely ashen. 

His wife could see at once that something was seriously wrong.

 "What's wrong, Bill?" she asked. "Do you remember that I told you how I had this tremendous urge to put my penis into the pickle slicer?" 

"Oh, Bill, you didn't." 


"Yes, I did." "My God, Bill, what happened?"

 "I got fired." 

"No, Bill. I mean, what happened with the pickle slicer?" "Oh, she got fired, too."
***
Thankfully no one was hurt
A man and a woman get in a terrible car wreck. 

Both of their vehicles were completely destroyed, but fortunately, no one was hurt. 

Thankful, the woman says to the man in a flirting tone, 

"We're both okay, we should celebrate." 

So the woman gets a bottle of wine out of the trunk of the smashed car, and hands it to the man with a smile. 

The man almost forgetting about the accident takes a really big drink, and hands the bottle to the woman. 

The woman closes the bottle and put it away. 

The man asks, 

"Aren't you going to take a drink?" 

And the woman replies, 

"No, I'll celebrate after the cops leave."
***
A kindergarten student told his teacher he'd found a cat...
A kindergarten student told his teacher he'd found a cat, but it was dead. "How do you know that the cat was dead?" she asked her student. "Because I pissed in its ear and it didn't move," answered the child innocently. "You did WHAT?!?!?!" the teacher yelled in shock. "You know," explained the boy, "I leaned over and went 'Pssst!' and it didn't move."
***
A horse and a chicken are playing in a meadow...
A horse and a chicken are playing in a meadow. Suddenly the horse falls into a mud hole and starts sinking. He tells the chicken to go and get the farmer to help pull him out to safety. The chicken runs to the farmer, but the farmer can't be found. 


So he drives the farmer's Mercedes back to the hole and ties some rope around the bumper. He then throws the other end of the rope to his friend and drives forward saving the horse from sinking.
A few days later, the chicken and horse are playing in the meadow again, and the chicken falls into a mud hole. The chicken tells the horse to go and get some help from the farmer. 
The horse says: "I think I can get you out." 

So he stretches over the width of the hole and says: "Grab hold of my 'thing' and pull yourself up." 

The chicken does this and is pulled to safety. Moral of the story: If you are hung like a horse, you don't need a Mercedes to pick up chicks.
***
The phone rings at FBI headquarters.
“Hello? I’m calling to report my neighbor, Clifford.  He is hiding marijuana inside his firewood!” “Thank you very much for the call, sir.” The next day, FBI agents descend on the neighbor’s house.  They search the shed where the firewood is kept.  Using axes, they bust open every piece of wood, but find no marijuana.  They swear at the neighbors and leave. The phone rings at the neighbors house.  Hey, Clifford, did the FBI come?” “Yep.” “Did they chop your firewood?” “Yep.” “Great, now it’s your turn to call.  I need my garden plowed.”﻿
***
Cheating Golfer
A married man was having an affair with his secretary.One day, their passions overcame them and they took off for her house, where they made passionate love all afternoon. Exhausted from the wild sex, they fell asleep, awakening around 8pm. As the man threw on his clothes, he told the woman to take his shoes outside and rub them through the grass and dirt. Mystified, she nonetheless complied. He slipped into his shoes and drove home."Where have you been?" demanded his wife when he entered the house."Darling, I can't lie to you. I've been having an affair with my secretary and we've been having sex all afternoon. I fell asleep and didn't wake up until eight o'clock."The wife glanced down at his shoes and said, "You lying bastard! You've been playing golf!"
***
The tale of the tortoise the snail and the slug.
A little tortoise is feeling sad because it wishes it could move faster, when he notices a snail. Feeling better about itself the tortoise offers the little snail a ride.

On the way they meet a slug, and the slug is also offered a ride.
Once on top, the slug meets the snail with bulging eyes:

"You better put your helmet back on, because this motherfucker is fucking reckless!"

Edit: Modified slightly. Thanks /u/bmacdbacks for the suggestion.
***
Two lesbians named Rachel walk in to a wedding cake shop...
To plan for their upcoming nuptials. After learning that the cake will be for their own wedding, the baker refuses service. Offended, the couple can't believe the guy is so opposed to gay marriage we won't even bake a cake. The baker replies, "No no I'm fine with gay marriage-- I just can't support inter-Rachel marriage."
***
If Adam Sandler, Rob Schneider and Dennis Dugan are in a plane and the plane crashes, who will survive?
American comedy films.
***
DISEASE
A newlywed couple on their honeymoon prepares to see each other naked for the first time.
The husband exposes his knotted and twisted feet. He explains, "I had tolio as a child."
The wife asks if he means polio. He says, "No, it only affects the toes."
He removes his pants and reveals deformed knees. He admits, "I had kneesles, too."
Finally, he pulls off his boxers. In shock, the woman gasps, "Oh no -- smallcox, too!"
***
A professor told dirty jokes in class and the women wanted to protest it.
So they decided that in the next time that the professor will start with these kind of jokes they all will leave the class as a protest.
Somehow the professor heard about the plan.
In the next lecture, in the beginning of the lecture he said: "In Sweden a prostitute makes £2000 per night."
All the women stood up and started to leave the class. So he shouted after them: "Where are you going? The plane to Sweden doesn't take off until the day after tomorrow."
***
What do a thong bikini and Donald's Trump's hair have in common.
They both barely cover the asshole. 
(gota give Seth Myer credit for this one). 
***
The homeless pianoman
On a thursday afternoon, a homeless man walks down a street and sees a "pianist wanted" sign in the window of a bar. The man goes into the bar, sits at the piano and begins to play. The owner of the bar hears the man play and is completely blown away. 

"That song is amazing, what do you call it?" the owner asks.

"Tits and ass," the homeless man says and starts to play another song. The owner, again amazed, asks the name of the new song.

"Fucking her slowly," the man answers.

"Alright," the owner says. "How about you come back tomorrow night and play here and I'll pay you, but whatever you do, do not say the names of your songs."

The next night, the homeless man is at the bar playing his first song and all the patrons love it. At the end of the song, the man stands up to take a bow and his dick is hanging out of his pants. 

"Hey," says a parton. "Do you know your dick is hanging out?"

"Know it?" The homeless man exclaims. "I wrote it!"
***
A Sadist, a masochist, a murderer..
A sadist, a masochist, a murderer, a necrophile, a zoophile and a pyromaniac are all sitting on a bench in a mental institution, bored out of their minds.
"How about having sex with a cat?" asked the zoophile.
"Let's have sex with the cat and then torture it," says the sadist.
"Let's have sex with the cat, torture it and then kill it," shouted the murderer.
"Let's have sex with the cat, torture it, kill it and then have sex with it again," said the necrophile.
"Let's have sex with the cat, torture it, kill it, have sex with it again and then burn it," said the pyromaniac.
Silence fell... then everyone turned to the masochist and asked:
"So, what's it gonna be?"
To which he replied, "meow"
***
A blond was pulled over
A blonde woman was speeding down the road in her little red sports car and was pulled over by a woman police officer who was also a blonde. The blonde cop asked to see the blonde driver's license. She dug through her purse and was getting progressively more agitated.

 "What does it look like?" she finally asked. 

The policewoman replied, "It's rectangle and it has your picture on it."

The driver finally found a rectangle  mirror in her purse, looked at it and handed it to the policewoman. 

"Here it is," she said. 

The blonde officer looked at the mirror, then handed it back saying, "Okay, you can go. I didn't realize you were a cop too."
***
Four friends spend weeks planning the perfect desert camping and riding trip.
Four friends spend weeks planning the perfect desert camping and riding trip.
  
  

Two days before the group is to leave Rob's wife puts her foot down and tells him he isn't going.
Rob's friends are very upset that he can't go, but what can they do.

  
  

Two days later the three get to the camping site only to find Rob sitting there with a tent set up, firewood gathered, and supper cooking on the fire.
  
  

"Dang man, how long you been here and how did you talk your wife into letting you go?" 
  

"Well, I've been here since yesterday. Yesterday evening I was sitting in my chair and my wife came up behind me and put her hands over my eyes and said 'guess who'?"
  
  

I pulled her hands off and she was wearing a brand new see through nightie. She took my hand and took me to our bedroom. The room had two dozen candles and rose pedals all over. 
  
  
She had on the bed, handcuffs and ropes! She told me to tie and cuff her to the bed and I did. And then she said, "now, you can do what ever you want."
  
  

So here I am.  
  
  

***
Two old guys want to get laid
So they go to a whorehouse.
The lady that runs the place doesnt want to waste hookers on them.
So she sets them up with a room with some blowup dolls.
The old guys pay the lady; get their rocks off; and start walking back to their homes.
One says to other "i think the broad i was fuckin was dead.  She was all cold a rubbery..."
The other old man replies; "really?  Because i am sure the bitch i was doodlin was a witch..."
The first old man wonders how he came to that conclusion.
"well we were gettin kinda kinky an i went and bit her neck and she farted and flew out the window."
***
A man is driving down the road......
A man is driving down the road and his car breaks down near a monastery. He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, "My car broke down. Do you think I could stay the night?"

The monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car. As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a strange sound. A sound unlike anything he's ever heard before. The Sirens that nearly seduced Odysseus into crashing his ship comes to his mind. He doesn't sleep that night. He tosses and turns trying to figure out what could possibly be making such a seductive sound.

The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk." Distraught, the man is forced to leave.

Years later, after never being able to forget that sound, the man goes back to the monastery and pleads for the answer again.

The monks reply, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk."
The man says, "If the only way I can find out what is making that beautiful sound is to become a monk, then please, make me a monk."

The monks reply, "You must travel the earth and tell us how many blades of grass there are and the exact number of grains of sand. When you find these answers, you will have become a monk."

The man sets about his task. 

After years of searching he returns as a gray-haired old man and knocks on the door of the monastery. A monk answers. He is taken before a gathering of all the monks.

"In my quest to find what makes that beautiful sound, I traveled the earth and have found what you asked for: By design, the world is in a state of perpetual change. Only God knows what you ask. All a man can know is himself, and only then if he is honest and reflective and willing to strip away self deception."

The monks reply, "Congratulations. You have become a monk. We shall now show you the way to the mystery of the sacred sound."

The monks lead the man to a wooden door, where the head monk says, "The sound is beyond that door."

The monks give him the key, and he opens the door. Behind the wooden door is another door made of stone. The man is given the key to the stone door and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby. And so it went that he needed keys to doors of emerald, pearl and diamond.

Finally, they come to a door made of solid gold. The sound has become very clear and definite. The monks say, "This is the last key to the last door."

The man is apprehensive to no end. His life's wish is behind that door!
With trembling hands, he unlocks the door, turns the knob, and slowly pushes the door open. Falling to his knees, he is utterly amazed to discover the source of that haunting and seductive sound......

...

...

...

...

...

...

...

But, of course, I can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk.
***
A father put his 3 year old daughter to bed....
A Father put his 3year old daughter to bed, told her a story and listened to her prayers which ended by saying, 
"God bless Mommy, God bless Daddy, God bless Grandma and good-bye Grandpa."

The father asked, 'Why did you say good-bye Grandpa?'

The little girl said, "I don't know daddy, it just seemed like the thing to do."

The next day grandpa died. 
The father thought it was a strange coincidence.

A few months later the father put the girl to bed and listened to her prayers which went like this, 
"God bless Mommy, God Bless Daddy and good-bye Grandma."

The next day the grandmother died.

"Holy crap" thought the father, "this kid is in contact with the other side."

Several weeks later when the girl was going to bed the dad heard her say, "God bless Mommy and good-bye Daddy."

He practically went into shock. He couldn't sleep all night and got up at the crack of dawn to go to his office. 

He was nervous as a cat all day, had lunch and watched the clock.. He figured if he could get by until midnight he would be okay. 
He felt safe in the office, so instead of going home at the end of the day he stayed there, drinking coffee, looking at his watch and jumping at every sound. Finally midnight arrived; he breathed a sigh of relief and went home.

When he got home his wife said, 
"I've never seen you work so late. What's the matter?"

He said, "I don't want to talk about it, I've just spent the worst day of my life."

She said, "You think you had a bad day, you'll never believe what happened to me. This morning my boss died in the middle of a meeting..
***
Onions and Christmas Trees
A family is at the dinner table. The son asks his father, "Dad, how many kinds of boobs are there?"  The father, surprised, answers, "Well, son, a woman goes through three phases. In her 20s, a woman's boobs are like melons, round and firm. In her 30s to 40s , they are like pears, still nice but hanging a bit.  After 50, they are like onions".
                
"Onions?"
                
"Yes, you see them and they make you cry."  This infuriated his wife and daughter, so the daughter said, "Mom, how many kinds of 'willies' are there?"
                
The mother, surprised, smiles and answers, 'Well dear, a man goes through three phases also. In his 20s, his willy is like an oak tree, mighty and hard. In his 30s and 40s, it is like a birch, flexible but reliable. After his 50s, it is like a Christmas tree".
                
"A Christmas tree?"

"Yes.   Dead from the root up and the balls are just for decoration."
***
One afternoon a lawyer was riding in his limousine...
when he saw two men along the road-side eating grass.
 
Disturbed, he ordered his driver to stop and got out to investigate.
 
He asked one man, "Why are you eating grass?"
 
"We don't have any money for food," the poor man replied. "We have to eat grass."
 
"Well, then, you can come with me to my  house and I'll feed you," the lawyer said.
 
"But sir, I have a wife and two children with  me. They are over there, under that tree."
 
"Bring them along," the lawyer replied.
 
Turning to the other poor man he stated, "You may come with us, also."

The second man, in a pitiful voice, then said, "But sir, I also have a wife and SIX children with me!"
 
"Bring them all as well," the lawyer answered.
 
They all entered the car, which was no easy task, even for a car as large as the limousine was.
 
Once under way, one of the poor fellows turned to the lawyer and said, "Sir, you are too kind."

"Thank you for taking all of us with you.
 
The lawyer replied, "Glad to do it. You'll really love my place. The grass is almost a foot high."
***
Little Billy is standing in the barn with his grandpa...
There are rabbits in the barn and their droppings are all over the floor. The boy says, "What are all these pellets on the ground, grandpa?" Grandpa says, "They're smart pills, Billy. Eat them and you'll get smarter." Little Billy liked the sound of that so he grabbed a handful off the ground and shoved them in his mouth. He immediately spit them out and said, "Ugh, those taste like crap, grandpa!" 

Grandpa says, "See you're getting smarter already."
***
An amish girl and her mom are riding home in a horse drawn carriage
Daughter: "Mom, my hands are so cold."

Mother: "Stick your hands between your legs and your body heat will keep them warm."

So the daughter does this and she is amazed how warm her hands got. So the next night she is with her boyfriend running errands:

Boyfriend: "Wow, it is cold out, my hands are so cold."

Daughter: "Stick your hands between my legs and my body heat will keep them warm."

So the boyfriend does this, then later on in the night:

Boyfriend: "It is so cold, now my nose is really cold!"

Daughter: "Stick your nose between my legs and my body heat will keep it warm."

The next morning the daughter wakes up and goes to her mother:

Daughter: "Mother, what is a penis?"

Mother: "Why are you asking such a thing for? Should i be concerned?"

Daughter: "Oh, no worries, I was just wondering. My boyfriend said last night it was cold so i told him to stick it between my legs to make it warm and wow does it make one hell of a mess when it defrosts!"
***
3 women are talking about their sex lives. One is married with kids, one is engaged and one has a friend with benefits.
The 3 women decide together to give a suprise to their partners and say they will wear the same outfit: black leather lingerie, black eye mask and high heels. After a few days they meet again and discuss to compare the results.  

The engaged girl says "well, when he got home and saw me with a black leather body, black eye mask and black high heels, he said 'you are the woman of my life, I love you' and we made love all night".  

The girl with a FWB says "well, the other day I went to his office, I was wearing a black leather body, a black eye mask, black high heels and a raincoat. When he opened the door and saw me, he didn't say a thing but we had the best sex of our lives.  

Then the married woman says "well the other night, I sent the kids to my mom's house. When he got home, I was wearing a black leather body, a black eye mask, black high heels and perfume. After getting in he saw me and asked:  



"So, what's for dinner, Batman?"


***
A janitor is cleaning the church.......
.....when suddenly the priest runs out of the confession booth.

He bumps into the janitor and tells him to cover for him because he had run to the bathroom.

Surprised, the janitor tells the priest that he doesn't know anything about confessions.

The priest hands him a sheet of paper and tells him to find the sin on the list and it will tell you how many Hail Mary's to give.

So the janitor ducks in and waits. A minute later a gentleman comes in for his confession.

He says, "I'm thinking about cheating on my wife." The janitor thinks, says it's adultery. He looks on the paper under 'impure thoughts'. That'll be two Hail Mary's

The man says, "That's not all the truth. I already have mistress." The janitor thinks again, says it's adultery and looks it up the the paper, that'll be four Hail Mary's.

Then that man says, "Still not the whole truth. It's actually another man that I'm seeing and I already gave him a blowjob." The janitor looks on the paper and can't find the word "blowjob".

He gets nervous and sticks his head out of the booth looking for help. He finally sees a little alter boy and quietly asks him, "What does the priest usually give for a blowjob?" The little alter boy looks at him and says, "Candy or an ice cream".
***
One afternoon a lawyer was riding in his limousine when he saw two men along the road-side eating grass.
Disturbed, he ordered his driver to stop and got out to investigate.

He asked one man, "Why are you eating grass?"

"We don't have any money for food," the poor man replied. "We have to eat grass."

"Well, then, you can come with me to my house and I'll feed you," the lawyer said.
"But sir, I have a wife and two children with me. They are over there, under that tree."

"Bring them along," the lawyer replied.

Turning to the other poor man he stated, "You may come with us, also."

The second man, in a pitiful voice, then said, "But sir, I also have a wife and six children with me!"

"Bring them all as well," the lawyer answered.

They all entered the car, which was no easy task, even for a car as large as the limousine.

Once under way, one of the poor fellows turned to the lawyer and said, "Sir, you are too kind. Thank you for taking all of us with you."

The lawyer replied, "Glad to do it. You'll really love my place. The grass is almost a foot high."
***
What do Americans and Putin have in common?
They'll both be nuking Turkey after Thanksgiving.
***
A Bad Day
A Bad Day

There I was is sitting at the bar staring at my drink when a large, trouble-making biker steps up next to me, grabs my drink and gulps it down in one swig.

"Well, whatcha gonna do about it?" he says, menacingly, as I burst into tears.

"Come on, man," the biker says, "I didn't think you'd CRY. I can`t stand to see a man crying."

"This is the worst day of my life," I say. "I'm a complete failure. I was late to a meeting and my boss fired me. When I went to the parking lot, I found my car had been stolen and I don't have any insurance. I left my wallet in the cab I took home. I found my old lady in bed with the gardener and then my dog bit me."

"So I came to this bar to work up the courage to put an end to it all, I buy a drink, I drop a capsule in and sit here watching the poison dissolve; then you, you jack-ass, show up and drink the whole thing! But enough about me, how's your day going?"

If you have any good ones please share :)
***
An old, blind cowboy wanders into a bar....
An old, blind cowboy wanders into an all-girl biker bar by mistake. He finds his way to a bar stool and orders some coffee. After sitting there for a while, he yells to the waiter, 

"Hey, you wanna hear a blonde joke?" 

The bar immediately falls absolutely silent. In a, very deep, husky voice, the woman next to him says, 

"Before you tell that joke, Cowboy, I think it is only fair, given that you are blind, that you should know five things:

1. The bartender is a blonde girl with a baseball bat
2. The bouncer is a blonde girl
3. I'm a 6-foot tall, 175-pound blonde woman with a black belt in karate
4. The woman sitting next to me is blonde and a professional weightlifter
5. The lady to your right is blonde and a professional wrestler

"Now, think about it seriously, Mister. Do you still wanna tell that joke?"

The blind cowboy thinks for a second, shakes his head, and mutters, "No... Not if I'm gonna have to explain it five times."
***
Call a girl beautiful 1000 times and she won't notice. Call a girl fat once and she'll never forget...
Because elephants never forget.

EDIT: To those saying this was a repost, I sincerely apologize. I honestly had never seen this joke ever and thought it was funny enough to share with the reddit community. I'm glad that a few of you got a good chuckle out of it as I did.
***
Smart Boy
In a Store a man asked for 1/2 packet of butter.

The salesperson, a young boy, said that only full packs were available in the Store,

but the man insisted on buying only 1/2.

So the boy went inside to the manager’s room and said “An idiot outside wants to buy only 1/2 pack of butter”.

To his surprise, the customer was standing right behind him..!

So the boy added immediately, “And this gentleman wants to buy the other half!!!!!!”.

After the customer left, the manager said “You have saved your position by being clever enough at the right time. Where do you come from?”

To this the boy said, “I come from Brazil. The place consists of only prostitutes and football players!!!!!”

The manager replied coldly, “My wife is also from Brazil “.

To this the boy asked excitedly, “Oh yeah? Which team does she play for?”
***
A panda walks into a restaurant, sits down, and orders a sandwich.
He eats the sandwich, pulls out a gun, and shoots the waiter dead. As the panda stands up to go, the manager shouts, "Hey! Where are you going? You just shot my waiter, and you didn't even pay for your sandwich!" "Hey, man, I'm a PANDA!" the panda shouts back. "Look it up!" The manager opens his dictionary and reads: "Panda: a tree-dwellingmammal of Asian origin, characterized by distinct black and whitecoloring. Eats shoots and leaves."
***
A guy was hunting...
.. when a very strong gust of wind blew, the gun fell over & discharged, shooting him in the genitals. 
Several hours later, lying in a hospital bed, he was approached by his doctor.

"Well, sir, I have some good news & some bad news. The good news is that you
are going to be OK. The damage was local to your groin, there was very
little internal damage, & we were able to remove all of the buckshot."

"What's the bad news?" asked the hunter.

"The bad news is that there was some pretty extensive buckshot damage done
to your willy which left quite a few holes in it. I'm going to have to refer
you to my sister."

"Well, I guess that isn't too bad," the hunter replied. "Is your sister a
plastic surgeon?"

"Not exactly answered the doctor. 
"She's a flute player in the Boston Symphony Orchestra. 
She's going to teach you where to put your fingers so you don't piss in your eye."
***
Ladies.....
Two women friends had gone for a girl's night out. 
Both were very faithful and loving wives.
 However, they had gotten over-enthusiastic on the Bacardi Breezers. Incredibly drunk, and walking home, they needed to pee, so they stopped in the cemetery. 

One of them had nothing to wipe with, so she thought she would take off her panties and use them. 

Her friend however was wearing a rather expensive pair of panties and did not want to ruin them. She was lucky enough to squat down next to a grave that had a wreath with a ribbon on it, so she proceeded to wipe with that. 

After the girls did their business, they proceeded to go home. 

The next day one of the women's husbands was concerned that his normally sweet and innocent wife was still in bed -- hung over, so he phoned the other husband and said, "These girl nights have got to stop! I'm starting to suspect the worst. My wife came home with no panties!!" 

That's nothing" said the other husband, "Mine came back with a card stuck in her ass that said..... 

"From all of us at the Fire Station. We'll never forget you"
***
What's a Freudian slip?
Two old men are playing a round of golf. One says, "in my old age, I find myself making more Freudian slips." The other says "what's a Freudian slip"?

The first man says, "is when you intend to say one thing, but actually say what you were really thinking. Like the other day, I had a new secretary, as I was leaving the office, I meant to say 'see you next time' but actually said 'knee you sex time'. It was really just embarrassing."

The other man says, "oh, yeah, I have Freudian slips all the time, then. Just this morning my wife made eggs and bacon. I meant to ask her to pass the salt, but instead I said "you bitch, you've ruined my life."
***
Little Johnny walks in on his parents having sex.....
his father sees him, but instead of saying anything, he gives Johnny a huge grin and thumbs up, then starts to really give it to the old lady. The next night, the father gets up to go to the restroom, and he hears noises coming from Johnny's room. He looks in the door, and Johnny is on top of his grandmother, really giving it to her. Johnny looks at his father, gives him a grin and says, "not so funny when it's your Mom, is it?" 
***
If Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump are in a boat and it capsizes. Who survives?
America.
***
So there's a fly...
and a gnat lands on its back.

The fly says, "is there a gnat on my back?"

The gnat says, "gnat at all."

The fly says, "that's the worst pun I've ever heard."

The gnat goes, "what do you expect, I just made it up on the fly!"
***
Where's your bin?
A man sees that his neigjhbnour doesn't have his wheeled trash bin.

"Hey bub, where's ya bin`"
"I took a little vacation for a few weeks,"
"No. I meant where's your bin?"
"Told ya, vacation, at the beach!"
"No man. Where's ya wheely bin?"
"Ok, fine! I've wheely been to jail! Happy now?"
***
First Paycheck
A young family moved into a house, next to a vacant lot.  One day a construction crew turned up to start building a house on the empty  lot. The young family's 4-year-old daughter naturally took an interest  in all the activity going on next door and spent much of each day observing the workers.
 
Eventually the construction crew, all of them "gems-in-the-rough," more or less adopted her as a kind of project mascot.

They chatted with her, let her sit with them while they had coffee and lunch breaks, and gave her little jobs to do here and there to make her feel important.
 
At the end of the first week, they even presented her with a pay  envelope containing ten dollars.
 
The little girl took this home to her mother who suggested that she take her 10 dollars "pay" she'd received to the bank the next day to start a savings account.

 When the girl and her mom  got to the bank, the teller was equally impressed & asked the little girl how she had come by her very own pay check at such a young age.
 
The little girl proudly replied, "I worked last week with a real construction crew building  the  new house next door to us."
 
"Oh my goodness" said the teller, "and will you be working on the house again this week, too?"
 
The little girl replied, "I will, if those assholes at Home Depot ever deliver the fuckin' drywall."

***
A fine-looking gentleman sat down in...
...the main dining room of an expensive restaurant. He ordered a big dinner and spent an hour enjoying himself.

After he was given the check, he summoned the headwaiter. "Ah, my friend," he said, "that was a delicious meal! Perhaps you don't remember that I was a guest at this same table just about a year ago. And at that time I couldn't pay the check, so you, sir had me thrown out in full view of all the other diners!"

"I am so sorry, sir" said the head waiter. "But, you understand-"

"Oh it's quite all right," interrupted the gentleman, "but I'm afraid I'll have to trouble you again."
***
What's Whitney Houstons's favourite type of co-ordination?

HAND-EEEEEYYYYYYYYYEEEEEEEEEEE
***
A zoophile, a necrophile, a sadist, a masochist, and a pyromaniac....
are all waiting at the bus stop for the bus to take them to the mental institution.

The zoophile says: "I'm bored. Let's fuck a cat!"

The sadist says: "Let's fuck a cat, then kill it!"

The necrophile says: "Let's fuck a cat, kill it, and then fuck it again!"

The pyromaniac says: "Let's fuck a cat, kill it, fuck it again, and then set it on fire!"

The masochist says: "Meow!"
***
Usain Bolt retires from running...
He has been bored and looking in to a new sport to take up.  He’s looking through his newspaper when he sees an advert for a new golf course in his home town.  He takes a walk down and asks the receptionist about signing up.

Usain Bolt “Hi, I’m here to see about joining your new golf course”  
Receptionist “Hmmm I’m not so sure if that would be allowed sir”
Usain Bolt “ Can I ask why?  Have you sold all memberships?”
Receptionist “I’m afraid not sir, you see the owner of the course is rather racist and he won’t allow black members.  There is another golf course just 15 minutes down the road, I’m sure you can join them”
Usain Bolt “That is horrible!  Do you know who I am?  I’m Usain Bolt!”
Receptionist “Ah ok the other course will only be 5 minutes down the road then” 

***
A blonde calls her boyfriend...
One day a man gets a call from his blond girlfriend.

"Hey Babe!"

"Listen, I need you to come over right now!  I'm doing a puzzle and I think it's supposed to be a tiger but I just can't figure it out, I've been doing it for hours..."

The boyfriend was a little confused, as she didn't seem the type to buy a puzzle... But it was clear she was upset, so he made the trip over.  He walked in to her apartment and saw her sitting on the floor, a blue box overturned and all the pieces arranged in random circles on the floor.

He looked at her for a while without saying anything, then just sighed and said, "Sweetie, lets get all these frosted flakes back in the box..."
***
A man goes into a job interview...
A man goes into a job interview, and presents himself well.

The employer is shocked at how professional he is, 

"Wow, you have an incredible resume, and present yourself fantastically, but you seem to be missing 5 years on this part of your resume. What happened there?"

The man replied "Oh that's when I went to Yale."

The employer is even more impressed. "That's great, you're hired!"

The man is super happy and says "Yay I got a yob!"
***
A Cuban, a Canadian, and a white supremacist walk into a bar.
The bartender says, "Ah, Senator Cruz, what are you having?"
***
Rich Man
A wealthy man was driving in his car when 
he saw two men along the roadside eating grass. 

Disturbed by the sight, he ordered his driver to stop and 
he got out to investigate. 
He asked one man, "Why are you eating grass?" 

"We don't have any money for food," the poor man replied. 

"We have to eat grass." 

"Well, then, you can come with me to 
my house and I'll feed you," the man said. 

"But sir, I have a wife and five children with me. 
They are over there, under that tree". 

"Bring them along," the rich man replied. Turning to the other poor man he stated, "You come with us, too." 

The second man, in a pitiful voice then said, 
"But sir, I also have a wife and seven children with me!" 

"Bring them all, as well," the man answered. 
They all entered the car, which was no easy task, 
even for a car as large as it was. 

One of the poor fellows turned to the rich man and said, 
"Sir, you are too kind. Thank you for taking all of us with you." 

The manager replied, "Glad to do it. You'll really love my place; 
the grass is almost 1 meter high!" 
***
A nun walks in to a liquor store
(this is the best joke my drunk dad ever told me)

A nun walks in to a liquor store while dressed in her habit and grabs a bottle of Jack Daniels. When she gets to the counter, the clerk looked a little more than surprised. She told him, "don't worry, it's medicinal. It's for Mother Superior's constipation". He finishes the transaction and sends her on her way. When the clerk was taking out the garbage at the end of the night, he spied the same nun behind the dumpster. The nun was drunk as a skunk, and the bottle was empty. He said to her, "I thought you told me that was for Mother Superior's constipation". She replied, "it is! When she sees me, she's gonna shit!"


***
A programmer is working on a convenience store cash register...
A programmer is working on the software for a cash register computer at a convenience store. He finally thinks he got it done and tests a few items. Scans a gallon of milk:

> $2.50

Perfect. How about this bag of beef jerky?

> $4.99

Excellent. 20 oz soda?

> $1.59

Perfect. How about this box of cigarettes?

> ERROR

Huh? Maybe try this can of snuff?

> ERROR

Shit.  
So he looks through the code again, making sure he checked every parenthesis and spelled every function correctly. He checks. Double checks. Triple checks. Finally, he sees the problem.

It was a sin tax error.
***
An elderly man in Louisiana ...
... had owned a large farm for several years. He had a large pond in the back. It was properly shaped for swimming, so he fixed it up nice with picnic tables, horseshoe courts, and some apple and peach trees.

One evening the old farmer decided to go down to the pond, as he hadn't been there for a while, and look it over. He grabbed a five-gallon bucket to bring back some fruit. As he neared the pond, he heard voices shouting and laughing with glee. As he came closer, he saw it was a bunch of young women skinny-dipping in his pond.

He made the women aware of his presence and they all went to the deep end. One of the women shouted to him, 'we're not coming out until you leave!'

The old man frowned, 'I didn't come down here to watch you ladies swim naked or make you get out of the pond naked.'

Holding the bucket up he said, 'I'm here to feed the alligator...'

Some old men can still think fast....
***
A man walks into church and sits in the confessional booth.
The priest sits down and the man says, "Forgive me for I have sinned. I was golfing yesterday and I cursed."

The priest replies, "Would you like to tell me what happened?"

"Well," the guy says. "I was out on the seventh hole, and I'd just hit my best drive of the day. Straight ahead, down the middle of the fairway, and a long way down. I was feeling pretty good about myself as I walked to the ball. I wasn't 30 feet away when a squirrel ran out of the trees and grabbed my ball."

The priest interrupts, "Oh, I see. So that's when you cursed?"

The man replies, "No Father, I didn't. As the squirrel was running away, it got to the end of the fairway when it was caught by a hawk, which flew high into the air."

Once again, he priest interrupts, "So that's when you cursed?"

The man continues, "No Father. The hawk started flying away, and I followed it, because it flew in the direction of the green. As it passed over the green, it squeezed the squirrel with its talons, causing the ball to drop about three feet from the pin."

The priest says, "Don't tell me you missed the fucking putt!"
***
Baseball in Heaven
Two old men had been best friends for years, and they both live to their early 90's, when one of them suddenly falls deathly ill. His friend comes to visit him on his deathbed, and they're reminiscing about their long friendship, when the dying man's friend asks, "Listen, when you die, do me a favor. I want to know if there's baseball in heaven." 
The dying man said, "We've been friends for years, this I'll do for you." And then he dies. 
A couple days later, his surviving friend is sleeping when he hears his friend's voice. The voice says, "I've got some good news and some bad news. The good news is that there's baseball in heaven." 
"What's the bad news?" 
"You're pitching on Wednesday." 


***
He's been playing. She's been played.
A married man was having an affair with his secretary. One afternoon, they took off for her house where they made love for hours. Exhausted from the wild sex, they feel asleep, awakening at 8:00 P.M. As the man threw on his clothes, he told the woman to take his shoes outside and rub them through the grass and dirt. Mystified, she complied. He then slipped into his shoes and drove home. 

"Where have you been?" demanded his wife when he entered the house. The man replied, "Darling, I can't lie to you. I've been having an affair with my secretary and we've been having sex all afternoon and I fell asleep." The wife glanced down at his shoes and said, "You lying bastard! You've been playing golf!!" 
***
Two elderly ladies are smoking outside...
It stared raining and one of the ladies pulls out a condom, cuts the end off and puts it over her cigarette so it won't get wet. The other lady thinks this is a great idea so she decides to head to the store to buy some condoms. 
When she gets there she goes to the counter and asks the cashier for a pack of condoms. He looks at her in disgust as he can't believe someone of her age would be having sex. He asks what kind she would like anyways as he doesn't want to lose his job. 
She replys "honey, it doesn't matter what kind as long as it fits a camel"
***
A man and his ever-nagging wife are on vacation in Jerusalem
While they were there, the wife passed away. The undertaker told the husband, "you can have her shipped home for $5,000, or you can bury her here, in the holy land, for $150. 

The man thought about it, and finally decided he would have her shipped home.

The undertaker asked, "why would you spend $5,000 to ship your wife home when you can have her burried here for so much less?"

The man replied, "Long ago, a man died here, was burried here, and three days later, he rose from the dead. I just can't take that chance."
***
A rich man on his deathbead...
calls his three lawyers in for a final consultation.  

"They say you can't take it with you, but I'm going to prove them wrong!  I'm giving you each a third of my money.  At my funeral, I want you to throw it in my grave so that it's buried with me."

After the funeral, the lawyers are gathered for a drink when one of them says "I have a confession to make.  I'm really behind on my mortgage, so I took 1/4 of the money and threw the rest of it in."

The second lawyer responds.  "I have to confess, I'm also having money problems.  My Mercedes just broke down and the repair bills are killing me.  I took half the money and threw the rest in."

The third lawyer indignantly blusters at the other two "I'm ashamed of you both ripping off an old man like that.  Why I'll have you know I threw in a check for the full amount!"
***
Pokemon GO is a blatant ripoff of another popular app...
called Tinder, where you also swipe to find monsters in your area.
***
Two Kids Walk by an Old man on his porch
Two kids walk by an old man on his porch with some duct tape in their hands. 

The old man says "what are you kids doing with the duct tape?"

The kids reply, "we are off to go catch some ducks". To which the old man replies "You will never catch any ducks with that!"

Sure enough the kids come back with several ducks. 

The next day the kids come walking by the old mans house with some chicken wire.

The old man says "What are you kids doing with the chicken wire"

The Kids reply "we are off to go catch some chickens" to which the old man replies "You cant catch chickens with chicken wire".

Sure enough the kids come back with several chickens.

The next day the kids come walking down the street with some pussy willow. 

The old man says "Let me go get my hat"



***
Four Surgeons
Four surgeons sit around discussing their favorite patients.

The first surgeon says, "I like operating on librarians. When you open them up, everything is in alphabetical order".

The second surgeon says, "I like operating on accountants. When you open them up, everything is in numerical order".

The third surgeon says, "I like operating on electricians. When you open them up, everything is color coded."

The fourth surgeon says, "I like operating on politicians."

The other three surgeons look at each other in disbelief.

The fourth surgeon continues, "Because they're heartless, gutless, spineless, and the ass and head are interchangeable."
***
Heisenberg, Schrodinger and Ohm are in a car
They get pulled over. Heisenberg is driving and the cop asks him "Do you know how fast you were going?"
"No, but I know exactly where I am" Heisenberg replies.
The cop says "You were doing 55 in a 35." Heisenberg throws up his hands and shouts "Great! Now I'm lost!"
The cop thinks this is suspicious and orders him to pop open the trunk. He checks it out and says "Do you know you have a dead cat back here?"
"We do now, asshole!" shouts Schrodinger.
The cop moves to arrest them. Ohm resists.
***
A man walks into a bar...
He sees a sign that reads, "cheese sandwich: $1.50, chicken sandwich: $2.50, hand job: $10." The man beckons to the sexy waitress and says, "are you the one who does the hand jobs?"
"Yes," she purrs, "I am."
"Well wash your freaking hands," the man says, "I want a cheese sandwich!"
***
A soldier ran up to a nun
A soldier ran up to a nun, Out of breath he asked,


"Please, may I hide under your skirt. I'll explain later."


The nun agreed. A moment later two Military Police officer ran
up and asked, "Sister, have you seen a soldier?"


The nun replied, "He went that way."


After the Military Police officers ran off, the soldier crawled out
from under her skirt and said, 'I can't thank you enough
Sister.



You see, I don't want to go to war to Iraq .



The nun said, "I understand completely." 



The soldier added, "I hope I'm not rude, but you have a
great pair of legs!"



The nun replied, "If you had looked a little higher, you
would have seen a great pair of balls....I don't want to go
to Iraq either!
***
The Italian Virginity Test ....
Mario is planning to marry and asks his family doctor how he could tell if his Bride-to-be is still a Virgin. His doctor says … “Mario, all the Italian men I know use three things for what we call a Do-It-Yourself Virginity Test Kit: a small can of Red paint, a small can of Blue paint, and a Shovel.”

Mario asks … “And what do I do with these things, doc?”

The doctor replies … “Before you climb into bed on your wedding night, you paint one of your balls Red and the other ball Blue.

If she says ‘That’s the strangest pair of balls I’ve ever seen!’, you hit her with the Shovel.

***
Starving Men On An Island
There are two starving men stranded on an island with only a rusty old knife. The first man says, “Well, I think our only choice is to eat each other's legs. We're not walking around, anyway. And we need food”. The other man agrees. So the first man begins sawing and crudely cutting the other man's legs off. I after about an hour of excruciating pain, the second man's legs are completely off of his body, so he says, “Okay, your turn. Give me the knife”. So the first jumps up and runs away with the second man's legs, saying, “You'll have to catch me first!”
***
A boy goes up to a girl and says "hey baby what's up"...
She says "I have a boyfriend", he says "I have a math test".

The girl says "What's that got to do with anything?", he replies "I thought we were just naming things we are going to cheat on."

**EDIT**: Okaaay, this is on the front page? It's a joke my friends 9 year old son told me that's so dumb it made me chuckle so I thought I'd share it. I'd never heard it before, which apparently is some kind of crime according to the comments.

Comment breakdown:

*  "This joke is so old, you're a terrible person for posting it"
*  "The way this joke really goes is something about a chicken/goldfish/Chinese apples not mattering"
*  "Why did you mark this NSFW?!" (hint: because I wanted to click the NSFW link for some reason)
*  Some stuff about my mom
*  Some comments about me being 12 (I'm 35 BTW)
***
A teacher asks her 2nd grade class...
"Who's a Trump fan?"

Not wanting to look stupid for not knowing what that meant, they all raised their hands except for Johnny. 

"And why aren't you a Trump fan?" she asked, used to Johnny always trying to be different. 

"Because I'm a Sanders fan" he replied. 

"And why are you a Sanders fan?"

"Because mommy and daddy are"

"And if mommy and daddy were idiots, what would that make you?" she asked

"A Trump fan"
***
A horse and a chicken are playing in a meadow.
The horse falls into a mud hole and starts to sink. 

He entreats the chicken to get the farmer to help pull him to safety. The chicken runs to the farm, but the farmer can't be found. So, he drives the farmer's Mercedes back to the mud hole, ties some rope around the bumper and pulls the horse to safety. 

A few days later, the chicken and the horse are playing in the meadow again, and the chicken falls into a mud hole. The chicken yells to the horse to get help from the farmer. The horse says, "Wait, I think I can stand over the hole!" So, he stretches over the width of the hole and says, "Grab my penis and pull yourself up." The chicken does and pulls himself to safety. 

The moral of the story: if you are hung like a horse, you don't need a Mercedes to pick up chicks
***
You have some explaining to do...
A married couple of 20 years were as normal as could be, bar one little quirk the husband had in the bedroom.
He'd only have sex with the lights off.
The wife assumed he merely had some shame in the penile department, but she loved him, so happily obliged. An added bonus was that it felt like he was actually reasonably well-equipped downstairs, so everything was good.
However, 20 years of blind sex took its toll on her and their relationship. In the middle of one of their love-making sessions, the wife dived for the lamp and turned on the light.
She saw her husband with his pants on and a dildo in hand.
There was a brief moment of silence, then the wife sternly stated "You have some explaining to do."
The husband looked her dead in the eye and said "I'll explain this when you explain the kids".
***
It was announced yesterday that the 2020 Summer Olympics in Tokyo will make all of its medals from recycled cellphones.
Well, they’re going to make the Olympic torch out of a Samsung Galaxy. 
***
Good animal joke
A lost dog strays into a jungle. A lion sees this from a distance and says with caution "this guy looks edible, never seen his kind before". So the lion starts rushing towards the dog with menace. The dog notices and starts to panic but as he's about to run he sees some bones next to him and gets an idea and says loudly "mmm...that was some good lion meat!". The lion abruptly stops and says " woah! This guy seems tougher then he looks, I better leave while I can". Over by the tree top, a monkey witnessed everything. Evidently, the monkey realizes the he can benefit from this situation by telling the lion and getting something in return. So the monkey proceeds to tell the lion what really happened and the lion says angrily "get on my back, we'll get him together". So they start rushing back to the dog. The dog sees them and realized what happened and starts to panic even more. He then gets another idea and shouts "where the hell is that monkey! I told him to bring me another lion an hour ago..."
***
A man confesses his sins to a priest
'Father, I'm a sinner. The other day, I went to my wife's office. There was no one around except her colleague, and I took her and raped her right on the spot.'

'Well, that wasn't very nice,' says the priest gingerly. 'What else did you do?'

'Last week I visited my wife's sister. There was no one around except her, and I took her and raped her right on the spot.'

'Oh son, that is indeed a great sin,' says the priest.

'That's all nothing, Father,' continues the man. 'The other day, my mother-in-law visited me. I was all alone at home, so I took her and raped her right on the spot as well!'

There's no answer from the other half of the confession booth. The man waits for a while, calls the priest, but he gets no reply. Finally, he opens the door of the priest's booth and sees the cleric hiding under the seat, trembling with fear.

'Father, what on earth are you doing?' asks the man.

To which the priest replies:

'Son, I just remembered... there's no one in the church except you and me...'
***
Drunk guys and a Taxi
Three drunk guys entered a taxi. The taxi driver knew that they were drunk so he started the engine & turned it off again. Then said, "We're here". The 1st guy gave him money & the 2nd guy said "Thank you". The 3rd guy slapped the driver. The driver was shocked thinking the 3rd drunk knew what he did. But then he asked "What was that for?". The 3rd guy replied, "Slow the hell down next time, you nearly killed us!"

***
A charitable organization noticed that the richest man in town had never donated.
A representative of the organization called the man.  "Our research shows that you make millions of dollars a year, and we were wondering if you'd like to donate some amount to help those in need."

The man responded, "Did your research show you that my mother is suffering from a chronic illness, and cannot afford her medical bills?"

"Erm, no..."

"Did your research take into account my sister, whose husband died and was left broke with four children and no job?" the man said.

"I'm so sorry..." the rep began but was abruptly cut off

"Or perhaps my brother, who is a disabled veteran and is confined to a wheelchair, and long wait lists at the VA just to see a doctor?"

The representative was speechless.

Then the man said, "And I don't give any money to them, so why the hell should I give any money to you?"
***
A professor told dirty jokes in class and the women wanted to protest it.
So they decided that in the next time that the professor will start with these kind of jokes they all will leave the class as a protest.

Somehow the professor heard about the plan.

In the next lecture, in the beginning of the lecture he said: "In Sweden a prostitute makes £2000 per night."

All the women stood up and started to leave the class. So he shouted after them: "Where are you going? The plane to Sweden doesn't take off until the day after tomorrow."
***
A good catholic joke
The pope and Donald Trump are on the same stage in Yankee Stadium in front of a huge crowd!

The pope leans towards Trump and says "do you know that with one little wave of my hand I can make every person in the crowd go wild with joy?. This joy will not be a momentary display, but will go deep into their hearts and they'll forever speak of this day and rejoice!"

Trump replied "I seriously doubt that! With one little wave of your hand... show me!"

So the Pope backhanded him and knocked him off the stage! AND THE CROWD ROARED AND CHEERED WILDLY and there was happiness throughout the land!
***
A U.S. Marine Colonel was about to start the morning briefing to his staff..
A U.S. Marine Colonel was about to start the morning briefing to his staff.

While waiting for the coffee machine to finish brewing, the Colonel decided
to pose a question to all assembled.

He explained that his wife had been a bit frisky the night before and he
failed to get his usual amount of sound sleep.

He posed the question of just how much of sex was "work"
and how much of it was "pleasure?"

A Major chimed in with 75%-25% in favor of work.

A Captain said it was 50%-50%.

A Lieutenant responded with 25%-75% in favor of pleasure, depending upon his
state of inebriation at the time.

There being no consensus, the colonel turned to the Private First Class who
was in charge of making the coffee and asked for his opinion?

Without  any hesitation, the young Private First Class responded, "Sir, it
has to be 100% pleasure.

The colonel was surprised and as you might guess, asked why?

"Well, sir, if there was any work involved, the officers would have me doing
it for them."

The room fell silent
***
A blind old cowboy walks into a bar...
An old, blind cowboy wanders into an all-girl biker bar by mistake. 
He finds his way to a bar stool and orders a shot of Jack Daniels.
After sitting there for a while, he yells to the bartender, “Hey, you wanna hear a blonde joke?”
The bar immediately falls absolutely silent.
In a very deep, husky voice, the woman next to him says,
“Before you tell that joke, Cowboy, I think it is only fair, given that you are blind, that you should know five things:
1. The bartender is a blonde girl with a baseball bat.
2. The bouncer is a blonde girl.
3. I'm a 6-foot tall, 175-pound blonde woman with a black belt in karate.
4. The woman sitting next to me is blonde and a professional weight lifter.
5. The lady to your right is blonde and a professional wrestler.
Now, think about it seriously, Cowboy. Do you still wanna tell that blonde joke?”
 
The blind cowboy thinks for a second, shakes his head and mutters, 'No... not if I'm gonna have to explain it five times....'
***
A middle aged man needs to buy condoms, but he doesn't know what size he needs...
So he asks the cashier at the checkout line.  She reaches over the counter, grabs his crotch, and calls out over the intercom, "Medium condoms needed at register 3!"

An older gentleman has the same problem later that day, so the woman grabs his crotch and calls out, "Large condoms needed at register 3!"

A few minutes later a 16 year old boy walks in with the same dilemma. The woman grabs his crotch and calls out, "Clean-up at register 3!"
***
Harry is taking a stroll through the woods....
...when he finds a large hole in the ground. The hole seems ridiculously deep, so Harry takes a small rock and throws it down the hole. Then he listens for the sound of the rock hitting the ground below. He doesn't hear anything, so next he tries a larger rock. Still, no sound. He looks around for something larger, and he finds an old railroad tie. He lifts up the railroad tie and chucks it down the hole. Still no sound.

Then out of NOWHERE, Harry sees a goat charging at him full speed from behind. Harry dives out of the way, then watches as the goat charges strait down the hole.

Harry is sitting there, perplexed, when a farmer approaches Harry and asks

Farmer: "Hey son, you haven't seen a goat around here have you?"

Harry: "Actually, Yes I did! It was the strangest thing, a goat just charged me full speed! I was just able to get out of the way. THEN the goat ran strait down that hole over there" as Harry points to the hole.

Farmer: "That's impossible, I tied that goat to a railroad tie"
***
Penguins and the cop
Credit to u/Akatheerder

A police officer is parked by the side of the road. He sees a pickup truck drive by and it's full of penguins. The officer flips his siren on and pulls the truck over.

He approaches the window and asks the man, "Sir, what are you doing with these penguins?"

"Well they're my pets, officer," the man replies.

"I'm afraid you'll have to take these animals to the zoo," the officer says, and leaves.

The next day, the police officer is parked in the same spot. He sees the same truck drive by. Now all the penguins are wearing sunglasses. He flips the siren on and pulls the truck over.

Upon reaching the window he says, "Sir, I told you to take these animals to the zoo."

"Yes officer, I did," replies the man. "Today we're going to the beach."
***
My girlfriend dropped this on me after some Tex-Mex last night ...
"I'm chilly"

She steps closer and takes my hand

"Will you be my con queso?"

And before I could even respond ...

"Sorry, was that too cheesy for you?"


Edit: Here come the trolls
Edit #2: For those confused, chile con queso is a dish
***
You want to know what's the most unrealistic thing from Batman V superman? (not a spoiler)
A democratic senator from Kentucky. 
***
Old man's wife has hearing problems
An old man goes to his doctor.  

Old man: Hey Doc, my wife's hearing is becoming terrible, is there anything you can give me to help her out?  

Doc: Well, how bad is it?  

Old Man: We rarely talk any more, Doc, and I love her more than anything.  

Doc: Try the distance test. When you get home, Call her name and if she doesn't hear you, get closer and closer until she does. This will give me a good sense of how bad her hearing actually is.  

Old Man: Okay, thanks Doc. See you soon.  

So, the Old Man goes home, opens his front door and shouts "EDNA?! WHAT'S FOR DINNER?!"  
Nothing.  

He walks through his hall and once more shouts "EDNA?! WHAT'S FOR DINNER?!"  
Nothing.

He walks to the door to his kitchen and sees his dearest wife over the oven cooking dinner. "EDNA?! WHAT'S FOR DINNER?!"  
Nothing.

Frustrated, the Old Man walks right up to his wife and shouts in her ear "EDNA?! WHAT'S FOR DINNER?!".  

"FOR THE FOURTH TIME, CHICKEN!"
***
Rich Banker
A local charity had never received a donation from the town’s banker, so the director made a phone-call. Our records show you make $500,000 a year, yet you haven’t given a penny to charity,” the director began. “Wouldn’t you like to help the community?”
The banker replied, “Did your research show that my mother is ill, with extremely expensive medical bills?”
“Um, no,” mumbled the director.
“Or that my brother is blind and unemployed? Or that my sister’s husband died, leaving her broke with four kids?”
“I … I … I had no idea.”
“So,” said the banker, “if I don’t give them any money, why would I give any to you?”
***
An Amish boy and his Dad . . .
A fifteen year old Amish boy and his father were in a mall. They were amazed by almost everything they saw, but especially by two shiny, silver walls that could move apart and then slide back together again.

The boy asked, 'What is this Father?'

The father (never having seen an elevator) responded, 'Son, I have never seen anything like this in my life, I don't know what it is.'

While the boy and his father were watching with amazement, a fat old lady in a wheel chair moved up to the moving walls and pressed a button. The walls opened, and the lady rolled between them into a small room. The walls closed and the boy and his father watched the small numbers above the walls light up sequentially.
 
They continued to watch until it reached the last number… and then the numbers began to light in the reverse order.

Finally the walls opened up again and a gorgeous 24-year-old blond stepped out.  The father, not taking his eyes off the young woman, said quietly to his son . . .
 
'Go get your Mother'
***
A state trooper just pulled me over...
He walked up to my car and opened his ticket book. 

I said, "you're going to try to sell me a ticket to the Louisiana State Trooper Ball aren't you?" 

He replied, "Louisiana State Troopers don't have balls."

There was a moment of silence. 

Then he closed his book, walked back to his car, and drove away.
***
Who has better friends?
A husband and wife are having a friendly debate one night, centered on the topic of who has better friends. They each offer a wide variety of anecdotes and stories, but in the end, they decide to put it to the test.

"Here's what we'll do," the wife suggests. "I'll call your friends, and you call mine. We'll both pretend that the other person hasn't come home yet, and that we're worried. Whoever's friends give the best advice about where to find us clearly know us better, and therefore *are* better."

The husband agrees to the game, and they both head off into separate rooms. When they reconvene a half an hour later, the husband looks defeated.

"Well, honey," he says, "I think it's pretty clear that you have better friends. Every one of them listed each of your favorite restaurants, salons, shops, and art galleries, and they had phone numbers for each of them. They knew your work hours by heart, your office extension, your boss's name, and even the route that you take home."

The wife shakes her head. "No, dear," she replies, "*you* have better friends."

"Why do you say that?" asks the husband.

"Well," the wife replies, "most of them said that you'd been at their place, and three of them said that you were still there."
***
The Millenium Falcon is taking off...
Han Solo asks C3PO to give him a countdown, and C3PO says..

"10....8.....6.....4"

Han interrupts him and asks what the heck he's doing.

C3 says "You told me to never tell you the odds"
***
taxi
A taxi passenger tapped the driver on the shoulder to ask him a question.

The driver screamed, lost control of the car, nearly hit a bus, went up on the sidewalk, and stopped inches from a shop window.

For a second, everything went quiet in the cab, then the driver said, "Look friend, don't ever do that again. You scared the daylights out of me!"

The passenger apologized and said he didn't realize that a little tap could scare him so much.

The driver replied, "Sorry, it's not really your fault. Today is my first day as a cab driver - I've been driving a hearse for the last 25 years."
***
A guy walks into a bar
A guy walks into a bar and orders finest scotch.

Bartender: (giving him the drink) that would be $2 Sir.

Guy: woah, this is cheap. You are good people. I want to thank your manager. Where is he?

Bartender: in the hotel room Sir, with my wife.

Guy: What's he doing with your wife?

Bartender: The same thing I'm doing with his business.
***
An identity thief and a rapist get convicted in a poor town...
The judge decides that the best punishment is to tie them up in a courtyard and for $5 you can punch the identity thief so he can never use his charm to con again, or for $10 you can kick the rapist in the nuts. The police officer in charge of this spots a girl kick the identity thief in the nuts and says, "Hey! You can't do that!" The girl asks, "Why not?" And the cop says, "Because this is the punchline."
***
Stay Positive.
A linguistics professor was lecturing to his English class one day.

 “In English,” he said, “a double negative forms a positive. In some languages, though, such as Russian, a double negative is still a negative. However, there is no language wherein a double positive can form a negative.”

A voice from the back of the room piped up, “Yeah, right.”
***
A woman was trying to breastfeed her son in a bus
The kid throws a tantrum and refuses to suck on his mother's breast. So in a fit, the mother tells her son, "If you don't want this milk, I'm gonna give this to the gentleman beside us."

An hour later, the kid still refused to breastfeed. So she tells her son again, "If you won't breastfeed, I'm really gonna give this to this man beside us!"

Then the guy beside them suddenly interrupted, "Please make up your mind now. My stop was 30 minutes ago."
***
A magician worked on a cruise ship...
.....the audience was different each week so the
magician did the same tricks over and over again.

There was only one problem: The captain's parrot
saw the shows each week and began to understand
how the Magician did every trick.

Once he understood, he started shouting in the middle
of the show, "Look, It’s not the same hat!" or, "Look,
he's hiding the flowers under the table!" Or "Hey, why
are all the cards the ace of spades?"

The magician was furious but couldn't do anything.
It was, after all, the Captain's' parrot.

Then one stormy night on the Pacific,
the ship unfortunately sank, drowning almost all
who were on board.
The magician luckily found himself on a piece of wood
floating in the middle of the sea, as fate would have it
... With the parrot...

They stared at each other with hatred, but did not
utter a word.

This went on for a day... And then 2 days. And then
3 days. Finally on the 4th day, the parrot could not hold
back any longer and said....."Alright, good one but i can't take it any longer, what did you do with the ship???"
***
A girl comes crying into her mother's home
and says "He dumped me, I guess I'll never have sex with a boy again". Her mother asks the girl to follow her to the bathroom. From a hidden cupboard, she pulls out a pink dildo and gives it to her.

The girl angrily says "A dildo? I have to use a stupid toy to please me?" 

"Its a magic dildo dear," says her mom calmly  "just say the words 'Great Magic Dildo' followed by where you want it to please you and it will do the job."

So the girl goes to her house and says "Great Magic Dildo vagina." The dildo immediately goes flying to her pussy, tears her underwear and rapidly penetrates her pussy, exciting her like no man has. It makes her cum harder than ever before. The girl is very pleased and tired. She lies down on the floor holding the dildo in awe when her ex-boyfriend comes barging in and says "Hey listen, I want to talk to yo-*what* are you holding??"

"Its a Great Magic Dildo."

Laughing, he says "Yeah great magic dildo my ass."
***
Two Hillbillies in a Restaurant
Two hillbillies walk into a restaurant. While having a bite to eat, they talk about their moonshine operation. Suddenly, a woman at a nearby table, who is eating a sandwich, begins to cough. After a minute or so, it becomes apparent that she is in real distress. One of the hillbillies looks at her and says, 'Kin ya swallar?' The woman shakes her head no. Then he asks, 'Kin ya breathe?' The woman begins to turn blue, and shakes her head no. The hillbilly walks over to the woman, lifts up her dress, yanks down her drawers, and quickly gives her right butt cheek a lick with his tongue. The woman is so shocked that she has a violent spasm, and the obstruction flies out of her mouth.As she begins to breathe again, the Hillbilly walks slowly back to his table. His partner says, 'Ya know, I'd heerd of that there 'Hind Lick Maneuver' but I ain't niver seed nobody do it!'
***
A man flying in a hot air balloon suddenly realizes he’s lost.
He reduces height and spots a man down below. He lowers the balloon further and shouts to get directions, "Excuse me, can you tell me where I am?"

The man below says: "Yes. You're in a hot air balloon, hovering 30 feet above this field."

"You must work in Information Technology," says the balloonist.

"I do" replies the man. "How did you know?"

"Well," says the balloonist, "everything you have told me is technically correct, but It's of no use to anyone."

The man below replies, "You must work in management."

"I do," replies the balloonist, "But how'd you know?"*

"Well", says the man, "you don’t know where you are or where you’re going, but you expect me to be able to help. You’re in the same position you were before we met, but now it’s my fault."

***
Guy goes to a ballgame...
...finds his seat and sees an elderly fellow in the next row with an empty seat beside him. They get to chatting and he asks if the seat is taken:

"Not anymore. My wife and I used to go to all the games together, but she died. This is the first game I've been to since!"

"Oh, I'm so sorry. Couldn't you give the ticket to a friend, or a family member?"

"Nah. They're all at the funeral."
***
Couple in their nineties are both having problems remembering things...
Couple in their nineties are both having problems remembering things. During a checkup, the doctor tells them that they're physically okay, but they might want to start writing things down to help them remember.

Later that night, while watching TV, the old man gets up from his chair. 'Want anything while I'm in the kitchen?' he asks.

'Will you get me a bowl of ice cream?'

'Sure..'

'Don't you think you should write it down so you can remember it?' she asks.

'No, I can remember it.'

'Well, I'd like some strawberries on top, too. Maybe you should write it down, so as not to forget it?'

He says, 'I can remember that. You want a bowl of ice cream with strawberries.'

'I'd also like whipped cream. I'm certain you'll forget that, write it down?' she asks.

Irritated, he says, 'I don't need to write it down, I can remember it! Ice cream with strawberries and whipped cream - I got it, for goodness sake!'

Then he toddles into the kitchen. After about 20 minutes, The old man returns from the kitchen and hands his wife a plate of bacon and eggs.. She stares at the plate for a moment.

'Where's my toast ?'




(EDIT: formatting)
***
Three Nuns die and go to heaven.
Three Nuns die and go to heaven, but in order to enter, they must prove their faith by answering one question each.

The first nun was asked "Who was the first man on earth?"

The nun replies "Obviously it was Adam"

The lights flicker, the bells ring and the gates open. The first nun walks through.

The second nun was asked "Who was the first woman on earth?"

"Easy" says the second nun "It was Eve"

The lights flicker, the bells ring and the gates open. The second nun walks through.

The third nun was then asked "What was the first thing Eve ever said to Adam?"

The nun, stumped by the question, says "Boy, that's a hard one."

The lights flicker, the bells ring and the gates open.
***
First Blowjob
A young man walks into a bar, orders five shots of whisky, and quickly downs them all.

The bartender says, "Whoa there buddy. That's a lot of shots. What's going on?"

The man replies, "First blowjob today."

The bartender says, "Well congratulations! I'll tell you what, have another drink. It's on me."

"No thanks." says the man, "If the first five didn't get the taste out of my mouth, I doubt the sixth is going to do much."
***
3 grumpy old men are sitting on a park bench... (NSFW)
3 grumpy old men are sitting on a park bench...

First old man says "Oy, I HATE gettin' old. It's getting to now where I can't take a good healthy piss anymore!"

Second old man nods: "You ain't lyin'. Getting old sucks. Just ONCE I wish I could take a big healthy shit like I used to when I was a young man."

Third old man shrugs and says, "Well, fellas I gotta say...every morning - regular - right at 6 o'clock - I take a nice, long piss.  And every morning at 7:00 - like clockwork - I take a really big healthy shit...

I sure wish I could wake up before eight."
***
A Higgs boson enters a church
And the priest says, "I'm sorry, we don't allow Higgs bosons in churches"

The Higgs replies, "but without me, you can't have mass"
***
Adultery Code
There was this old priest who got sick of all the people in his parish who kept confessing to adultery. One Sunday, in the pulpit, he said, "If I hear one more person confess to adultery, I'll quit!" Well, everyone liked him, so they came up with a code word. Someone who had committed adultery would say they had "fallen". 

This seemed to satisfy the old priest and things went well, until the priest died at a ripe old age. About a week after the new priest arrived, he visited the Mayor of the town and seemed very concerned. 

The priest said, "You have to do something about the sidewalks in town. When people come into the confessional, they keep talking about having fallen." 

The Mayor started to laugh, realizing that no-one had told the new priest about the code word. 

Before the mayor could explain, the priest shook an accusing finger at the mayor and said, "I don't know what you're laughing about. Your wife fell three times this week."
***
A woman was in bed with her lover when she heard her husband opening the front door.
"Hurry!" she said.  "Stand in the corner."  She quickly rubbed baby oil all over him and then she dusted him with talcum powder.  "Don't move until I tell you to," she whispered.  "Just pretend you're a statue."

"What's this, honey?" the husband inquired as he entered the room.

"Oh, it's just a statue," she replied nonchalantly.  "The Smiths bought one for their bedroom.  I liked it so much, I got one for us, too."

No more was said about the statue, not even later that night when they went to sleep.  

Around two in the morning the husband got out of bed, went to the kitchen and returned a while later with a sandwich and a glass of milk. 

"Here," he said to the 'statue'.  "Eat something.  I stood like an idiot at the Smiths' for three days and nobody offered me as much as a glass of water."
***
Bet on a bullet (slightly NSFW)
A man walks into a gun shop.

"I want to buy a new scope and bullets for my rifle"

"sure" said the owner handing over a scope "if you look out the window, this scope is so powerful you can see into my house"

The man looks, then turns to the shopkeeper and says "sorry mate there is a man in there and a woman who i can only assume is your wife?"

"cheating, bitch!" the shopkeeper said, putting two bullets on the counter he said "Shoot that guys prick off and you can have the scope for free, shoot that bitches' head off and I'll give you free bullets for the rest of your life"

The guy looks through the scope again and says "what do I get if I only use one shot?"
***
A woman and a man are lying in bed
A woman and a man are lying in bed next to each other when her phone rings.

She picks up, the man looks over at her and listens. She is speaking in a cheery voice, "Hi. I'm so glad you called. Really? That's wonderful. I'm so happy for you. That sounds terrifiic. Great! Thanks. Okay. Bye bye."

She hangs up and the man asks, "Who was that?"

"Oh," she replies, "that was my husband telling me about the great time he's having on his fishing trip with you."


EDIT: Holy shitsnacks! Nr. 1 in /r/Jokes, again? Aww, you guys!
***
Now Hiring
A guy walks by a bar and sees a sign in the window that says, 'Piano Player Wanted'. So he thinks to himself, "Shit, I play the piano, and I need a gig". 
So he goes inside to apply. He speaks to the manager and tells him, "I saw the sign in the window and would like to play at your fine establishment". The manager says, " Well, come over to the piano and play me a few tunes so I can see what you got". 
The guy sits down at the piano and plays one of the most beautiful pieces of music the manager has ever heard. The manager says, "That's a beautiful piece, what's the name of it"? "Oh, that's an original", the pianist replies, "I wrote it myself. I call it, 'Suck My Cock, You Dirty Whore'". The manager is surprised but keeps a straight face. He asks him to play another tune and the pianist plays another beautiful song. The manager says, "That's beautiful, what is the name of that one"? The pianist says, "That's another original I wrote. I call it, 'I'll Fuck You Up The Ass'". 
The owner says, "Okay, I'll hire you under one condition. If someone asks you the name of one of your songs, please don't tell them". 
The pianist agrees. 
That night he starts working and he's playing away on the piano and decides to take a bathroom break. As he's coming out of the restroom, a lady stops him and says, "Do you know your fly is open and your dick is hanging out"? To which he replies, "Do I know it? I fuckin' wrote that song!" 
***
A lady about 8 months pregnant got on a bus.
She noticed the man opposite her was smiling at her. She immediately moved to another seat. This time the smile turned into a grin, so she moved again. He seemed more amused. When on the fourth move, the man burst out laughing, she complained to the driver and he had the man arrested.

The case came up in court. The Judge asked the man (about 20 years old) what he had to say for himself.

The man replied...

"Well your Honor, it was like this:

When the lady got on the bus, I couldn't help but notice her condition. She sat under a sweets sign that said, "The Double Mint Twins are Coming" and I grinned.

Then she moved and sat under a sign that said "Logan's Liniment will reduce the swelling", and I had to smile.

Then she placed herself under a deodorant sign that said "William's Big Stick Did the Trick", and I could hardly contain myself.

BUT, your Honor, when she moved for the fourth time and sat under the sign that said "Goodyear Rubber could have prevented this Accident"..I just lost it."
***
Freudian Slip...
A guy sits in his seat on an airplane, red-faced, and turns to the guy next to him. "Oh man. I just made the worst Freudian slip. The ticket agent was really well-endowed and instead of asking her for a ticket to Pittsburg, I asked her for a picket to tittsburg. So embarrassing!"

The guy he's sitting next to says, "Hey buddy. I'm right there with you. This morning I'm sitting at breakfast with my wife, and instead of saying, 'Honey, could you please pass the cream', I say, 'You fucking bitch, you ruined my life.'"
***
Crossing the Border
A young Mexican man decides he wants to see a bit of America. He swims across the Rio Grande and finds a college football game about to start. He doesn't have any money to get in, so he climbs a flag pole to watch the game. Later that night he swims back across the river and tells his family how friendly the Americans all were, as they all turned to him at the start of the game and asked together, "Jose, can you see?"
***
My friends 10 yo daughter made this up while in the elevator today: "Did you know Darth Vader has another daughter?"
Mom: "No, who?"
Daughter: "Ella, Ella Vader."
***
A Priest helps a young woman at the airport


A young woman on a flight from Mexico asked the priest beside her, "Father, may I ask a favor?"

"Of course, what may I do for you?" the priest replied.

"Well, I bought an expensive hair dryer for my mother's birthday. It's unopened and over my customs limits. I'm afraid they'll confiscate it. Is there any way you could carry it through for me? Under your robes, perhaps?"

"I would love to help you, dear, but I must warn you, I will not lie," said the devout man.

"With your honest face, Father, no one will question you."

When they reached the customs area, she let the priest go ahead of her.

The official asked, "Father, do you have anything to declare?"

"From the top of my head down to my waist, I have nothing to declare."

The official thought this answer strange, so asked, "And what do you have to declare from your waist to the floor?"

"I have a marvelous instrument designed for a woman's use, but which is, to date, unused." The official said, "Go ahead, Father."

***
I saw a pirate on the street the other day
"Oh my gosh, are you a pirate?"

"Aye, I be a pirate."

"Wow, cool! I see you have a peg leg. How did you come to need that?"

"It was during a mutiny. Me crew threw me overboard and a shark bit me leg off."

"Ouch. And your hook? How'd that happen?"

"During the mutiny, boy. My crew threw me overboard and the very same shark bit me hand off, too."

"Oh man. And your eye patch?"

"Bird poop."

"Bird poop?"

"Aye. A bird pooped in me eye, and it was the first day with me hook."
***
Minnie and Mickey Mouse are getting a divorce...
The divorce court judge looks down at the paperwork and says to Mickey "It says here that you want to divorce Minnie because you think she is crazy?"  And Mickey replies, "No, I said I want a divorce because she is fucking Goofy!"
***
Golden toilets
A guy walks into a bar in one morning, and goes up to the bar tender.  "Do you guys have golden toilets?" he asks.

"What? Golden toilets? What are you talking about?"

"Look, last night I got pretty wasted but the one thing I can remember is peeing in a golden toilet."

Bartender says "OK, first, no we don't have golden toilets.  Secondly, HEY MORTY, I FOUND THE GUY THAT PISSED IN YOUR TUBA!"
***
An elderly man in Florida . . .
An elderly man in Florida had owned a large farm for several years. 

He had a large pond in the back, fixed up nice picnic tables, horseshoe 
courts, and some orange and grapefruit trees. 

The pond was properly shaped and fixed up for swimming when it was built. 

One evening the old farmer decided to go down to the pond to look it 
over, as he hadn't been there for a while. 

He grabbed a five-gallon bucket to bring back some fruit. 

As he neared the pond, he heard voices shouting and laughing with glee. 

As he came closer he saw it was a bunch of young women skinny-dipping in his pond. 

He made the women aware of his presence and they all went to the deep end. 

One of the women shouted to him, "We're not coming out until you leave!" 

The old man frowned, "I didn't come down here to watch you ladies swim naked or make you get out of the pond naked." 

Holding the bucket up he said, "I'm here to feed the alligators." 
***
A Rabbi and a Priest were having a picnic
A Rabbi and a Priest were having a picnic on a really hot summer day and wanted to dip in the river to cool off. They had not thought to bring bathing suits, so decided to skinny dip instead.

The river was flowing rapidly and both clergy were washed a short distance downstream before getting out. After climbing out of the river they had just started to make a run for it to get to their clothes, when many members of their congregation came into view.

The Priest covered his privates with his hands and put on a burst of speed, but the Rabbi covered his face instead. "What are you doing?" the Priest asked. "I don't know about you," the Rabbi answered, "but my congregants recognize me by my face."
***
The two old-timers...
...were having a chat over the back fence.


"You know, Chester," said one, "you should invest in some heavier curtains for your bedroom window."


"Why's that, Clem?"


"Because the ones you have now are kinda transparent.  In fact, last night I could see you making love to your wife."


"Pfft!  That shows how bad your eyesight is.  I wasn't even home last night!"
***
A man calls his home while on a business trip.
(I translated this joke from my native language so bear with me)

An unfamiliar voice answers the phone.  
Man: "Who is this?"  
Answer comes, "A am the maid."  
Man: "What? there was no maid when i left a couple of days ago."  
Maid: "I was hired yesterday and started working just today. You are the madam's husband?"  
Man: "Yes. Where's my wife? Tell her i need to talk to her."  
Maid: "I'm afraid sir, she is in her room with another man."  
Man: "What are they doing?"  
Maid: "By the sounds of it they are making love."  
Man: "It hasn't even been a whole week that i left and she has already started bringing home her lovers? Listen, kill them both and i'll give you $20000."  
Maid: "But sir, i might get in trouble for this."  
Man: "Don't worry. I have high influence in the police department. i will not let you go to jail. Just get the biggest knife from the kitchen and hack them to pieces."  
Hearing this, the maid leaves the phone on hold, goes to the kitchen and grabs the biggest knife she can find, then enters the bedroom and kills both of them. She returns to the phones and asks, "I killed them both. Now what?"  
Man: "Just hide their body in the basement. I'll deal with it when i return."  
Maid: "But we live in an apartment building. There is no basement here."  
Man: "Oh! sorry. Wrong number."



***
My favorite construction joke
A young family moved into a house next door to a vacant lot. One day a construction crew turned up to start building a house on the empty lot.
The young family's 5-year-old daughter naturally took an interest in all the activity going on next door and started talking with the workers. She hung around and eventually the construction crew, all of them gems-in-the-rough, more or less adopted her as a kind of project mascot. 

They chatted with her, let her sit with them while they had coffee and lunch breaks, and gave her little jobs to do here and there to make her feel important.  

At the end of the first week they even presented her with a pay envelope containing ten dollars.  

The little girl took this home to her mother who suggested that they take the pay she had received to the bank the next day to start a savings account.  

When they got to the bank the teller was equally impressed and asked the little girl how she had come by her very own pay check at such a young age.  

The little girl proudly replied, "I worked all last week with a construction crew building a house."  

"My goodness gracious," said the teller, "and will you be working on the house again this week, too?"  

The little girl replied, "I will if those useless sons-a-bitches at Home Depot ever deliver the fuckin' drywall."
***
A homeless man is walking along a road
and comes across a bridge. On the bridge is a woman standing on the railing, clearly about to jump. He approaches the woman.

"Hey lady, are you about to jump?"

"Back off! If you come any closer, I'll do it!" she replies.

"Well, that's fine," he says, "but before you do, can I ask a favor? I'm pretty down on my luck, as you can see, and it's been a long time since I've felt the touch of a woman, so if it's all the same to you, would you have sex with me first?"

"Eww no, fuck off you creep!" the woman shouts back.

"Fine, fine" the man says. "I'll just go wait at the bottom."  
  
Credit goes to u/MrTyko
***
Two tugboat captains have been friends for years.
They would always cry, "Aye!" and blow their whistles whenever they passed each other. 

A new crewman asked his boat's mate, "What do they do that for?"

The mate looked surprised and replied, "You mean that you've never heard of ... an aye for an aye?"

***
Who's your daddy?

A father's daughter brought home her prospective fiancee

It was the first time he'd met him and he took the opportunity to quiz him a bit

"So, what do you do for a living?" he asked

"I have no job" he replied

"Really? Well how do you expect to provide for my daughter?"

"God will provide, I'm sure" was the answer from the intended

"And how exactly will he do that then?"

"God is merciful and will ensure we do not want" he said with all sincerity

"And how about if you have kids? Who looks after you then?"

"God will ensure he provides bounty for the whole family"

"OK, so you say, but exactly how will God provide this?"

"I don't know yet. God will move in his own mysterious ways"

At this point, the father gives up and leaves the house fuming, heading straight for the bar. there he meets his friend Dave who asks,

"What's up friend? You seem troubled"

"Well, I've just met my girl's new fiancé"

"Oh man, bad news?"

"Well, on the plus side, he does at least seem to think I'm God..." 
***
A heart of gold.
A local charity had never received a donation from the town’s banker, so the director made a phone call. “Our records show you make $500,000 a year, yet you haven’t given a penny to charity,” the director began. “Wouldn’t you like to help the community?”

The banker replied, “Did your research show that my mother is ill, with extremely expensive medical bills?”

“Um, no,” mumbled the director.

“Or that my brother is unemployed? Or that my sister’s husband left, leaving her broke with four kids?”

“I … I … I had no idea.”

“So,” said the banker, “if I don’t give them any money, why would I give any to you?”

***
It's 3 AM, and a general urgently calls by phone to the sergeant...
A private awnsers the phone:  
-"Hello?"  
-"Quickly, hand me over to the sergeant" the general says  
-"No, i'm sorry, the Sergeant is sleeping, and he doesn't want to be disturbed, call him again in the morning".  
The general, angry, says:  
-"Incompetent! pass me with the sergeant"  
The private yells into the phone:  
-"Are you a tough guy? CALL BACK TOMORROW IN THE MORNING"  
-"Do you know who I am?"  
-"No, and I don't care"  
-"I'm your General"  
-"Holy shit, and, do you know who I am?"  
-"Of course not" the general said.  
-"Oh, what a relief" and he hung up the phone.  

&nbsp;

*I hope you guys liked it, if you find any grammar problems, let me know :P*  
*EDIT: Grammar cuz reasons**
***
The Somalian Olympics team has just apologised
The Somalian Olympics Team has just apologised to the Olympic Committee after realising that sailing and shooting were 2 separate events!!
***
A husband and Wife from the States visit the Holy Land...
During the trip the wife tragically dies.  A funeral director in Israel tells the husband that she can be buried in the holy land for $500, or shipped back to the US for $4000.  The husband immediately says, "Let's ship her back to the states." The funeral director asks why, when it's so much cheaper to bury her her.  Husband says "Someone else came back to life after 3 days being buried here before, I'd rather not take that chance."
***
ISIS takes Congress hostage
A driver was stuck in a traffic jam on the highway outside Washington, DC.

Nothing was moving.

Suddenly, a man knocks on the window. The driver rolls down the window and asks, "What's going on?"

"Terrorists have kidnapped the entire US Congress, and they're asking for a $100 million dollar ransom. Otherwise, they are going to douse them all in gasoline and set them on fire."

"We are going from car to car, collecting donations."

"How much is everyone giving, on an average?" the driver asks.

The man replies, "Roughly a gallon."

***
A guy dies and gets to the pearly gates
where st peter asks him
"son, to let you into heaven you must tell me one good thing you've done on earth"
the guy thinks for a minute and replies
"well, this one time i saw some some bikers out the front of a bar harassing a girl. So I walked over to the biggest biker, kicked his bike over, pulled out his nose ring, spat in his face and told him to leave the poor girl alone"
st peter is quite impressed with this and says 
"well done my son, and when exactly did this happen?"
the guy replies
"about 5 minutes ago"
***
The Sportsman's Double
I met an older woman at a bar last night. She looked pretty good for a 60-year-old. In fact, she wasn't too bad at all, and I found myself thinking she probably had a really hot daughter.

We drank a couple of beers, and she asked if I'd ever had a Sportsman's Double? 'What's that? I asked. 'It's a mother and daughter threesome,' she said. 

As my mind began to embrace the idea, and I wondered what her daughter might look like, I said, 'No, I haven't.'

We drank a bit more, then she said with a wink, 'tonight's your lucky night'. 

We went back to her place. We walked in. She put on the hall light and shouted upstairs: 'Mom, you still awake?'
***
A gynecologist has a midlife crisis and takes night classes to become a mechanic...
She's really nervous the night of the final, so she studies real hard and hopes for the best.

When the grades are posted, she freaks out because her grade says 150% and she assumes it was an error, so she goes to see the instructor.

He explains it's no error. 

"You took apart the engine perfectly, every nut, every bolt. You pulled it all apart without breaking anything. That got you 50%
Then you put it all back together perfectly. It actually ran better than before you started, so I gave you 50% for that.
You got a bonus 50% for doing it all through the muffler."
***
A bear joke
An 80 year old man was having his annual checkup, and the doctor asked him how he was feeling.

"I've never been better!" he boasted.

"I've got an eighteen year old bride who's pregnant, and having my child! What do you think about that?" 

The doctor considered this for a moment, then said, "Let me tell you a story. I knew a guy who was an avid hunter.

He never missed a season. But one day went out in a bit of a hurry, and he accidentally grabbed his umbrella instead of his gun." 

The doctor continued, "So he was in the woods, and suddenly a grizzly bear appeared in front of him!

He raised up his umbrella, pointed it at the bear, and squeezed the handle." 

"And do you know what happened?" the doctor queried.

Dumbfounded, the old man replied "No."

The doctor continued, "The bear dropped dead in front of him!"

"That's impossible!" exclaimed the old man.  "Someone else must have shot that bear."

"That's kind of what I'm getting at..." replied the doctor.

***
A man is drunk in a bar,
Across the bar he sees three heavy set women, speaking with Scottish sounding accents. He makes his way to the women and asks; "Excuse me, are you ladies from Scotland?" The first women gets mad and yells "It's Wales, you ass! Wales!" The man the replies. "I'm sorry, are you three whales from Scotland?" 
***
Johnny: Will you marry me?
Johnny: Will you marry me?
Jenny: You have to ask my father first.
Johnny: (later) Well, I asked him.
Jenny: And what did he say?
Johnny: He said he’s already married.

***
What's a pirates least favorite letter?
Dear sir,

Your internet service has been disconnected due to terms of service violations and excessive downloading. Please return modem and accessories to your nearest Comcast location.

Sincerely,

Comcast
***
It was time to name Canada
All the 4 founding hosiers were sitting around and no one could agree on a name. They finally decided to put a bunch of letters in a hat and 3 people would draw one out at a time while the last transcribed the name.

The first guy drew and read, "C, eh?"

The next drew, "N, eh?"

Finally the last maple head drew and said, "D, eh?"


***
A guy walks into a dive bar...
And takes a seat at a table.  Looking over their menu, he sees it has only three options: Tuna Salad Sandwich $1.50, Chicken Salad Sandwich $4.50 and lastly Hand Job $5.00. 

"Wow, what a bargain," he thought to himself, somewhat stunned as a gorgeous blonde approached to take his order.  "Are you the one who gives the hand job?" he asked. 

"Why yes I am," she said seductively as she slid up closer to him. 

"Well, go in the back and wash your fucking hands, I want a tuna salad sandwich."
***
Lost Wife
Two guys, one old and one young, are pushing their carts around a shopping mall when they collide.

 The old guy says to the young guy, "Sorry about that. I'm looking for my wife, and I guess I wasn't paying attention to where I was going."

 The young guy says, "That's OK. It's a coincidence. I'm looking for my wife, too. I can't find her and I'm getting a little desperate."

 The old guy says, "Well, maybe we can help each other. What does your wife look like?"

 The young guy says, "Well, she is 24 yrs old, tall, with blonde hair, blue eyes, long legs, big boobs, and she's wearing tight white shorts, a red halter top and no bra. What does your wife look like?"

 The old guy says, "Doesn't matter - let's look for yours."
***
Argon walks into a bar.
The bartender says "we don't serve noble gases here."  Argon doesn't react.
***
A man was at the bar one night...
He had a few too many when he saw three obese girls come up to the bartender and order some drinks. The man noticed they had strong accents, which grabbed his attention.

The women were there for a while and were quite loud and a bit rude. Feeling rather buzzed, the man looked over to the girls and said "Hi, um, are you girls from Scotland?" One of them spoke up, with a loud, nasty attitude and said "It’s WALES you idiot!!!"

The man apologized with a little slur and said "I'm so sorry, are you Whales from Scotland?’
***
Running in the Nude
A woman was having a daytime affair while her husband was at work.
One rainy day she was in bed with her boyfriend when, to her horror,
she heard her husband's car pull into the driveway. 'Oh my God - Hurry, !
Grab your clothes and jump out the window. My husband's home early,' ! 
'I can't jump out the window. It's raining out there.' !
'If my husband catches us in here, he'll kill us both!' she replied. 'He's got
a hot temper and a gun, so the rain is the least of your problems.' !
So the boyfriend scoots out of bed, grabs his clothes and jumps out the
window! As he ran down the street in the pouring rain, he quickly
discovered he had run right into the middle of the town's annual marathon,
so he started running along beside the others, about 300 of them.
Being naked, with his clothes tucked under his arm, he tried to blend in
as best he could. After a little while a small group of runners who had
been watching him with some curiosity, jogged closer. Do you always
run in the nude?' one asked.
'Oh yes!' he replied, gasping in air. 'It feels so wonderfully free!' 
Another runner moved a long side. 'Do you always run carrying your
clothes with you under your arm?' 
'Oh, yes' our friend answered breathlessly. 'That way I can get
dressed right at the end of the run and get in my car to go home.' !
Then a third runner cast his eyes a little lower and asked, 'Do you always wear a condom when you run? 'Nope. . Just when it's raining.'
***
3 Guys go on a camping trip...
3 guys go on a camping trip. They get to the campground, decide to do some fishing and go back to their campsite just before dark to set up their tent. The guy who brought the tent made a mistake and had gotten a tent that was quite small, so they ended up having to sleep side by side.

The next morning, the guy on the left says "Man, I had an awesome dream, I dreamt I got a handjob by this hot ass chick" the guy on the right goes "Wow really? Me too!" 

The guy in the middle says, "That's funny, I dreamt I was skiing."

EDIT: Their places. Lol Thanks, I didn't catch that.
***
The guy at the bar
There was this guy at a bar, just looking at his drink. He stays like that for half of an hour. 

Then, this big trouble-making truck driver steps next to him, takes the drink from the guy, and just drinks it all down. The poor man starts crying. The truck driver says, "Come on man, I was just joking. Here, I'll buy you another drink. I just can't stand to see a man cry." 

"No, it's not that. This day is the worst of my life. First, I fall asleep, and I go late to my office. My boss, outrageous, fires me. When I leave the building, to my car, I found out it was stolen. The police said that they can do nothing. I get a cab to return home, and when I leave it, I remember I left my wallet and credit cards there. The cab driver just drives away." 

"I go home, and when I get there, I find my wife in bed with the gardener. I leave home, and come to this bar. And just when I was thinking about putting an end to my life, you show up and drink my poison."
***
A young boy goes to his father in Russia
The boy asks "Papa, could I please have 5 rubles"
Papa is surprised and asks "20 rubles? Why do you need 50 rubles?"
***
How tall is a penguin?
A man rushes into a bar and screams at the bartender, "How tall is a penguin?"

The bartender looks at him weirdly and says, "Excuse me?"

The man repeats, "How tall is a penguin?"

The bartender motions with his hands. "Uh, about this high."

The color drains from the man's face as he says, "Oh shit I just ran over a nun."
***
Two elderly couples were having dinner together
An elderly couple was having dinner at another couple's house. After their meal, the wives went into the kitchen.

The two elderly gents were talking, and one says, "Last night we went out to a fabulous new restaurant that I'd highly recommend."

The other man says, "What's the name of the restaurant?"

The first man thinks long and hard with a furrowed brow, finally saying, "Uh, what is the name of that red flower you give to someone you love?"

His friend replies, "A carnation?"

"No, no. The other one," the man says.

His friend suggests, "The poppy?"

"No, no, no," growls the man. "You know--the one that is red and has thorns."

His friend says, "Do you mean a rose?"

"Yes! Thank you," the first man says. He then turns toward the kitchen and yells, "Rose, what's the name of that restaurant we went to last night?"

***
Married for the 4th time
A woman in her eighties made the evening news because she was getting married for the fourth time. The following day she was being interviewed by a local TV station, and the commentator asked about what it felt to be married again at that age and would she share part of her previous experiences, since it seem quite unique the fact that her new husband was a ‘funeral director.’ After a short time to think, a smile came to her face and she proudly explained that she had first married a banker when she was in her twenties, in her forties she married a circus ring master, and in her sixties she married a pastor and now in her eighties, a funeral director. The amazed commentator asked her why she had married men with such diverse Careers. With a smile on her face she explained, ‘I married one for the money, two for the show, three to get ready, and four to go.’
***
Newlywed Woman In Her 90s Is Interviewed
There was a lady in her 90s who became a sort of local celebrity because she had recently gotten married. The local news station decided to interview her. The interviewer asked questions like how it was to be a newlywed in her 90s.

"This isn't my first husband, so it's not much different than the others," she replied with a smile.

"Oh? How many husbands have you had?" the interviewer inquired. "This one will be my fourth," she replied.

"I was married in my 20s to a banker, then in my 40s to a circus performer. After that I married a preacher."

"What does your current husband do?"

"Oh he's a funeral director."

The interviewer laughed and then asked how she came to marry these men from such different backgrounds and personalities.

"It always made sense to me," she replied. "I married one for the money, two for the show, three to get ready, and four to go."
***
A rapist, a zoophile, a pedophile, a sadist, a necrophile, a pyromaniac, and a masochist are all standing in a jail cell. .
The rapist: "I'd like to fuck something."

The zoophile: "A cat?"

The pedophile: "Even better, a kitten."

The sadist: "How about we beat the kitten up, and THEN have sex with it?"

The necrophiliac: "Alright let's beat a kitten to DEATH, and then have sex with it."

The pyromaniac: "Okay, how about we beat a kitten to death, light it on fire, and then have sex with it?"

The masochist:  "Meow."
***
John Cena wakes up from coma
Cena: Where am I?  
Nurse: I C U  
Cena: No you don't  
***
Poker is like sex
If you don't have a good partner, you better have a good hand

Edit 1: when you cheat in poker you have a partner 

Edit 2: this is getting more upvotes than I thought it would get but before someone calls me out on it. This was a Mae West quote about bridge and several Internet memes put poker instead of bridge because more people play poker than bridge and when you cheat in poker you have partners(the poker strategy is called collusion) 
***
A guy has a massive crush on a girl
A guy has a massive crush on this girl. He is so enchanted by her that every time he see's her he gets an instant boner. In order to avoid any embarassment from an obvious boner he decides to call the girl and ask her out over the phone. To his surprise she agrees almost instantly and they make plans. As soon as he hangs up he thinks, "shit, what am I gonna do, I'll get a boner as soon as I see her and she'll never talk to me again." So like a man, he finds the perfect solution to him problem. He duct tapes and ties his dick to his leg. On date night, he goes to her door, double checks his work with a patt on his leg, check. He rings her doorbell, she opens the door, and he kicks her in the face.
***
A 17-year old dude goes to the pharmacy
A 17-year old dude goes to the pharmacy.

"Hello mister, i'll be at my new girlfriends house for dinner today... you know.. become acquainted with her parents and so on. After the dinner though, i'm probably gonna have some sexy time my girlfriend. You know the deal.
So is there something you could suggest me?

"Well.. i'd suggest some... condoms?

"Well.. uhm.. sounds cool.. I.. will take some"

As he is about to leave the pharmacy he stops and returns.

"Wait a second. You know... her mum... she's hot af... and maybe i could assort some.. you know.. sexy time with her as well.
You know what.. ima take some more condoms."

Later at the dinner the young man is completely silent and is just looking at the table.

His girlfriend says.

"If i'd known you're gonna be all silent and stuff i wouldnt have invited you to this dinner!?"

The young man then answers:

"If i'd had known your dad is a pharmacist i wouldnt even be here."
***
A man with no arms and no legs is sat on a beach
A man with no arms and no legs is sat on a beach when he spots three playboy bunnies walking by him. They all spot him and feel bad for him so they try to cheer him up. 
The first playboy bunny walks up to him and says; "Have you ever been hugged?" The man shakes his head so she gives him a hug.
The second playboy bunny approaches and asks "Have you ever been kissed?" The man shakes his head so she starts to kiss him.
The third and final playboy bunny walks over and asks "Have you ever been fucked?" The man smiles as he shakes his head, so the playboy bunny picks him up and throws him in the sea, shouting "Well you're fucked now!"

Edit - ok yeah his name was Bob
***
Homeless Man
I was walking down the street when I was accosted by a particularly dirty and shabby-looking homeless man who asked me for a couple of dollars for dinner.

I took out my wallet, extracted ten dollars and asked,"If I give you this money, will you buy some beer with it instead of dinner?"

"No, I had to stop drinking years ago," the homeless man replied.

"Will you use it to go fishing instead of buying food?" I asked.

"No, I don't waste time fishing," the homeless man said.."I need to spend all my time trying to stay alive."

"Will you spend this on hunting equipment?" I asked.

"Are you NUTS!" replied the homeless man. "I haven't gone hunting in 20 years!"

"Well," I said, "I'm not going to give you money. Instead, I'm going to take you home for a shower and a terrific dinner cooked by my wife."

The homeless man was astounded. "Won't your wife be furious with you for doing that?

I replied, "Don't worry about that. It's important for her to see what a man looks like after he has given up drinking, fishing and hunting."
***
A piece of string walks into a bar
A piece of string walks into a bar and walks up to the counter.

The bartender says, "Sorry mate, we don't serve pieces of string in here, get lost."

Upset, the piece of string walks out the door. A sudden thought strikes him. He ties himself in a knot and messes his hair up.

He walks back into the bar and approaches the counter. The bartender says, "Oi, aren't you that piece of string from before...?"

"No," says the piece of string, "I'm a frayed knot."
***
Pickle Slicer
A guy comes home from work and tells his wife that he was fired. Wife asks why? Husband says he got caught sticking his dick in the pickle slicer. Wife panicked - asked to look at his penis. Penis looked good, didn't have a cut on it. Puzzled, the wife asks, 'What happened to the pickle slicer?'

The husband looks up and says, 
'She got fired as well'.
***
There was a little girl and her mother walking through the park one day.....
There was a little girl and her mother walking through the park one day and they saw two teenagers having sex on a bench.
The little girl says, "Mummy, what are they doing?"
The mother hesitates then quickly replies, "Ummm they are making cakes."
The next day they are at a zoo and the little girl sees two monkeys having sex. Again she asks her mother what they are doing and her mother replies with the same response, "Making cakes."
The next day the girl says to her mother, "Mummy, you and Daddy were making cakes in the lounge last night, eh?"
Shocked, the mother asks, "How do you know?"
She says, "Because I licked the icing off the sofa."
***
A man was having some stomach pains...
A man was having some stomach pains, so he went to see his doctor. The doctor looked him over and declared, "Sir, you have a tapeworm. Please come back in three days, and bring... a banana."

The man is confused, but he trusts the doctor so he returns in three days with a banana. The doctor tells the man to take off his pants and bend over, whereupon the doctor... introduces the banana into the man's system. The man is shocked.

The doctor says, "Excellent job. Now please come back in three days with another banana." The man trusts his doctor, so in three days he returns with another banana.

The doctor again asks the man to remove his pants and again he... introduces the banana... into the man's system. The man is extremely confused, but his stomach pains aren't as bad anymore so he will continue to follow his doctor's orders.

The doctor says, "Great job. Now please come back in three days with... a hammer."

The man returns with a hammer three days later. He is extremely confused, but upon seeing the doctor he receives his instructions. "Please take off your pants and lie on your side on the examination table," says the doctor. The man lays there for a few minutes with his rear end bare. The doctor breathlessly grips the hammer and waits.

The tapeworm pops out of the man's butthole, looks at the doctor and says "Hey where the fuck is my banana?"
***
An old man and his wife have gone to bed.
After laying on bed for a few minutes, the old man cut a fart and says, "7 points."

His wife rolls over and asks, "What in the world was that?"

The old man says, "Touchdown. I'm ahead 7 to nothing."

A few minutes later, the wife lets one go and says, "Touchdown, tie score."

After about ten minutes, the old man farts again and says, "Touchdown, I'm ahead 14 to 7.

Now starting to get into this, the wife quickly farts again and says, "Touchdown, tie score."

The old man strains really hard, but to no avail -- he can't fart.

So not to be outdone by his wife, he gives it everything he has and strains real hard to get out just one more fart.

Straining, the old man tries so hard, he poops in the bed.

The wife asks, "Now what in the world was that?"

The old man replies, "Half-time, switch sides!"
***
How many karma whores does it take to change a lightbulb?
When this gets 500 upvotes, I'll tell you the answer.

EDIT: Slightly late, but:

10: one to change it, one to post about it for karma and eight to repost it a few months later.


***
Three vampires are sitting on the graveyard wall.
Three vampires are sitting on the graveyard wall.


The first says that he is really hungry and flys into the night. After half an hour he returns and his mouth is full of blood. The other two ask him: "where did you get that?" He answers: "Do you see that little light across the hill? It was a little family at a camping trip. Delicious!" 


The second vampire starts in the air and returns 15minutes later, the whole face covered with blood. The others ask jealousy: "Where have you been?" Smiling he answers: "You guys see that group of lights down there? It was a wedding with over 20guests. I don't have to eat for a week!"


Finally the third vampire starts into the dark sky, and returns about five minutes later. His whole body, top to bottom is covered in blood.

Exited the other two ask:"Man where did you go?!" 

"Do you see that tree right there?"

"Yes"

"Well, I didn't"


***
Today, I got up early...
...put on my long johns, dressed quietly, made coffee, grabbed my clubs, slipped quietly into the garage, loaded my clubs into the car, and proceeded to back out into a torrential  downpour. There was snow mixed with the rain and the wind was blowing 50 mph. I pulled back into the garage, turned on the radio, and discovered that the weather would be bad throughout the day. I went back into the house, quietly undressed, and slipped back into bed. There I cuddled up to my wife's back, now with a different anticipation, and whispered, 'The weather out there is terrible.'

She sleepily replied, 'I know, can you believe my husband is out golfing in that stuff?'
***
Four surgeons sit around discussing their favorite patients.
The first surgeon says, "I like operating on librarians. When you open them up, everything is in alphabetical order".

The second surgeon says, "I like operating on accountants. When you open them up, everything is in numerical order".

The third surgeon says, "I like operating on electricians. When you open them up, everything is color coded.

The fourth surgeon says, "I like operating on politicians."

The other three surgeons look at each other in disbelief.

The fourth surgeon continues, "Because they're heartless, gutless, spineless, and the ass and head are interchangeable."
***
A man goes into a job interview
A man goes into a job interview, and presents himself well.

The employer is shocked at how professional he is, "Wow, you have an incredible resume, and present yourself fantastically, but you seem to be missing 5 years on this part of your resume. What happened there?"

The man replied "Oh that's when I went to Yale."

The employer is even more impressed. "That's great, you're hired!"

The man is super happy and says "Yay I got a yob!"
***
A drill instructor was yelling at a new recruit
He was all up in this guy's face, their noses less than an inch apart.   

He screamed at the recruit, "You hate me don't you?!?"   
The recruit responded as calmly as possible, "Sir, no sir."  
The instructor yelled back, "You're going to piss on my grave if you outlive me, aren't you?!?"   
The recruit retorted, "Sir, no way. When I get out of the service, I will not fucking wait in line for anything! Sir." 
***
Neil Degrasse Tyson and Mike Tyson have something common...
I don't understand what either one is saying, but I know I'll end up seeing stars.
***
A farmer has an impotent bull.
After months of desperation and trying everything he asks for the help of a fellow farmer, who tells him to show the bull some hardcore porn. Despite the silly advice, he has nothing to lose. He sets up a projector in the barn and showers the bull with porn 24/7 for several days, and exposes him to the cows afterwards. Sure enough, the bull jumps on the first cow he lays his eyes upon and starts humping like a champ as the farmer watches in joy, which quickly turns into horror as the bull pulls out and proceeds to cum all over the cow's face.

Edit: Grammar. 
***
Four men were in a bar talking about their children.
The first guy starts, "I was worried that my son was gonna be a loser as he started washing cars. But now he has become a salesman. He is so successful that he gave his best friend a new mercedes for his birthday."

The second guy follows," I was worried about my son too because he started out raking leaves. He is also now a salesman and he's so rich that he actually gave his best friend a new bungalow for his birthday."

The third guy adds," Yeah, I hear you. My son started mopping toilets. They made him a broker now and he owns it. He is so rich that he gave his best friend 10mil in stocks for his birthday."

Lastly, the fourth guy speaks, "MY son is a complete, hopeless loser who has not even bothered to get a job. I also just found out that he's gay and has SEVERAL boyfriends. But, looking on the bright side, his boyfriends have got him a mercedes, a bungalow, and 10mil in stocks for his recent birthday.
***
"The car won't start," said a wife to her husband.
"I think there's water in the carburetor."

"How do you know?" said the husband scornfully. "You don't even know what the carburetor is."

"I'm telling you," repeated the wife, "I 'm sure there's water in the carburetor."

"We'll see," mocked the husband. "Let me check it out. Where's the car?"

"In the swimming pool."
***
Two guys sitting next to each other on a plane...
They each have one black eye. After about 20 minutes one guy finally looks to the other and says "Okay, I gotta know, how did you get yours?"

They guy laughs and shakes his head "It's actually pretty funny. I was in the airport getting a ticket for this flight and, well the woman behind the counter was this gorgeous red head with huge tits. I meant to say 'Hey, can I have a ticket to Pittsburg?', but well, I had a little slip of the tongue, and said 'Can I get a picket to titsburg', she jumped over the counter and punched me in the face." The other starts laughing hysterically. After he finally calms down, the one who answered asked "Well, how'd you get yours?"

The other guy looks at him and said "Surprisingly a similar story. I was having breakfast with my wife this morning, and I meant to say 'Can you pass the syrup' Except I stumbled on my words and had a slip of the tongue. Instead of 'Pass the syrup' it came out "you ruined my life you fucking bitch"
***
A man had some trouble lasting during sex
The doc told a guy that masturbating before sex often helped men last longer during the act. The man decided, "What the hell, I'll try it."

He spent the rest of the day thinking about where to do it. He couldn't do it in his office. He thought about the restroom, but that was too open. He considered an alley, but figured that was too unsafe.
Finally, he realized his solution.

On his way home, he pulled his truck over on the side of the highway. 
He got out and crawled underneath as if he was examining the truck.
Satisfied with the privacy, he undid his pants and started to play with his unit.
He closed his eyes and thought of his lover. As he grew closer to the big finish, he felt a quick tug at the bottom of his pants.

Not wanting to lose his mental fantasy or the orgasm, he kept his eyes shut and replied, "What?"

He heard, "This is the police. What's going on down there?"

The man replied, "I'm checking out the rear axle, it's busted."

"Well, you might as well check your brakes too while you're down there because your truck rolled down the hill 5 minutes ago."
***
Man takes his son to the police station
A man takes his son to the police station to get him a job as a cop. He meets the lieutenant and tells him. "Take my son, he's really stupid and I think he fits perfectly here."


"How stupid is he?" says the lieutenant.


"Watch this. Son, go outside and see if father is outside." The son goes outside and comes back in and says "No father, father wasn't outside."

"See? I told you he's stupid."
The lieutenant says "You're right, he could have looked through the window instead."
***
A physicist, a biologist and a statistician go hunting.
They are hiding together in the bushes and they see a deer 70ft ahead of them.  The physicist makes some calculations, aims and fires at the deer.  His shot ends up 5ft to the left of the deer.  The biologist analyzes the deer's movement, aims and fires.  His shot ends up 5ft to the right of the deer.  The statistician drops his rifle and happily shouts, "WE GOT IT!!"
***
A cop was patrolling late at night....
 A cop was patrolling late at night in a well-known spot. He sees a couple in a car, with the interior light brightly glowing. The cop carefully approaches the car to get a closer look. Then he sees a young man behind the wheel, reading a computer magazine. He immediately notices a young woman in the rear seat, knitting. Puzzled by this surprising situation, the cop walks to the car and gently raps on the driver's window. The young man lowers his window. "Uh, yes, officer?" The cop says, "What are you doing?" The young man says, "Well, Officer, I'm reading a magazine." Pointing towards the young woman in the back seat the cop says,"And her, what is she doing?" The young man shrugs, "Sir, I believe she's knitting a pullover sweater." Now, the cop is totally confused. A young couple. Alone, in a car, at night on Lover's lane....and nothing obscene is happening! The cop asks, "What's your age, young man?" The young man says, "I'm 22, sir." The cop asks, "And her what's her age?" The young man looks at his watch and replies, "She'll be 18 in 11 minutes .
***
A little old lady...
A little old lady was walking down the street dragging two large plastic garbage bags behind her. One of the bags was ripped and every once in a while a $20 fell out onto the sidewalk.

Noticing this, a policeman stopped her, and said, "Ma'am, there are $20 bills falling out of that bag." "Oh, really? Darn it!" said the little old lady. "I'd better go back and see if I can find them. Thanks for telling me officer.

"Well, now, not so fast," said the cop.“Where did you get all that money? You didn't steal it, did you?"

"Oh, no, no", said the old lady. "You see, my back yard is right next to a Golf course. A lot of Golfers come and pee through a knot hole in my fence, right into my flower Garden. It used to really tick me off. Kills the flowers, you know. Then I thought, 'why not make the best of it?

So, now, I stand behind the fence by the knot hole, real quiet, with my hedge clippers. Every time some guy sticks his thing through my fence, I surprise him, grab hold of it and say, 'O.K., buddy! Give me $20, or off it comes.'

"Well, that seems only fair," said the cop, laughing. "OK. Good luck! Oh, by the way, what's in the other bag?"

the old lady said.... "well,Not everybody pays."

***
A bar is burning to the ground, and a team of firefighters rush in to put it out.
A bar is burning to the ground and a team of firefighters rush in to put out the fire.  When they get inside they see an Irishman  passed out from smoke inhalation.  They drag him out of the bar and eventually the Irishman comes to.  The firefighter says "you were there, how did this whole thing get started?!" The Irishman responds "I don't know it was burning when I walked in"
***
A professor told dirty jokes in class
the women wanted to protest it. So they decided that in the next time that the professor will start with these kind of jokes they all will leave the class as a protest. 

Somehow the professor heard about the plan. 

In the next lecture, in the beginning of the lecture he said: "In Sweden, a prostitute makes $2000 per night." 

All the women stood up and started to leave the class. So he shouted after them: "Where are you going? The plane to Sweden doesn't take off until the day after tomorrow." 
***
Happy Hour
A guy walks into a bar and asks the bartender how much for a cup of coffee. The bartender replies: "Two cents."

The guy thinks it's a joke and asks: "Ok, how much for a beer?"

Bartender replies: "Two cents."

The guy gets angry: "And the steak dinner? How much?"

Bartender replies again: "Two cents."

The guy has had enough of the joke and says: "Can I speak to the manager?"

Bartender replies: "No, he's upstairs with my wife."

Guy: "What is he doing with your wife?"

Bartender: "The same thing I'm doing to his business."
***
A man, his wife, and his mother-in-law went on vacation to the Holy Land....
While they were there, the mother-in-law passed away. An undertaker told them "You can have her shipped home for $5,000, or you can bury her here in the Holy Land for $150."
The man thought about it and told him he would just have her shipped home. The undertaker asked "Why? Why would you spend $5,000 to ship your mother-in-law home, when it would be wonderful to have her buried here and only spend $150?"
The man said "A man died 2,000 years ago. He was buried here and 3 days later, he rose from the dead. I just can't take that chance.
***
A drunk staggers into a Catholic Church, enters a confessional booth, sits down, but says nothing.
The Priest coughs a few times to get his attention but the drunk continues to sit there.  
Finally, the Priest pounds three times on the wall.  
The drunk mumbles, "ain't no use knockin', there's no paper on this side either!"
***
A father put his 3-year-old daughter to bed...
...told her a story and listened to her prayers which ended
by saying, "God bless Mommy, God bless Daddy, God bless Grandma and good-bye Grandpa." The father asked, 'Why did you say good-bye Grandpa?' The little girl said, "I don't know daddy, it just seemed like the thing to do." The next day grandpa died. The father thought it was a strange coincidence. 

A few months later the father put the girl to bed and listened to her prayers, "God bless Mommy, God Bless Daddy and good- bye Grandma." The next day the grandmother died. "Holy crap" thought the father, "this kid is in contact with the other side." 

Several weeks later when the girl was going to bed the dad heard her say, "God bless Mommy and good-bye Daddy." He practically went into shock. He couldn't sleep all night and got up at the crack of dawn to go to his office. He was nervous as a cat all day, had lunch and watched the clock. He figured if he could get by until midnight he would be okay. He felt safe in the office, so instead of going home at the end of the day he stayed there, drinking coffee, looking at his watch and jumping at every sound. Finally midnight arrived; he breathed a sigh of relief and went home. 

When he got home his wife said, "I've never seen you work so late. What's the matter?" He said, "I don't want to talk about it, I just had the worst day of my life." She said, "You think you had a bad day? You'll never believe what happened to me. This morning my boss dropped dead in the middle of a meeting! 
***
With age comes wisdom...
A 70 year old retired Military officer  had one hobby - he loved to fish. 

He was sitting in his boat the other day when he heard a voice say, 'Pick me up.' he looked around and couldn't see anyone. 

He thought he was dreaming when he heard the voice say again, ''Pick me up.'

He looked in the water and there, floating on the top, was a frog.

The retd officer said, 'Are you talking to me ?'


The frog said, 'Yes, I'm talking to you. Pick me up, then kiss me; and I'll turn into the most beautiful woman you have ever seen. I'll make sure that all your friends are envious and jealous, because I will be your bride !'

The retired officer looked at the frog for a short time, reached over, picked it up carefully and placed it in his shirt pocket.

The frog said, 'What, are you nuts ? Didn't you hear what I said ?'
I said, 'Kiss me, and I will be your beautiful bride.'

He opened his pocket, looked at the frog and said 

'Nah. At my age, I'd rather have a talking frog.' 

***
A tourist in Spain...
A wealthy American tourist traveling in Spain goes to a fancy restaurant and requests the most expensive item on the menu. They bring him two large round balls of a very unusual looking meat. He is pleased by the size of the portions, but is wondering what kind of meat it is and asks the waiter. The waiter explains that after a bullfight, the meat is given to various charities, but the testicles of the bull are an incredible delicacy and sold to the finest restaurants. At first he is disgusted, but very curious and not wanting to be rude he takes a bite and is amazed; they're delicious!

A few days later, he decides that it was so good that he returns to the restaurant and orders the same item. "Excellent choice sir!" The waiter exclaims. But when he brings the dish to the man, the portions this time are tiny. "Wait, what?" He asks, clearly upset, "What's this?"

"Well, as you can see," The waiter responds, a little embarrassed, "The bullfighter does not always win."
***
Army Camel
A distinguished four star general is visiting his troops stationed in Iraq. While taking a tour with his first sergeant of the facility he notices a lone camel near the edge of the base. He asks his sergeant, "Why is there a camel there?" 

The sergeant answers, "Well, the men use that camel to have sex." 


Disgusted, the general says, "Get rid of that camel immediately. I will not have my troops engaging in that kind of activity, it's disgraceful."

The sergeant responds "Sir, we tried, three times, but the men keep bringing in new ones." He continues "Sir, they are out here 24 hours a day 7 days a week and there are no women on this base. They have to have sex. We can't control that. It's a morale issue." 

The General says "Well take me over there so I can get a look a this camel" The first sergeant drives him over and the General jumps out of the jeep immediately. He tears off all his clothes and goes to town on the camel. Afterward he declares, "Well that's not too bad. I guess they can keep the camel"

The sergeant replies, "Yes sir, but normally the men just ride the camel over to the whorehouse."
***
A man comes home from work...
..., sits in his lazyboy in front of the TV and rudely tells his wife, 'Gimme a beer before it starts.'
She gives him his beer.
About 15 minutes later, he says again, 'Gimme a beer before it starts.'
She does.
A few minutes later, he asks again for a beer.
The wife says, 'Don't you think you're drinking too much beer? It hasn't been half an hour that you got here and you've already had two beers. I'm getting fed up with this.'
The husband looks up and mumbles, 'Now it starts.'
***
A man and a monkey walk into a bar.
The man sits down and orders a beer.  The monkey jumps onto the bar and eats a very old olive that was sitting there.

The bartender says, "Did you see what your monkey did?  He ate that disgusting olive!"

The man says, "Oh, he does stuff like that all the time.  Just ignore it."

The man finishes his beer and he and the monkey leave.

A couple days later, the man and the monkey walk back into the bar.  The man sits down and orders a beer.  The monkey jumps onto the pool table and swallows the cue ball.

The bartender says, "Did you see what your monkey did?  He swallowed the cue ball!"

The man says, "Oh, he does stuff like that all the time.  Just ignore it."

The man finishes his beer and he and the monkey leave.

A week later, the man and the monkey walk back into the bar.  The man sits down and orders a beer.  The monkey jumps onto the bar, picks up a cherry, sticks it up his butt, pulls it out, and eats it.

The bartender says, "That is the most disgusting thing I've ever seen.  Your monkey stuck that cherry up his butt and ate it."

The man says, "Yeah, ever since the cue ball incident, he measures everything first."
***
A boy was born without a body
A boy was born without a body, no arms, no legs, he was just a head.

So for his 18th birthday his dad takes him the pub for his first pint. He takes a sip and BOOM - his body pops out. "Take another sip!" everyone shouts, then BOOM - his arms pop out. "Another!" everyone chants, so he takes another sip and his legs pop out.

The boy is really happy and he runs outside in excitement and he's hit by an oncoming truck and killed instantly.

"What a shame" his dad said. 

"He should have quit while he was ahead"
***
My wife came home from work and stormed angrily into the bedroom where I was sat.
"I get the impression you aren't being loyal to me," she said.

"Why?" I frowned.

"You've been very quiet recently. And you're always hanging around with that girl from work, Rachel?"

"Rochelle." coughed a voice from the wardrobe.
***
Forgive me Father for I have sinned.
Forgive me Father for I have sinned.............. "go on" says the priest. "I swore the other day" says the man. "continue" says the priest. "I was on the golf course the other day and i hit my drive, it was looking perfect, heading dead straight. About 200 yards down my ball hit a power line crossing the fairway". "and this is when you swore?" asked the priest. "No father, my ball then ricocheted of the power lines and flew off into the deep rough" continued the man. "this must have been when you swore?" the priest exclaimed. "No father, not yet. As i was walking over to the rough to hit my second shot a hawk flew down from the trees, picked my ball up in his beak and proceeded to fly off with it" continued the man. "Ahhh I see" says the priest "this must have been the point where you swore" "Nope not yet, as the bird flew over the green the ball fell from its mouth and landed two feet from the hole" The priest pauses for a few seconds "you missed the fucking putt didn't you?"
***
I heard this in at the barber shop from an old patron, it's my favorite joke.
There's a butcher tending to his shop when a dog walks in. 

The dog has a note in his mouth, with a $10 bill attached. 

The butcher bends down and picks the note out of the dog's mouth, reading aloud he says: "2 pork chops please" and the dog sits.

The butcher, highly impressed, packages two pork chops for the dog, wraps them up and gives the bag to the dog who picks it up and exits the shop.

The butcher was so blown away that he decided he was going to follow this dog on his journey home, and closed up shop.

With the butcher following on the way home, the dog stopped at a stop sign and waited for traffic.

The dog got to a stop light which was red, he waited for it to turn green before crossing the street.

The butcher couldn't believe what he was seeing.

Dog stopped at a bus stop, a bus bus pulled up with the dog remained on the bench. When the next bus came the dog got on and, so did the butcher.

After about five or six stops, the dog reaches his destination and him and the butcher exit the bus.

The butcher follows the dog 1 or 2 more streets around the corner, and stops short of the house at the end of the driveway.

So the dog walks up to the door, he sets the pork chops down and scratches at the door. Nobody answers the door.

The dog stood on his hind legs and scratched harder on the door. No answer.

Frustrated, the dog goes to the side of the house and uses his paw to tap on the window. He goes back to the front door, but nobody answers.

The dog begins to become frantic, and starts to hurl his body at the door slamming into it as loud as possible. He slams and slams and slams.

After about a minute of this, finally somebody opens the door. The dog's owner was not happy to see him, he immediately started to yell and hit the dog, calling him a complete idiot.

The butcher, who is all this happening, ran up the driveway to the owner of the dog to get him to stop. "No!" He exclaimed, "This dog is a genius! I just followed him home, you wouldn't believe what I saw him do to get here!"

"*Oh really?!*" Says the owner, "*Well this is the third time he's forgot his keys this week!!*"

Edit: glad you guys liked it!!
***
A mother has two daughters and a son.
A mother has two daughters and a son. One day her first daughter comes up to her and says: "Mother, why am I named Rose?", to which she replies: "That's because when you were a baby a rose landed on your head".

Her second daughter later comes up to her and says: "Mother, why am I called Petal?", to which she answers: "That's because when you were a baby a petal landed on your head".

Finally, her son approaches her and says: "BLUH NAH BUH BUH BLUH", and the mother says: "Shut up, Fridge".
***
A man is in court for murder
So a man is in court and is suspected of murder. His defense lawyer is at the last legs of his argument. In one final attempt, he says to the court

 "In ten seconds the man my client is suspected of murdering will walk into the courtroom completely unharmed".

 The defense lawyer counts down from ten and everybody looks to the door. Nothing happens.

 " Ah ha!" says the defense "you all looked to the door, therefor I conclude that their is reasonable doubt in this case and ask that my client be found not guilty."

 The jury then deliberates. After twenty-five minutes they return the verdict of guilty. "But you all looked!" Says the lawyer. "Yes," says the Jury, "but your client didn't."
***
A married couple and a single man are stranded on an island
After a few weeks the single man is getting very horny.  The married woman one day whispers to him, "I'd love to help you out but my husband wouldn't stand for it, and as you know, it's a tiny island with only one tree."  The single man says, "It's ok.  I'll think of something."  Every day they take turns climbing the tree to search the horizon for passing ships. One day it is the single man's turn and he looks down at the couple and yells,"Hey!  Quit that fucking down there!"  The married man is confused, because he's sitting at least 10 feet away from his wife.  The next day it's the married man's turn in the tree.  After a while he looks down and thinks to himself, "Well I'll be damned.  It DOES look like they're fucking from up here."
***
A man and a woman who had never met before but were both married to other people found themselves assigned to the same sleeping compartment on a trans-continental train...
though initially embarrassed and uneasy over sharing a room, they were both very tired and fell asleep quickly, he in the upper bunk and she in the lower. At 1 a.m., the man leaned down and gently woke the woman saying, "ma'am, I'm sorry to bother you, but would you be willing to reach into the closet and get me a second blanket? I'm awfully cold." "I have a better idea," she replied. "just for tonight, let's pretend that we're married." "Wow! that's a great idea!" he exclaimed. "Good," she replied. "get your own fucking blanket." After a moment of silence, he farted.
***
Dumb Fucks
"Look at that dumb fuck, Daddy," said my 3-year-old from his car seat.
 
"Where?" I asked. There were quite a few around us, he could have been talking about any of them.
 
"The white one," he continued.
 
That narrowed it down. There was only one that fit that description.
 
"That dumb fuck is dirty," he said. "Why is that dumb fuck so dirty?"
 
It was a good question, a question a child might ask, but not a childish question.
 
"Some are dirtier than others," I replied. "It comes with the territory."
 
We were sitting outside Starbucks waiting for my wife. We were passing the time the way men do, talking about our feelings and cursing a little - some of us more than others.
 
"Do you like dumb fucks, Daddy?" he asked. It had an added air of the rhetorical.
 
"I don't like being too close to them," I answered. "They are pretty fun to watch, though."
 
My wife returned with our coffee and took a seat in the car.
 
"Mommy, did you see all the dumb fucks?"
 
I knew that she had.
 
"Honey," she said with a straight face. "They're called dump trucks."
 
"Dumb fucks," he repeated.
 
"Exactly," I told him, and we sipped our coffee as he watched the last one rumble past.
***
There are three religious truths:
 Jews do not recognize Jesus as the Messiah. 

Protestants do not recognize the Pope as the leader of the Christian faith. 

Baptists do not recognize each other in the liquor store or Hooters.

***
Little Billy came home from school one day...
He asks his mother "Mom, what is a blowjob?"

She stammers, and a look of terror washes over her face as she tries to think of an appropriate response. 
Overhearing this, Dad heroically swoops in to her rescue..

"Little Billy, she doesn't know."
***
A blonde girl in second grade comes home one day really excited with a large grin on her face,
Running to her mother she says, "Mom!! mom! Today the teacher asked what letter comes after S, and i was the first in class to say T! Is it because I'm smarter?" Her mom sighs, "Yes honey."

The very next day she runs home from school and with a large proud smile on her face she tells her mother, "Guess what mom the teacher gave us a sum 12+15 and i got it right, 27! see see?" She says showing her math book. "Is it because i'm smarter than them mom?" Her mom looks down and sighs once more, "Yes dear."

The following day the blond girl half runs all the way home grinning. Breathlessly she goes to her mother, " Mommy we went swimming today and guess what? All the girls had small titties and look! I had these" She promptly lifts her shirt to reveal two whopping perfectly round full size D breasts. "Is it.. is it because i'm smarter mom?" Her mom sighs and looks the other way. "No honey, it's because you're 24."
***
The teacher asked Jimmy, "Why is your cat at school today Jimmy?"
Jimmy replied crying, "Because I heard my daddy tell my mommy, 'I am going to eat that p*ssy once Jimmy leaves for school today!'"
***
An Old guy sits at a bar and starts drinking...
...he drinks and drinks until he is quite drunk... 

Then a HUGE and very menacing looking guy enters the bar and sits next to the old drunk guy and asks for a beer... after a while the old guy turns to the huge fellow and spurts out: 

-"you know... i fucked your mother" 

The bartender just freezes and looks over at the huge guy... he just looks at the drunk man and grunts as he understands its only an old drunk fellow mouthing off...

But then the old guy says: 

-"yeah... i fucked her, and i have to say, i also fucked her up the ass!"

The big guy ignores the guy, but looks a bit annoyed.

The old guy turns around, and he seems to be over talking, but he then says to himself clearly speaking so the big guy can hear him:

-"you know what?? i just remembered, i also came in your MOTHERS FACE!!!"

The big guys still says nothing... but is clearly starting to lose his temper...

So the old guy yells "YEAH I FUCKED YOUR MOTHER UP THE ASS, CAME ON HER FACE AND I HAVE TO TELL YOU SOMETHING ELSE... SHE SWALLOWS!! THE DIRTY WHORE!"

The whole bar is totally silent, and The big guy cant take it anymore, he stands up making his stool fall to the floor loudly, he turns over to the old guy and says "lets go home Dad, you are way too drunk..."
***
How old do you think I am?
A woman decided to have a face lift for her birthday. 

She spent $5000 and felt really good about the results. 

On her way home she stopped at a dress shop to look around. 
As she was leaving, she said to the sales clerk, "I hope you 
don't mind me asking, but how old do you think I am?"

"About 35," was the reply. 

"I'm actually 47," the woman said, feeling really happy. 

After that she went into McDonalds for lunch and asked the order 
taker the same question. He replied, "Oh, you look about 29." 

"I am actually 47!" she said, feeling really good. 

While standing at the bus stop she asked an old man the same question. 
He replied, "I am 85 years old and my eyesight is going. But when I 
was young there was a sure way of telling a woman's age. If I put my 
hand up your skirt I will be able to tell your exact age."

There was no one around, so the woman said, "What the hell?" and let 
him slip his hand up her skirt.

After feeling around for a while, the old man said, "OK, You are 47."

Stunned, the woman said, "That was brilliant! How did you do that?" 

The old man replied, "I was behind you in line at McDonalds."
***
Pretend Marriage
A man and a woman who had never met before, but who were both married to other people, found themselves assigned to the same sleeping room on a trans-continental train.

Though initially embarrassed and uneasy over sharing a room, they were both very tired and fell asleep quickly, he in the upper berth and she in the lower.

At 1:00 AM, the man leaned down and gently woke the woman saying “‘Ma'am, I'm sorry to bother you, but would you be willing to reach into the closet to get me a second blanket – I'm awfully cold.”

“I have a better idea,” she replied “Just for tonight,…… let's pretend that we're married.”

“Wow!…That's a great idea!”, he exclaimed.

“Good,” she replied…. “Get your own fucking blanket.”


***
Indian Joke about Weather
Fall was upon a remote reservation when the Indian tribe asked their new Chief what the coming winter was going to be like. The modern day Chief had never been taught the secrets of the ancients. When he looked at the sky he couldn't tell what the winter was going to be like.

Better safe than sorry, he said to himself and told his tribe that the winter was indeed expected to be cold and that the members of the village should stock up on firewood to be prepared. 

After several days, our modern Chief got an idea. He went to the phone booth, called the National Weather Service and asked, "Is the coming winter going to be cold?"

"It looks like this winter is going to be quite cold," the meteorologist at the weather service responded.

So the Chief went back to his people and told them to collect even more firewood in order to be prepared. A week later he called the National Weather Service again. "Does it still look like it is going to be a very cold winter?"

"Yes," the man at National Weather Service again replied, "It's going to be a very cold winter."

The Chief again went back to his people and ordered them to collect every scrap of firewood they could find. Two weeks later the Chief called the National Weather Service again. "Are you absolutely sure that the winter is going to be very cold?"

"Absolutely," the man replied. "It's looking more and more like it is going to be one of the coldest winters ever."

"How can you be so sure?" the Chief asked.

The weatherman replied, "The Indians are collecting firewood like crazy."
***
A boy is going to buy tickets to prom...
...for him and his girlfriend.  The line for the tickets is very long, but he waits it out.  He then goes to rent a limousine and again there was a long line and again he waited it out.  He needs one more thing, a tuxedo.  So he goes to buy one and there's a long line, but he waits this one out too.  So now comes the prom he and his girlfriend arrive in their newly rented limo, him in his tux and his girlfriend in her beautiful dress.  They get into the prom and his girlfriend asks him to get her some punch.  So he walks over to where the punch is, and there's no punch line.
***
I don't see why racists are upset with Harriet Tubman being on the $20 bill...
They can finally legally own a black person again. 
***
Hillary Clinton lost last time to the first African American president, Barack Obama. Why will she lose this one to Donald Trump?
Because orange is the new black.
***
"Mr. Smith, I have reviewed this case very carefully,"
the divorce court judge said, " and I've decided to give your wife $275 a week. ". "That's very fair, your honour," the husband said. "And every now and then I'll try to send her a few bucks myself. "
***
A goat gets his wish granted by a genie.
He wishes to be turned into a human being. After his transformation, the, now, man is so grateful to the genie. He asks "How can I ever repay you?"

The genie just has this request: That the man make the most of his life and live like no man has lived before; love like no man has loved before; and care like no man has cared before. The man obliges.

He first sets out to find his "calling". Over the years, he works many jobs. He finds himself becoming depressed with the monotony that he has come to know. Finally, he decides to go back to his roots and do what he knows. He becomes a farmer. With the money he has accumulated from his many professions, he buys a large farm where he decides to take in unwanted and ill animals. Goats (obviously), pigs, cows, cats, dogs, and various other animals. He cares for them. He comes to know and understand them. He has a deep connection with them.

One day, a woman brings her dog to the man's farm. She is worried about the dog. She says ever since the dog's sibling died, he hasn't seemed right. The man agrees to take the dog and care for it. He knows the other animals will comfort it and the dog will enjoy his new family. The woman comes to visit the dog regularly. She becomes familiar with all of the other animals on the farm, and most of all, the man. They spend hours together each visit. Talking and taking care of the animals together. Hours turn to days. Days to weeks. The man asks the woman to live with him and his animals. The woman obliges. They are in love. They are truly happy.

The genie comes to the man one night in his dreams. The genie says to the man "You have lived like no other man; you have loved like no other man; and you have cared like no other man. You have done well".

The man wakes up the next morning and he doesn't feel well. He can't explain it, but somethings not right. Weeks go by and the man's condition seems to worsen. His doctors cannot explain his rapidly deteriorating health. The woman is always by his side when she's not caring for his animals. The woman's dog sleeps at the foot of his bed. Never leaving. At last, it seems like he cannot hold on for much longer. He's barely able to speak at this point. He motions for the woman to come near. He says to her "Do you want to know why I fell in love with you all those years ago? Do you want to know why I love you more and more every day?"

She says, "Yes, my love, tell me."

With his final breath, he tells her "Because you make me feel like a kid again."
***
A mans wife goes into a coma.
After about two weeks of being in a coma a nurse enters her room to give her a sponge bath. As the nurse starts to clean her pelvic region the woman's pulse increases and shows a sign of acknowledgement. Excited, the nurse runs from the room and fetches the head nurse. The head nurse watches as the nurse shows her the positive reaction this woman is having to the contact in her pleasure zone. The head nurse immediately contacts the husband and gets him to the hospital. When he arrives the head nurse says, " you need to give her oral sex, this may bring her out of a coma." The husband gets overly excited and agrees to do it. The nurse show the husband in, and closes the drapes around the bed for privacy. The nurse is in the next room monitoring the patients heart rate. The pulse increases and suddenly flat lines. The nurse immediately runs into the room to see what had happened. She finds the husband panicking. He looks at her and says, "I think she choked!"


Did not expect to get such amazing comments!
***
The priest, laywer, and engineer
By chance, a priest, a laywer, and an engineer find themselves in line to be guillotined.  They demand that the priest steps up, and he reluctantly does so.  They put his head in the guillotine and pull the rope, but to everyone's surprise, nothing happens.  The priest declares that he was saved by divine intervention, and they let him go.

They then make the lawyer step up to the guillotine.  They pull the rope and again, nothing happens.  The lawyer reminds them that he cannot be executed twice for the same crime, and so they reluctantly let him go.

Then they make the engineer step up, and they put his head in the guillotine.  The engineer says, "Oh wait, *here's* your problem.."
***
So a grocer is restocking the vegetables...
When a woman taps him on the shoulder and says "Excuse me Sir, but where do you keep the broccoli?" The man replies "Well ma'am we're out of broccoli today, but we get some more tomorrow so come back then." The woman nods and walks away while the grocer continues stocking the carrots. A few minutes later the same woman taps the grocer on the shoulder and asks "Sir, I was wondering where I could find the broccoli?" Confused, the grocer says "Well ma'am we are out of broccoli today. However, we will have more tomorrow morning. Come back tomorrow." The woman smiles and thanks him as she walks away. Shaking his head, the grocer turns his attention back to the carrots. Moments later the woman again taps him on the shoulder and asks "Pardon me, but do you know where the broccoli is?" The grocer looks at her angrily and says "Let me ask you something. How do you spell dog, like in dogmatic?" The woman replies "D-O-G" "Okay" says the grocer. "Now how do you spell cat, as in catatonic?" "C-A-T" says the woman. "Perfect" the grocer replies. "Now how do you spell fuck, like in broccoli?" Confused, the woman says "But, there is no fuck in broccoli." The grocer says "THAT'S WHAT I'VE BEEN TRYING TO TELL YA LADY! THERE'S NO FUCKIN' BROCCOLI!"
***
A truck driver pulls up to a rest stop to grab a quick meal
A big gang of bikers come in after him. They start to screw with the truck driver, throw food on him, etc, trying to start a fight or something. However the trucker doesn't fight back or say anything at all really. Finally he gets up, pays his bill, and leaves.

After he is gone the leader of the gang says to the waitress, "He wasn't much of a man, was he?"

The waitress takes a look out the window and says "Well he isn't much of a truck driver either, he just ran over seventeen motorcycles!"
***
A Man and a Genie
One day a man was waking along the beach when he tripped over a lamp. He turned around and kicked the lamp out of anger. A few seconds later, a genie popped out of the lamp.



Reluctantly, the genie said, "Even though you kicked me, I still have to give you three wishes. However, because of what you did, I will also give twice what you wish for to the person you hate the most: your boss."



So the man agreed and made his first wish. "I want lots of money", he said. Instantly 22 million dollars appeared in the man's bank account and 44 million appeared in his boss' account.



For his second wish, the man wished for a couple of sports cars. Instantly a Lamborghini, Ferrari and Porsche appeared. At the same time two of each car appeared outside of his boss' house.



Finally the genie said, "This is your last wish, you should choose carefully," and to this the man replied, "I've always wanted to donate a kidney..." 
***
Congress gets kidnapped
A driver was stuck in a traffic jam on the highway outside Washington, DC.

Nothing was moving.

Suddenly, a man knocks on the window.
The driver rolls down the window and asks, "What's going on?"

"Terrorists have kidnapped the entire US Congress, and they're asking for a $100 million dollar ransom. Otherwise, they are going to douse them all in gasoline and set them on fire.

We are going from car to car, collecting donations."

"How much is everyone giving, on an average?" the driver asks.

The man replies, "Roughly a gallon."
***
Three sports fans leave a bar...
(Insert teams A, B and C as you like. This is how I know it.)

Three baseball fans walk out of a bar. They turn a corner and see a pair of legs sticking out from behind a bush. They push the bush aside and find a woman dead and completely naked. They call the police and as they wait, they decide to cover the woman up. 

The Cubs fan takes of his hat and covers her left breast. The Royals (my team) fan takes off his hat and covers her right breast. The Yankees fan takes off his hat and covers her crotch. 

The police arrive. The detective walks around the scene and writes in his little book. He lifts the Cubs hat, looks underneath, sets it back down and writes in his little book. He lifts the Royals hat, looks underneath, sets it back down and writes in his little book. He the lifts the Yankees hat, looks underneath, starts to set it back down, stops, does a double-take, sets the hat back down slowly and starts to write in the little book. 

The Yankees fan is upset by this. He asks, "What was that?  Haven't you seen one of those before?"  The detective replies, "You misunderstand. Normally when I look under a Yankees hat, I see an asshole."
***
A man goes to his Rabbi
"Rabbi, I think my wife is trying to poison me!"

"Very interesting," says the Rabbi. "Let me go and talk to her and see what I can find out."

A few hours later the Rabbi calls the man up.

"I've spent several hours speaking with your wife," he says.

"What should I do?" the man asked.

"Take the poison."
***
So a holocaust survivor wins the lottery...
So Moishe wins the lottery, reporters start asking this Holocaust survivor about his plans for the money. without hesitation he says he is going to commission a statue of adolf Hitler...  the reporters are stunned and ask why a survivor of such an atrocity would do such a thing.   Moishe rolls up his sleeve - "he gave me the winning numbers"
***
There's a boy named Bonnie...
There's a boy named Bonnie. 

He's made fun of throughout high school because of his weird name, and so he's become very shy. 

But he has a crush on a girl and works up the courage to ask her out. 

She says yes, and he's so happy.


After years of dating, he works up the courage to ask her to marry him. 

She says yes, and he's so happy.

When their first child is born, a girl, he lets the wife name her, because he still feels so lucky and fortunate just to be with her.
 
The wife names the baby "Love".

Love grows up and now she starts to be made fun of because of her weird name. 

She comes home from school one day screaming at her dad, asking why he gave her such a stupid name. 

He takes blame, wanting to protect his wife, and apologizes.

Love says he ruined her life. 

She shoots him and runs away.

Finally the wife comes home, sees Bonnie lying on the ground, screams and runs to him.

"Bonnie! What happened?!"

He becons her to come closer, and he whispers in her ear: *"Shot through the heart. And you're to blame. Darling you gave Love a bad name."*
***
Boobs vs willies
A family is at the dinner table. The son asks the father, “Dad, how many kinds of boobs are there?” The father, surprised, answers, “Well, son, a woman goes through three phases. In her 20s, a woman’s breasts are like melons, round and firm. In her 30s and 40s, they are like pears, still nice, hanging a bit. After 50, they are like onions.” “Onions?” the son asks. “Yes. You see them and they make you cry.” This infuriated his wife and daughter. The daughter asks, “Mom, how many different kinds of willies are there?” The mother smiles and says, “Well, dear, a man goes through three phases also. In his 20s, his willy is like an oak tree, mighty and hard. In his 30s and 40s, it’s like a birch, flexible but reliable. After his 50s, it’s like a Christmas tree.” “A Christmas tree?” the daughter asks. “Yes, dead from the root up and the balls are just for decoration.”
***
My neighbour owes me £500 and he won’t pay up...
A man went to his lawyer and told him, ‘My neighbour owes me £500 and he won’t pay up.  What should I do?’  ‘Do you have any proof he owes you the money?’ asked the lawyer.  ‘Nope,’ replied the man.  ‘OK, then write him a letter asking him for the £1,000 he owed you,’ said the lawyer.  ‘But it’s only £500,’ replied the man. ‘Precisely.  That’s what he will reply and then you’ll have your proof!’
***
The Truth About Managers
A man is flying in a hot air balloon and realizes he is lost.  He reduces height and spots a man down below. He lowers the balloon further and shouts: :Excuse me, can you help me? I promised my friend I would meet him half an hour ago, but I don’t know where I am.”

The man below says: “Yes. You are in a hot air balloon, hovering approximately 30 feet above this field. You are between 40 and 42 degrees N. latitude, and between 58 and 60 degrees W. longitude.”

“You must be an engineer” says the balloonist.

“I am” replies the man. “How did you know?”

“Well” says the balloonist, “everything you have told me is technically correct, but I have no idea what to make of your information, and the fact is I am still lost.”

The man below says “You must be a manager.”

“I am” replies the balloonist, “but how did you know?”

“Well”, says the man, “you don’t know where you are, or where you are going. You have made a promise which you have no idea how to keep, and you expect me to solve your problem. The fact is you are in the exact same position you were in before we met, but now it is somehow my fault.”
***
The church was looking for a new bell ringer...
..and they put out an advertisment to find someone. After weeks of waiting, a man with no arms shows to apply. The clergy decided to let him try, given that no one else has shown up. They ascend up to the top of the bell tower and the priest tells the armless man to just have at it. The armless man steps up to bell, and just savagely bangs his head against the side of it until he falls over, dead. The clergy, clearly shocked, run down to the congregation gathered and ask, 

"Did any of you know that man?"

And some else shouts, "No, but I think his face rings a bell!"
***
PS4/Xbox joke
Oh no! Playstation and xbox online services are down! Someone call an ambulance! Wii U Wii U Wii U
***
A couple wants to have a quickie...
...but their son is in the house. So they tell him to go out on the balcony and tell them what's going on in the neighborhood while they do their thing. He proceeds to the balcony and begins reporting what he sees. "Looks like the Jeffersons got a new dog." he said. "Oh! And the Alans are moving out." he exclaimed. "Look at that. Looks like the Johnsons are having sex." The couple stops dead. "How do you know the Johnsons are making love?" said the boys father. After a short pause he replies, "Because their kid is out on the balcony."
***
A man is walking through his local mall and noticed a Mexican book store.
So he decides to go in because he has never seen Mexican book store before. He browses through the store, and then he finally asks the clerk "do you have the book on Donald Trump's foreign policies with Mexico?" The clerk replies "fuck you, get out, stay out!".  The man replies " yeah, that's the one!"
***
An American walks into a swiss bank with two large bags
He walks up to a teller and says quietly "I have 2 million dollars in cash that I need to deposit into a swiss bank account now"

The teller replies "Sir, there's no need to whisper, poverty is nothing to be ashamed of in Switzerland."
***
Midnight Surprise!
A colleague approached this man at lunch and invited him out for a few beers after work. The man said that his wife would never go for it, and that she does not allow him to go drinking with the guys after work.

 The colleague suggested a way to overcome that problem, "When you get home tonight, sneak into the house, slide down under the sheets, gently pull down your wife's panties, and give her oral sex. Women love it, and believe me, she'll never mention that you were out late with the boys."

 So the man agreed to try it, and went out and enjoyed himself. Late that night, he sneaked into the house, slid down under the sheets, gently slid down his wife's panties, and gave her oral sex. She moaned and groaned with pleasure, but after a little while, he realised he had to take a leak, so he told her he'd be right back, got out of bed and walked down the hall to the bathroom.

 When he opened the door and went in, he was very surprised to see his wife sitting on the john.

 "How did you get in here?" he asked. "Shhhhhh!" she replied, "you'll wake-up my mother!"
***
Reasonable Doubt
A defendant was on trial for murder. There was strong evidence indicating guilt, but there was no corpse. 

In the defense’s closing statement the lawyer, knowing that his client would probably be convicted, resorted to a trick. 

"Ladies and gentlemen of the jury, I have a surprise for you all," the lawyer said as he looked at his watch. "Within one minute, the person presumed dead in this case will walk into this courtroom." 

He looked toward the courtroom door. The jurors, somewhat stunned, all looked on eagerly. A minute passed. Nothing happened. 

Finally the lawyer said, "Actually, I made up the previous statement. But you all looked on with anticipation. I, therefore, put it to you that there is reasonable doubt in this case as to whether anyone was killed and insist that you return a verdict of not guilty." 

The jury, clearly confused, retired to deliberate. A few minutes later, the jury returned and pronounced a verdict of guilty. 

"But how?" inquired the lawyer. "You must have had some doubt; I saw all of you stare at the door.

The jury foreman answered: "Oh, we looked. But your client didn’t."
***
Letter to God
Dear God,

Last week, you took my favorite boxer; Muhammed Ali. 
Today, you took my favorite hockey player; Gordie Howe.
I just want to let you know that my favorite candidate is Donald Trump.
***
Man in ecstasy...
He was in ecstasy, with a huge smile on his face, as his wife moved forward, then backwards, forward, then backwards again, back and forth, back and forth...in and out...in and out.

It was going on 20 minutes at this point...

Her heart was pounding...her face was flushed...then she moaned, softly at first, then began to groan louder. 

Finally, totally exhausted, she let out an almighty scream and shouted:

*"OK, OK! I can't park the damn car! You do it, you smug bastard!"*
***
A piece of rope walks into a bar...
Bartender says, "Sorry, we don't serve rope here"

Rope walks outside, frizzes up his hair, and ties himself in a knot, and walks back into the bar.

Bartender says "Hey, aren't you the same piece of rope that I just kicked out of here?"

Rope says "No, I'm a frayed knot"
***
The KGB, the FBI and the CIA are all trying to prove that they are the best at catching criminals
The Secretary General of the UN decides to give them a test. He releases a rabbit into a forest and each of them has to catch it.

The CIA goes in. They place animal informants throughout the forest. They question all plant and mineral witnesses. After three months of extensive investigations they conclude that rabbits do not exist.

The FBI goes in. After two weeks with no leads they burn the forest, killing everything in it, including the rabbit, and they make no apologies. The rabbit had it coming.

The KGB goes in. They come out two hours later with a badly beaten bear. The bear is screaming: "Okay! Okay! I'm a rabbit! I'm a rabbit!"
***
A drunk guy calls a radio station...
...and tells the RJ,"I found this purse outside Raven's club. It has 1500 dollars in cash, a credit card, an iPhone 6s, and a driving license with Rebecca's name on it."  
The RJ asks in an impressed tone,"It was good of you to call us. Do you need my help contacting her so that you can return the purse?"  
  
"No. I just wanted to request a sad song for Rebecca."
***
Heisenberg, Schrodinger and Ohm are in a car and get pulled over...
Heisenberg is driving and the cop asks him, "Do you know how fast you were going?"

"No but I know exactly where I am" Heisenberg replied.

The cop says "You were doing 55 in a 35." Heisenberg throws up his hands and shouts "GREAT! Now I'm Lost!"

The cop thinks this is suspicious and orders him to pop open the trunk.  He checks it out and says "Do you know you have a dead cat back here?"

"We do now, asshole!" shouts Schrodinger.

The cop moves to arrest them. Ohm resists. 
***
I was waiting at a stop light yesterday...
Up next to me pulled a small car. It was full of Muslim terrorist types shouting in a foreign language. The car had a half burnt American flag hanging on the side with "Remember 911" spray painted on the side. One of the men stuck his head out the window and shouted "Death to America!!!" They sped off right after before the light changed to green.

Out of nowhere an 18 wheeler slammed into the side of the car, crushing it and killing them all instantly. 

I sat for a minute in shock. I thought to myself, that could have been me.

So this morning I went out and got a job as a truck driver.
***
A lady walks into a bar…
She orders a drink and notices a frog in a cage behind the bar. She asks the bartender about it and the bartender says this frog performs oral sex on women. The woman has a few more drinks and her curiosity gets the best of her so she asks the bartender to have the frog go down on her. She gets up on the bar in the appropriate position and the bartender puts the frog there and tells it to do its thing. The frog just sits there. The bartender moves the frog to the side and says, "I'm only going to show you one more time!"
***
The best jokes also teach you something.
In 1954 John Stapp broke a huge record. Using a rocket powered sled that was going 632 mph, he came to a full stop in just over 1 second. He experienced 46.2 G's making his 168 pound body feel for an instant like it was 7,700 pounds and he STILL only felt half as fat as yo mamma. 
***
Three priests walk into a bar
and see a man whos already had a few drinks. The man walks up to them and says "you know I'm jesus christ". One of the priests replies "I don't think you are son" so the man says right, I'll prove it to you. He walks out of the bar and a few seconds later comes stumbling back in. The barman sees him and shout "jesus christ not you again"
***
How many Trump supporters does it take to change a lightbulb?
Look, we can change the lightbulb. That I will tell you. We're changing it, ok? And I understand what you're saying, I hear it all the time. People call me and say "Is the lightbulb really dead?". Thats what they are asking me, its unbelievable. The lightbulb is in big trouble, that I can tell you. But we are going to change it. 
***
How do '90s kids count to 6?
Uno, dos, tres, cuatro, cinco, cinco, seis. 
***
The Priests Rooster
The Priest of a small village was very fond of his flock of ten hens and a cockerel.

He kept them in a hen house behind the parish, but one Saturday night, the cockerel was missing.

The priest, suspecting fowl play decided to say something about it at church the next morning.

At Mass, he asked the congregation, has anyone got a cock? To which all the men stood up.

"No,no," he said, somewhat flustered, "that's not what I meant. "Has anybody SEEN a cock?" All the women stood up.

"No, no," he said. "Thats not what I meant either. Has anyone seen a cock that doesn't belong to them." Half the women stood up.

"No, no," He said, now thoroughly embarrassed "Perhaps I should rephrase the question: Has anybody here seen MY cock?" All the choirboys stood up.
***
A young man goes into a drugstore to buy condoms.
The pharmacist says the condoms come in packs of 3, 9 or 12 and asks which the young man wants.

"Well," he said, "I've been seeing this girl for a while and she's really hot. I want the condoms because I think tonight's "the" night. We're having dinner with her parents, and then we're going out. And I've got a feeling I'm gonna get lucky after that. Once she's had me, she'll want me all the time, so you'd better give me the 12 pack."

The young man makes his purchase and leaves.

Later that evening, he sits down to dinner with his girlfriend and her parent's. He asks if he might give the blessing, and they agree. He begins the prayer, but continues praying for several minutes. 

The girl leans over and says, "You never told me that you were such a religious person." He leans over to her and whispers, "You never told me that your father is a pharmacist."

Edit: My second consecutive post to hit over 1000 upvotes! Thanks everyone. I'm so happy right now! 

Edit 2: 3000+!!!!!!!!!!!
***
There are 500 bricks on a plane, one falls off how many are left?
499.

What are the three steps to putting an elephant in a refrigerator?

Open fridge, put an elephant in, close fridge.

What are the four steps to putting a giraffe in a fridge?

Open fridge, take elephant out, put giraffe in, close fridge.

The lion king is having a birthday party. All the animals attend but one. Which animal is it and why?

The giraffe because he's stuck in the
fridge.

Sally wants to cross an alligator infested river. There is no bridge and the only way she can get across is by swimming. She swims across and makes it to the other side safely, how?

The alligators are all at the birthday party.

Sally dies anyways. Why?

She got hit in the head by a flying brick.
***
Daughters vibrator
A mother was walking down the hall when she heard a humming sound coming from her daughter's bedroom. 
When she opened the door she found her daughter naked on the bed with a vibrator. 

What are you doing?" she exclaimed. 

The daughter replied, "I'm 35 and still living at home with my parents and this is the closest I'll ever get to a husband."

Later that week the father was in the kitchen and heard a humming sound coming from the basement. 
When he went downstairs, he found his daughter naked on the sofa with her vibrator. 

"What are you doing?" he exclaimed.

The daughter replied, "I'm 35 and still living at home with my parents and this is the closest I'll ever get to a husband."

A couple of days later the mother heard the humming sound again, this time in the living room. 
In there, she found her husband watching the Super Bowl on television with the vibrator buzzing away beside him.

"What are you doing?" she exclaimed. 

He replied............"Watching the game with my son-in-law."
***
When an Amish sees an elevator for the first time...
A fifteen-year-old Amish boy and his father were in the new mall. They were amazed by almost everything they saw, but especially by two shiny, silver walls that could move apart and then slide back together again. The boy asked, "What is this, Father?" The father (never having seen an elevator) responded, "Son, I have never seen anything like this in my life, I don't know what it is." While the boy and his father were watching with amazement, a fat old lady in a wheelchair moved up to the moving walls and pressed a button. The walls opened, and the lady rolled between them into a small room. The walls closed and the boy and his father watched the small numbers above the walls light up sequentially. They continued to watch until it reached the last number and then the numbers began to light in the reverse order. Finally, the walls opened up again and a gorgeous 24-year-old woman stepped out. The father, not taking his eyes off the young woman, said quietly to his son, "Go get your mother."
***
classic germans
Angela Merkel arrives at Passport Control at Paris airport.

"Nationality?" asks the immigration officer.

"German," she replies.

"Occupation?"

"No, just here for a few days."
***
Stripper from the bachelor party
A guy goes to the supermarket and notices an attractive woman waving at him. She says hello. He’s rather taken aback because he can’t place where he knows her from. So he says, "Do you know me?" To which she replies, "I think you’re the father of one of my kids." Now his mind travels back to the only time he has ever been unfaithful to his wife and says, "My God, are you the stripper from my bachelor party that I made love to on the pool table with all my buddies watching while your partner whipped my butt with wet celery?" She looks into his eyes and says calmly, "No, I’m your son’s teacher."
***
Little doctor Johnny
A woman brings 10 year old Johnny home and tells his mother that she caught him playing Doctors and Nurses with her 10 year old daughter, Mary.

Johnny's mother says, 'Lets not be too harsh on them, they are bound to be curious about sex at that age.'

'Curious about sex? He's taken her fucking appendix out!'

***
One afternoon a lawyer was riding in his limousine when he saw two men along the road-side eating grass.
Disturbed, he ordered his driver to stop and got out to investigate.  
He asked one man, "Why are you eating grass?" 
"We don't have any money for food," the poor man replied. "We have to eat grass."  
"Well, then, you can come with me to my house and I'll feed you," the lawyer said.  
"But sir, I have a wife and two children with me. They are over there, under that tree."  
"Bring them along," the lawyer replied.  
Turning to the other poor man he stated, "You may come with us, also."  
The second man, in a pitiful voice, then said, "But sir, I also have a wife and SIX children with me!"  

"Bring them all as well," the lawyer answered.  
They all entered the car, which was no easy task, even for a car as large as the limousine was.  
Once under way, one of the poor fellows turned to the lawyer and said, "Sir, you are too kind."   
"Thank you for taking all of us with you.  
The lawyer replied, "Glad to do it. You'll really love my place. The grass is almost a foot high."   
***
Gays in the military
"If gay men were allowed in the army, Saving Private Ryan will be a lot shorter, because it wouldn’t take them 3 hours to find Matt Damon"

— Adam Hills
***
A guy takes a girl to the state fair for their first date.
The guy asks her what she wants to do, she says, "I want to get weighed." So they visit the weighing booth, where the worker attempts to guess her weight. He guesses wrong the first time, and she gets a teddy bear.

They get some funnel cake and play whack-a-mole, until the guy asks again, "I'm having a really great time with you. Now what do you want to do?" She replies, "I want to get weighed!" Confused because they'd already done this, the boy takes her to a different weighing station, and the person there also guesses wrong. She wins a goldfish.

After some cotton candy and a merry go round ride, he asks for the third time, "Wow, babe, that was really fun, but what do you want to do now?" Frustrated, the girl says, "I want to get WEIGHED!" And the guy is exasperated, but takes her to another weighing station, where the worker actually guesses her weight correctly. But by now, the boy is really irritated and drops off the girl at home without so much as a kiss.

When the girl returned, her mother asked, "How was your date, sweetie?"

"Wousy," the girl replied.
***
The meaning of life....
On the first day, God created the dog and said, "Sit all day by the door of your house and bark at anyone who comes in or walks past. For this, I will give you a life span of twenty years."The dog said, "That's a long time to be barking. How about only ten years and I'll give you back the other ten?"

So God agreed...... On the second day, God created the monkey and said, "Entertain people, do tricks, and make them laugh. For this, I'll give you a twenty-year life span."

The monkey said, "Monkey tricks for twenty years? That's a pretty long time to perform. How about I give you back ten like the dog did?"

And God agreed......

On the third day, God created the cow and said, "You must go into the field with the farmer all day long and suffer under the sun, have calves and give milk to support the farmer's family. For this, I will give you a life span of sixty years."

The cow said, "That's kind of a tough life you want me to live for sixty years. How about twenty and I'll give back the other forty?"

And God agreed again...... On the fourth day, God created humans and said, "Eat, sleep, play, marry and enjoy your life. For this, I'll give you twenty years."

But the human said, "Only twenty years? Could you possibly give me my twenty, the forty the cow gave back, the ten the monkey gave back, and the ten the dog gave back; that makes eighty, okay?"

"Okay," said God. "You asked for it."

So that is why for our first twenty years, we eat, sleep, play and enjoy ourselves. For the next forty years, we slave in the sun to support our family. For the next ten years, we do monkey tricks to entertain the grandchildren. And for the last ten years, we sit on the front porch and bark at everyone.

Life has now been explained to you.
***
Translated joke from a south Asian language.
I tried my best. I'm pulling this from memory. Changed a lot of stuff, and added a buttload of new things to make this seem as normal as possible. Enjoy!

> The cops arrest a truck driver for running over 50 people. They take him to the interrogation room and start questioning him. After a while they tell him to explain what happened as honestly as he could. He starts, 

> "I was driving and realized that I had lost all possible means of braking or even slowing down the truck." 

> "Go on".

> "I was losing control and had to steer the truck onto a large ground besides the road, to avoid collision with the traffic."

> "Then?"

> "I was still unable to slow the truck down, then I realized, to my horror, that I had to make a choice: I could have either steered the truck towards the large crowd which was there for the concert and killed several people or I could have steered the truck towards a hotdog stand where there were only 2 people"

> "You moron! Why didn't you choose to kill the people near the hotdog stand?"

> "I did, officer! I  crushed one under my truck, but the other one ran into the crowd."

**Edit: Um... front page? Am I doing it right?**
***
Getting on a plane . . .
. . . I told the ticket lady, "Send one of my bags to New York, send one to LA, and send one to Miami." 


She told me, "We can't do that!"


I told her, "Well you did it last week!"


- Henny Youngman
***
A lumberjack applies for a job...
...the interviewer asks, "so, where have you worked previously?"

The lumberjack replies, "I did a few years in the Sahara Forest."

The interviewer, taken aback, inquires, "the Sahara 'Forest?'  Don't you mean the Sahara Desert?"

Lumberjack says, "yeah, that's what they call it now."
***
A couple is going through a divorce and custody of the son comes into question.
The father presents evidence that the wife hits the poor boy whenever he misbehaves the slightest. The mother reveals evidence that the father would get belligerently drunk and use his belt on the boy.

The Judge suggests letting the boy live with his grandfather, but it turns out that almost everyone in this twisted family has a history of domestic violence. Not wanting to subject the poor boy to a life of physical punishment, the court decided to take a recess to brainstorm what to do with the son. The court eventually comes to a historic and unprecedented conclusion:

The boy would be in custody of the England national football team because they're incapable of beating anyone.   
***
A Iranian, a Israeli, and a Nazi are walking through the desert...
....when they happen upon a magic lamp! Excited, they rub the lamp and a Genie appears.  "Thank you for releasing me! In exchange, I will grant you each one wish".  

The Iranian thinks for a minute, and says: "My people get pushed around by the rest of the world, but we would be fine if we had 1,000 tanks".  The Genie says "Granted".

The Israeli thinks for a minute and says: "My country is in danger now because of these tanks,  I wish for a wall around Israel that will keep out these tanks and protect us".  The Genie says "Granted".

The Nazi thinks for a minute, and says: "Tell me about this wall".  The Genie replies: "Well, it is 1,000 meters tall, 100 meters thick, and made of solid steel.  The only way in our out is by helicopter or plane".  The Nazi thinks for a bit, asks: "Nothing can get through?".  "Correct" says the Genie.  The Nazi says: "Fill it with water".

*This joke was developed by a multicultural team of various faiths and beliefs.*
***
It's a healthy relationship
My wife told me that she wanted to give me a deepthroat blowjob today.

"Really!" I exclaimed.

"No," She said, "April Foogargagggrraggggle."

That'll teach her to try and be funny...
***
Extreme Sexual Exhaustion
A teacher was wrapping up class, and started talking about tomorrow's final exam. He said there would be no excuses for not showing up tomorrow, barring a dire medical condition or an immediate family member's death. One smart ass, male student said, "What about extreme sexual exhaustion?", and the whole classroom burst into laughter. After the laughter had subsided, the teacher glared at the student, and said, "Not an excuse, you can use your other hand to write." 

***
Superman is flying over the ocean . . . NSFW
... And he spots Wonder Woman on an island lying spread-eagle naked on the beach.

He thinks, "Man, I've always wanted to fuck her."

So he flies down at super-sonic speed, drills her within seconds, and flies away chuckling.


Meanwhile, Wonder Woman says, "What the fuck was that?"

And the Invisible Man says, "I don't know . . . but my ass hurts like hell."
***
CIA Assassin Job Interview
I don't remember where I found this joke so you might've heard it before.

The CIA was looking for a new assassin and they had it narrowed down to 3 applicants. To decide who to choose they had all 3 do a test of their abilities. The first guy went to the test and they took him to a door and handed him a gun. They said "your final test is to kill your wife. She is behind this door." The first guy doesn't even open the door, he refuses, and leaves. The second guy is given the same test. He goes in the door, and they are heard talking for a while then he finally comes out and says "I can't do it" and he leaves. The third guy is given the same test as the last two. As he is in the room for a few minutes, a few gunshots are heard then screaming. The guy comes out soon after and says, "Some idiot loaded the gun with blanks, I had to strangle that bitch."
***
An American couple are on holiday traveling through Wales
On their way they see a sign for a place called Llanfairpwllgwyngyllgogerychwyrndrobwllllantysiliogogogoch and decide to head there for something to eat. As they make their way there they debate the pronunciation of the town’s name.

They stop for lunch and one tourist asks the cashier, “Before we order, could you please settle an argument for us?” The Cashier nods.

“Would you please pronounce where we are for us – very slowly?”

The cashier leans over the counter and says, “Buurrrrgerrrrr Kinnnnggg.”
***
Teacher: Paul. Give me a sentence beginning with "I".
Teacher: Paul. Give me a sentence beginning with "I".
Paul: I is the...

Teacher: No, Paul . You must say "I am" not "I is."
Paul: All right. I am the ninth letter of the alphabet.

***
Frying pan..
A man was sitting reading a newspaper when suddenly his wife hit him on the head with a frying pan.
"What was that for? "
The man asked. 
The wife replied:
"That was for the piece of paper with the name Jenny on it that I found in your pants pocket."
The man said:
"Ooh..When I was at the races last week, the name of the horse I bet on was Jenny. "
The wife apologized & went on with the housework.
3 days later the man is watching TV when his wife bashed him on the head again with a bigger frying pan. 
The man shouted in pain. .
"What was that for? "
Wife replied:
"Your horse phoned. "
***
Three logicians walk into a bar
The bartender asks: "Do you all want a drink?" 

The first logician says: "I don't know."

The second logician says: "I don't know." 

The third logician says: "Yes."
***
What is the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chickpea?
...


I've never had a garbanzo bean on my face.

Edit: Whoa, I knew this was a great joke but didnt expect this. Thanks!
***
iBoob
Apple Computer announced today that it has developed a computer chip that can store and play high fidelity music in women's breast implants. The iBoob will cost between $499 and $699, depending on the speaker size. This is considered to be a major breakthrough because women have always complained about men staring at their breasts and not listening to them.
***
My favorite joke
Two guys are drinking in the restaurant atop the Space Needle on a windy day. 

Man 1: You... You know... When it is this windy, you can jump off the edge, and the wind will blow you back on.

Man 2: Bull.

Man 1: No man, I'm telling you. The wind just blows you back on. Here, let me show you.

The two men drunkily sneak outside and stand on the edge. When another gust comes, the first man leaps off the edge. He floats in the wind for a moment, and sure enough, the wind whips him back onto the ledge.

Man 2: I gotta try this!

He takes a running leap from the edge and plummets straight to his death.

Afterwards, the police are investigating the scene and the Chief of Police goes up to the first man.

Chief: You know, you're a real jerk when you're drunk Superman.
***
An ugly man walks into a bar and a beautiful woman approaches him...
... the woman asks the man, "How would you like to get out of here?" and the man is stunned. He never thought a woman like her would ever approach him so he agrees. They both get into his car and drive really far. He stops at a cliff with the view of the whole city. Within seconds they start taking off their clothes. After 15 minutes of vigorous sex they finally finish. They both put their clothes on and they both just sit there awkwardly. The woman speaks up and says "I'm a prostitute and its going to be 100 dollars for my service." The man is stunned and saddened that she didn't really like him. He gives her the money and they both sit there awkwardly. The woman tells him that she is ready to leave and the man replies "I'm a taxi driver and its going to be 150 dollars for the ride here and back." 
***
A bra, car battery and some jumper cables walk into a bar..
The car battery and jumper cables go find a seat while the bra asks the bartender for 3 beers. The bartender replies, "I'm not serving you! You're obviously off your tits and your two mates look like they're about to start something."


***
Peter Mayhew will be reprising his role as Chewbacca in the next Star Wars movie!
They said they wanted to cast the role to a veteran rather than a wookiee.
***
The blind pilots
Passengers of a 747 begin settling in for their scheduled takeoff when two men in pilot uniforms stumble into the plane, one with a seeing eye dog and the other with a walking stick.  The passengers think it's some sort of joke and think nothing of it, but the men carefully and methodically make their way to the cockpit.

The passengers look at each other a little uneasy but say nothing.  The plane starts down the runway ever-increasing in speed.  The passengers see the end of the runway approaching and start to mumble to themselves.  The plane doesn't pull up and the runaway end comes ever nearer.  A couple passengers release muffled screams and begin to panic, but the plane continues to the end of the runaway.  The passengers at this point begin a full-blown panic and scream loudly and right before they hit the trees at the end of the runway, the plane lifts off without a hitch just barely grazing the tops of the trees as it passes.

Inside the cockpit, the blind copilot turns to the other and says, "That was close.  You know one day they're not gonna scream and we're all gonna die."
***
A taxi passenger tapped the driver on the shoulder to ask him a question.
The driver screamed, lost control of the car, nearly hit a bus, went up on the footpath, and stopped inches from a shop window. 

For a second, everything was quiet in the cab. Then the driver said, "Look, mate, don't ever do that again. You scared the living daylights out of me!"

The passenger apologized and said, "I didn't realize that a little tap would scare you so much." 

The driver replied, "Sorry, it's not really your fault. Today is my first day as a cab driver — I've been driving a funeral van for the last 25 years." 
***
bright orange penis
A man goes to the doctor and tells him that he has a bright orange penis.  The doctor takes a look and sure enough, the man's penis is bright orange.

The doctor asks the man about his daily habits to see if he could get a clue about the cause of the malady.

The man says "My day is pretty normal.  I get up in the morning and go to work.  My work is at a desk in an office so I dont come into contact with any strange chemicals.  I come home after work, make my self dinner, watch a little TV then get ready for bed."

The doctor asks "Do you do anything before bed?"

The man says "Nothing unusual, I just eat cheetos and surf the web"
***
When Beethoven passed away, he was buried in a churchyard.
A couple days later, the town drunk was walking through the cemetery and heard some strange noise coming from the area where Beethoven was buried. Terrified, the drunk ran and got the priest to come and listen to it. The priest bent close to the grave and heard some faint, unrecognizable music coming from the grave. Frightened, the priest ran and got the town magistrate. When the magistrate arrived, he bent his ear to the grave, listened for a moment, and said, "Ah, yes, that's Beethoven's Ninth Symphony, being played backwards." He listened a while longer, and said, "There's the Eighth Symphony, and it's backwards too. Most puzzling." So the magistrate kept listening; "There's the Seventh... the Sixth... the Fifth..." Suddenly, the realization of what was happening dawned on the magistrate; he stood up and announced the crowd that had gathered in the cemetery, "My fellow citizens, there's nothing to worry about. It's just Beethoven decomposing."
***
The little black jewish boy...
A black Jewish boy runs home from school one day and asks his father, “Daddy, am I more Jewish or more black?” The dad replies, “Why do you want to know, son?” “Because a kid at school is selling a bike for $50 and I want to know if I should talk him down to $40 or just steal it!”
***
There is more money being spent on breast implants and Viagra today, than on Alzheimer's research. This means that by 2040, there should be a large elderly population with perky boobs, huge erections, and absolutely no recollection of what to do with them.
There is more money being spent on breast implants and Viagra today, than on Alzheimer's research. This means that by 2040, there should be a large elderly population with perky boobs, huge erections, and absolutely no recollection of what to do with them.
***
Woman in a coma
Two nurses are giving a woman in a coma a sponge bath. They notice that when they get near her private areas that she starts to get a little stimulated. The theorize that oral sex will bring her out the coma. They go out into the lobby and tell her husband their theory. The husband is a little aprehensive about it at first, but he agrees to do it. The nurses leave the man with his wife and give him some privacy. They come back about 10 minutes later and the woman is dead! "What happened?" asks one of the nurses. The man replies, "I dont know...I think she choked."
***
A woman was in a coma,

and she had been in it for months. Nurses were in her room giving her a blanket bath.
One of them was washing her private area and noticed that there was a slight response on the monitor when she touched her. They tried it again and sure enough there was a small, recognisable movement.

They went to her husband and explained what happened, telling him, "Crazy as this sounds, maybe a little oral sex will do the trick and bring her out of the coma."

The husband was sceptical, but they assured him that with the curtains closed for privacy, and his co-operation it might just work. He finally agreed and went into his wife's room.

A few minutes passed and then the woman's monitor flat lined, no pulse, no heart beat, alarms ringing, the nurses burst into the room. "What happened?" they cried.

The husband said, "I'm not sure, maybe she choked".
***
Tribal Experiment!
A blonde couple was watching a documentary on the TV Channel about an African tribe whose men all had penises 24 inches long. When a male reaches a certain age, a string is tied around his penis and a weight is attached to the other end. After a while, the weight stretches the length of the penis to 24 inches.

 Later that evening as the husband was getting out of the shower, his wife looked down at him and said, "What do you say, we try that African string-and-weight procedure?"

 Her husband agreed and they tied and string and weight to his penis.

 A few days later, the wife asked the husband, "How is our tribal experiment coming along?"

 "Well, it looks like we're half-way there," he replied.

 "You've grown to 12 inches?!" she said, astonished.

 "No... it's turned black," he answered.
***
Miley Cyrus is a strictly american phenomenon...
most everywhere else in the world, she'd be Kilometery Cyrus

***
Three guys go fishing...
Three guys go fishing.  In the front of the boat is a cooler full of beer.  

The first guy stands up and says, "I'm a Muslim and we believe that God does not want us to drink alcohol.  We also believe that God is watching us all the time.  Since God is watching me right now, I will not drink any beer."  And he sits back down.

The second guy stands up and says, "I am a Jew.  We believe that God created alcohol for us to enjoy.  We also believe that God is always watching us.  So I will drink a beer to show God how much I appreciate his creation."  He gets a beer out of the cooler and sits back down.

The third guy sits there for a bit.  Then suddenly he jumps up, pushes the other two guys out of the boat and chugs two beers at lightning speed.  The other two climb back into the boat sputtering and dripping wet and ask, "What was that?!?!?!"

The third guy says, "I am a Southern Baptist.  We believe that God does not want us to drink alcohol.  We also believe that God is only watching us when other people are around."
***
B'dum tsss
A collection of jokes I have found over the years about drummers.

**NOTE:** Before you get offended, I AM A DRUMMER. I FIND THESE FUNNY TOO.

1. What do you call a drummer in a suit? The defendant
2. How can you tell a drummer's at the door? The knocking speeds up
3. What do you call a drummer with half a brain? Gifted
4. What does a drummer use for contraception? His personality
5. Did you hear about the drummer who finished high school? Me neither
6. What did the drummer say to the band leader? "Do you want me to play too fast or too slow?"
7. How many drummers does it take to screw in a light bulb? Five: One to screw it in, four to say that Neil Peart could've done it better
8. Why do guitarists put drumsticks on the dash of their car? So that they can use the handicapped parking space
9. How do you get a drummer off your porch? Give him the money for the pizza
10. What do you call a guy who hangs out with musicians? A drummer

Anyone got any more?
***
I'm sure my dad didn't write this, but it was always one of his favorites: The organs were having a meeting...
"Did I ever tell you about the asshole?"

"What?"

"Well, the asshole was at a meeting with all of the other body parts, and they were deciding who should be in charge of the whole body, right? So first, the brain says, 'C'mon, obviously I should be the boss. I do all of the decisions, thinking--why is this even a question?'

'Well, good luck doing all of the thinking if you can't see where you're going,' say the eyes. 'We should be in charge.'

'What good is it going to do seeing, if you can't get anywhere?' asked the legs.

'Well, without us, you'd have no oxygen,' said the lungs.

'Are you serious?' said the stomach. 'How are you supposed to process energy and do any of this stuff, without me??'

'Well, what about me?' piped up the asshole. 'I'm important too...'

'You?!?' laughed the other parts. 'Shut up, asshole!'

So the asshole went on strike.

A week and a half later, the brain couldn't think straight. The eyes couldn't focus, the legs were asleep from sitting on the pot, and the stomach was so jammed up full of crap that the lungs could barely breathe.

Finally, they all went to the asshole and said, 'Look, we're sorry, we're sorry!! Just come back to work, you can be in charge!'

...and that's why all bosses are assholes."

Miss ya, Pops.

*edit: formatting
***
A husband will only have sex with his wife on one condition
A married couple of 20 years were as normal as could be, bar one little quirk the husband had in the bedroom.

He'd only have sex with the lights off.

The wife assumed he merely had some shame in the penile department, but she loved him, so happily obliged. An added bonus was that it felt like he was actually reasonably well-equipped downstairs, so everything was good.

However, 20 years of blind sex took its toll on her and their relationship. In the middle of one of their love-making sessions, the wife dived for the lamp and turned on the light.

She saw her husband with his pants on and a dildo in hand.

There was a brief moment of silence, then the wife sternly stated: "You have some explaining to do."

The husband looked her dead in the eye and said: "I'll explain this when you explain the kids".

***
A burglar broke into a home...
He heard a soft voice say, "Jesus is watching you". Thinking it was his imagination, he continued his search. Again "Jesus is watching you" He turned his flashlight around, saw a parrot in a cage. He asked the parrot if he was the one talking. The parrot said, "Yes". He asked the parrot his name. The parrot said Moses. The burglar asked, "What kind of people would name a parrot Moses?" The parrot said "The same kind of people who would name their Pit Bull Jesus".

e: to the people writing that it's an old joke....I don't give a shit.
***
Two college students have their most important final exam next week...
But they've chosen to spend the week partying instead. So, in their drunken stupour, after realising how badly they messed up, they beg their professor to give them an extra day for the exam. Even though sceptical, they told him that they had a flat tire on the way to university and couldn't reach class in time.

So he agreed.

The two students, dedicated to getting a good score on their exam after a week of partying, spend the entire day cramming down  every last possible detail of their class. When they come in the next day, the professor tells them that they'll need to take the exam in separate classrooms. Perplexed by this, the students nevertheless agree and sit down, each in their own classroom.

"For 5 points, describe the structure of the atom and all its properties." was the first question. The students, after seeing this, regain their confidence and think that this exam will be a piece of cake. After they write out all they know about the atom, they turn the page.

"For 95 points, tell me which tire it was."
***
Becoming a garbage man isn't hard....
you just pick it up as you go along.

^^^*I'm* ^^^*terribly* ^^^*sorry*
***
A bakery owner hires a young, attractive female clerk ...
...who likes to wear very short skirts and thong panties.
One day a young man enters the store, glances at the clerk and spots the loaves of bread behind the counter. Noticing the length of her skirt and the location of the raisin bread, he has a brilliant idea.
"I'd like some raisin bread, please," the man says politely.
The female clerk nods and climbs up a ladder to reach the raisin bread located on the very top shelf.
Another young man standing almost directly beneath her is provided an excellent view, too.
Once she descends the ladder, he muses that he really should get two loaves because he is having company for dinner. As the shapely clerk retrieves the second loaf of bread, one of the other male customers notices what was going on. Thinking quickly, he requests his own loaf of raisin bread so he can continue to enjoy the view.
With each trip up the ladder, the young lady seems to catch the eye of another male customer. Pretty soon, each male customer is asking for raisin bread just to see the clerk climb up and down.
After many trips, she is tired, irritated, and thinking she is going to have to try the bread herself. Finally, once again atop the ladder, she stops and fumes, glaring at the men standing below.
She notices an elderly man standing amongst the crowd, staring up at her. Thinking to save herself a trip, she yells at the elderly man, "Is it raisin for you, too?
"No," stammers the old man, "but it's a quiverin'."
***
Quick thinking
A man and a woman are fooling around, when suddenly they hear the front door slam, "Its my husband, hide in the ensuite!" the man runs in just as the husband enters, "Love, why are you naked?" she replys "For you dear", happy the man walks into the bathroom to see a naked man befor him, "Who the fuck are you!" "Th-The moth exterminator" the naked man replys, "Why are you NAKED" the angry husband asks, The naked man looks down, Jumps back in shock and shouts "THE BASTARDS".
***
A farmer went into a local bar...
...and ordered a glass of champagne.
The woman sitting next to him said, 'How about that? I just ordered champagne too!'
'What a coincidence' the farmer said. 'This is a special day for me. I'm celebrating.'
"This is a special day for me too, I am also celebrating," said the woman.
'What a coincidence!' said the farmer. As they clinked glasses headded: 'What are you celebrating?'
'My husband and I have been trying to have a child and today my gynecologist told me that I am pregnant!'
'What a coincidence!' said the man.
'I'm a chicken farmer and all last year my hens were infertile, but
today they are all laying eggs again.'
'That's great!' said the woman, 'How did your chickens become fertile?'
'I used a different cock,' he replied.
The woman smiled, clinked his glass and said 'What a coincidence!'
***
I don't see why people are outraged when Donald Trump says if Ivanka wasn't his daughter, he'd be dating her.
After all, if Ivanka wasn't Trump's daughter, I'd date her too. 
***
A husband and wife are shopping in their local grocery store.
The husband picks up a case of Budweiser and puts it in the cart.

"What do you think you're doing?" asks the wife.

"They're on sale, only $10 for 24 cans" he replies.

"Put them back, we can't afford them", demands the wife.

They carry on with their shopping. A few aisles farther on, the woman picks up a $20 jar of face cream and puts it in the basket.

"What do you think you're doing?" asks the husband.

"It's my face cream. It makes me look beautiful," replies the wife.

Her husband retorts, "So does 24 cans of Budweiser and it's half the price."
***
A drunk man and a priest
A drunk man who smelled of beer sat down on a subway next to a priest.
The man's tie was stained, his face was plastered with red lipstick and a half-empty bottle of gin was sticking out of his torn coat pocket. He opened his newspaper and began reading.
After a few minutes the man turned to the priest and asked, Say Father, what causes arthritis?
The priest replies, "My Son, it's caused by loose living, being with cheap, wicked women, too much alcohol, contempt for your fellow man, sleeping around with prostitutes and lack of a bath."
 The drunk muttered in response, Well, I'll be damned. Then he returned to his paper.
 The priest, thinking about what he had said, nudged the man and apologized. "I'm very sorry. I didn't mean to come on so strong. How long have you had arthritis?"
The drunk answered, "I don't have it, Father.  I was just reading here that the Pope does."

***
A DEA agent is investigating some farms...
On one particular farm he walks up to the farmer who was doing some work in one of his fields and says, "Sir, I'm from the DEA and I'm inspecting some farms in the area to make sure there are no illegal drugs being grown"
The farmer replies, "Alright, but just don't go in that field"
The DEA agent pulls out his badge and says, "See this fucking badge! This means I can go wherever the fuck I want to"
The farmer says, "Alright, suit yourself"
The DEA agent walks off and a few minutes later he's being chased through the field by a bull. The farmer drops his tools and runs to the fence yelling, "Your badge! Show him your fucking badge!"
***
I went to the supermarket today, and was there for literally 5 minutes
When i came out there was a cop writing a parking ticket.
So I went up to him and said,"Come on, buddy, how about giving a guy a break".
He ignored me and continued writing the ticket. So I called him a pencil-necked dick headed cop. He glared at me and started writing another ticket for worn tires!

So then I asked him if his psychiatrist makes him lie face down on the couch cause he's so ugly. 
He finished the second ticket and put it on the windshield with the first. Then he started writing a third ticket!

This went on until 5 tickets were placed on the windshield. The more i insulted him, the more tickets he wrote. 

I didn't care. My car was parked around the corner. 
***
A guy texts his neighbor...
A guy sends a text to his next-door neighbor:

"Bob, I'm sorry. I've been riddled with guilt and I have to confess: I have been helping myself to your wife when you're not around, probably more than you. I know it's no excuse but I don't get it at home. I can't live with the guilt any longer. I hope you'll accept my sincerest apology. It won't happen again."

Feeling outrage and betrayed, Bob grabs his gun, goes into the bedroom, and without a word, shoots his wife.

Moments later the guy gets a second text: "Really should use spell check! That should be "wifi"."
***
Cannibal Jokes...
Two cannibals are eating a clown. One says to the other "Does this taste funny to you?"  
  
  

A cannibal invites a friend around for dinner. As they're tucking into the starter, the guest says  
"Wow. Your wife make a lovely stew."  
"I know." answers the host. "I sure will miss her."  
  
  
Two cannibals are sharing a lost tourist.
"You start at the feet. I'll start at the head." says the first. After a little while he notices his friend hasn't said much. "You ok?" he asks.  
"Fine." Comes the reply. "I'm having a ball."  
"You're eating too fast." 

***
A woman goes to a new gynecologist for an exam.
He takes a look and she's embarrassed to hear "That's a big vagina! That's a big vagina!" from betwixt her nethers.

Flustered, the woman replies, "I know it is, but you didn't have to say it twice!"

Doc answers back, "I only said it once."

***
A married man was having an affair with his secretary
One day, their passions overcame them and they took off for her house.  Exhausted from the afternoon's activities, they fell asleep and awoke at around 8 p.m. As the man threw on his clothes, he told the woman to take his shoes outside and rub them through the grass and dirt. Mystified, she nonetheless complied and he slipped into his shoes and drove home.  "Where have you been?" demanded his wife when he entered the house. "Darling," replied the man, "I can't lie to you.  I've been having an affair with my secretary.  I fell asleep in her bed and didn't wake up until eight o'clock." The wife glanced down at his shoes and said, "You liar! You've been playing golf!"
***
Two married men were at the bar...
...the one looks at the clock and tells his friend, "I'm not looking forward to going home.  My wife is going to chew me out again for being away drinking so late.  Every time I'm out like this I try to sneak back home and into bed without waking her so she doesn't know how late I've been out.  I turn off the car and coast into the driveway.  I take off my shoes and enter through the side door.  I even get changed in the bathroom and then try to slip into bed unnoticed.  But she always wakes up and then I have to stay awake and give appropriate answers for the next 30 minutes of angry lecture."

"I never have that problem." says the friend.  "I roar into the driveway and bring the car to a screeching halt, slam the front door shut as I come in, throw open the bedroom door, jump in bed with her and slap her butt and say, 'Guess who's horny?!' and then she pretends to be asleep."
***
"Of course I won't laugh."
Said the nurse. "I am a professional. In over 20 years of working here, I've never laughed at a patient." 

"Okay, then," Said Bob, and he proceeded to drop his trousers revealing the smallest male part the nurse had ever seen. In length and width, it was almost identical to a AAA battery.

Unable to control herself, the nurse tried to suppress a giggle, but it just came out. Feeling very bad at laughing at the mans part she composed herself as well as she could. "I am very sorry," she said. "I don't know what came over me. On my honor, as a nurse and a lady, I promise that won't happen again. Now, tell me, what seems to be the problem?"

"Its swollen," Bob replied.

She ran out of the room.
***
An elderly couple gets pulled over by a cop.
The wife is driving, but she has a bit of a hearing problem. The officer notifies her that she was doing 38 in a 25 zone.
The wife turns to her husband and asks "What'd he say?"

The husband replies "He says you were speeding!"
The wife turns back to the officer and says "Oh, sorry officer."
The officer goes on; "License and registration please."
The wife again turns to her husband. "What'd he say!?"

The husband, growing irritated, says "He wants to see your LICENSE." The wife replies, "Oh, sorry officer. Here you go."
The officer inspects her license and comments, "Ah, you're from Brownsville. I'll never forget that city... I had the worst sexual experience of my entire life in Brownsville!"
The wife once more turns to her right and yells "What'd he say!!?"

The husband replies "He says he knows you."
***
Paddy has a broken leg
Paddy has a broken leg and his buddy Mick comes over to see him. 

Mick says, "How ya doin?"

Paddy says, "Okay, but do me a favor mate, run upstairs and get me slippers, my feet are freezing."

Mick goes upstairs and sees Paddy's gorgeous twin daughters lying on the bed.

He says, "Your dad sent me up here to have sex with you both."

They say, "Get away with ya... prove it."

Mick shouts downstairs, "Paddy, both of them?"

Paddy shouts back, "Of course both of them, whats the point of fuckin one?"
***
A rich guy and a poor guy are talking about what they got their wives for christmas...
the rich guy said, "I got my wife a fur coat and a diamond ring, so if she doesn't like the fur at least she'll have the ring." The poor guy said, "I got my wife a bathrobe and a dildo. If she doesn't like the robe, she can go fuck herself!"
***
Just wrote this one about my esteemed profession. How many lawyers does it take to screw in a light bulb?
Such number as may be deemed necessary to perform the aforementioned task in a timely and efficient manner within the structure in which said bulb is housed and being dependent on the following variables:

Whereas it should be taken in to account that ceiling heights may differ significantly from fixture to fixture, the altitude of defective bulb must first be determined upon which point the lawyer or lawyers shall at their option choose an appropriate means of elevation including but not limited to a chair, stepstool, table, or ladder;

Whereas the height of said means of elevation may require support depending upon the altitude, trajectory, and any encumbrances including but not limited to furniture, stairs, load bearing members, and columns; and

Whereas the bulb must be disposed of depending on the type of bulb in a manner consistent with all applicable state, local and federal statutes;

The answer to the aforementioned question can only be answered in one way.  

It depends.  

***
Three brothers eating soup
A mom has three sons and she's making them soup, While she's not looking a cupboard above the stove opens and a box of beebee's falls in the soup. She keeps cooking, serves them lunch and they go back outside to play. Ten minutes later the first boy comes in and says 'Mommy I was peeing and a beebee came out.' She doesn't believe him and he goes back out to play. Ten minutes later the second boy comes in and says 'Mommy I was peeing and a beebee came out.' She doesn't believe him and he goes back out to play. Ten minutes later, the oldest boy comes in and the mom says 'Let me guess, you were taking a pee and a beebee came out?' He says 'No, I was playing with myself and I shot the dog.'
***
At university, students had to come up with a sentence in which the words "love" and "sex" both appeared
A female student's composition:

'When two people deeply and passionately love each other, and both reach a high level of mutual respect, then society morally and spiritually encourages that these two people should unite in the ecstasy of physical sex.'

A male student's composition:

'I love sex.'
***
Another one from my college professor...
In a small park, there is a fountain with two nude statues. A man and woman

One day, an angel comes down and says to the statues:

"For your many years of long-standing beauty and service to society, I will bring you to life for 30 minutes."

The statues hear this and spring to life

The man and woman gaze at each other for a moment, and then dart towards a nearby shrubbery

There is a lot thrashing and laughing

15 minutes later they come out of the shubbery, tickled pink, satisfied, and giggling

"You have another 15 minutes. If you wish to do it again, you may do so." says the angel

The man looks at the woman and asks: "Again?"

*"Oh* ***heck yeah***" exclaims the woman

"This time let's change positions. I'll hold it down while you shit on the pigeon."
***
White guy goes to prison... (NSFW)
To his dismay, he's put in a cell with a very large black man.  After a few moments of silence, the black man says in a deep, booming voice, "There's one thing we gotta get straight right now if we're gonna be in this cell together.  We gots to figure out who's gonna be the husband and who's gonna be the wife.  I'll let you decide."

The white guy is shaken, and thinks for a moment through all of the ramifications of his decision.  Finally he says, "Okay, I'll be the husband."

The black guys says, "That's fine with me.  Now get over here and suck yo wife's dick."
***
Didn't Snoop Dogg change his name?
Or was Snoop Lyin'?

Edit: Just in case the king sees this, I got mad respect for you Dogg. Smoke weed everyday. 

(His grandmother passed away recently, I'm just trying to be nice people.)
***
A magicians working on a cruise.
A magician was working on a cruise ship.

Since the audience was different each week, the magician did the same tricks over and over again. There was only one problem: The captain's parrot saw the shows each week and began to understand how the Magician did every trick.

Once he understood, he started shouting in the middle of the show, "Look, it's not the same hat!" or, "Look, he's hiding the flowers under the table!" Or "Hey, why are all the cards the ace of spades?"

The magician was furious but couldn't do anything. It was, after all, the Captain's parrot.
Then one stormy night on the Pacific, the ship unfortunately sank.
The magician luckily found himself on a piece of wood floating in the middle of the sea, as fate would have it ... With the parrot.
They stared at each other with hatred, but did not utter a word.
This went on for a day... And then 2 days. And then 3 days. Finally on the 4th day, the parrot could not hold back any longer and said
"Okay, I give up. Where's the fucking ship?"


***
My Lawyer said to me...
“I have some good news and I have some bad news.”

“I’ve had an awful day, let’s hear the good news first,” I said.

My lawyer said: “Your wife invested $5,000 in 2 pictures today that she figured were worth a minimum of $5 million!!!”

“Well done, very good news indeed! You’ve just made my day – now what’s the bad news??” I replied enthusiastically

“The pictures are of you shagging your secretary,” he said.
***
The leader of a Native American tribe just passed away
He was old and had been a wise leader for many years. After he passed a younger man became leader even though he had much less experience.
His first task as leader was to predict if the coming winter was going to be a mild one or a harsh one. In other words, did the tribe need to gather lots of wood for fire, or just a little. The young leader had no idea how to predict the winter so he went with the safe choice and said the winter would indeed be cold and tasked everyone with gathering loots of wood.
As the village was working he snuck out into the forest and pulled out his cell phone. He called the local weather station and asked them "is the winter going to be cold or mild?" They said "this is going to be a cold winter, yes." He thanked them and went back to his village and said "Everyone! It is going to be a very cold winter, be sure to gather lots of wood!" So they did, they kept gathering.
After a couple of weeks, the leader felt content with the amount of wood they had in storage, but just to be sure he snuck out into the woods again with his cell phone. The weather station told him "This is worse than we thought, turns out this winter is going to be extremely cold, make sure you're prepared!"
The leader, now nervous, runs back to the village and tells everyone again to keep gathering wood. After another couple of weeks they had filled up all their storage houses with just lots of wood for the upcoming cold winter. But again, just to be sure, the leader sneaks out and asks the weather station again.
"This is going to be one of the coldest winters we've ever seen. We can't believe ourselves how cold it's going to get."
The leader gets the tribe to gather more wood, build more storage houses and fill those up as well. Everyone is beginning to get really nervous since the winter is getting closer. 
One final time the leader calls the weather station. "This is going to be the coldest winter in recorded history." The leader, in tears, desperately asks, "How do you know this?!"
"Well the Native Americans are gathering wood like crazy!!!"
***
You've heard this before. A few guys are drinking at a bar.
They start talking about getting home and they are concerned their wives will be upset about how late they get home. 

First guy says, "I do what I can. I put the car in neutral at the driveway and coast in. I tiptoe inside and sneak into bed. But she still knows." 

Second guy said, "I idle a half block away, coast all the way home. I take off my shoes before I walk inside. I creep up the stairs and slink into bed but she is still there, waiting and as much as I do and starts yelling."

Third guy says," You're doing it wrong. I squeal my tires all the way into the driveway. I stomp to the front door, slam it closed, run up the stairs, slap my wife on the ass and yell, "who wants this?" and she is asleep every time. "
***
Adam gave Sally 3 flowers and 1 stuffed animal. Kristen gave Sally 5 flowers and 2 stuffed animals. What does Sally have?
cancer.
***
Sex After Death
A couple made a deal that whoever died first would come back and inform the other if there is sex after death. Their biggest fear was that there was no after life at all.
 
After a long life together, the husband was the first to die. True to his word, he made the first contact:
 
"Marion .... Marion"

"Is that you, Bob?"

"Yes, I've come back like we agreed."

"That's wonderful! What's it like?"

"Well, I get up in the morning, I have sex. I have breakfast and then it's off to the golf course. I have sex again, bathe in the warm sun and then have sex a couple of more times.. Then I have lunch (you'd be proud - lots of greens). Another romp around the golf course, then pretty much have sex the rest of the afternoon. After supper, it's back to the golf course again. Then it's more sex until late at night. I catch some much needed sleep, and then, the next day it starts all over again!”

"Oh, Bob! Are you in Heaven?"


"No -- I'm a rabbit somewhere in South Carolina.”
***
Cheap parrot
A woman decides she wants to buy a pet so she heads down to the local pet store. After a bit of browsing, she fixes her attention on a lovely talking parrot on sale for only $10. The clerk tells her the parrot's going cheap because it used to live in a house of ill repute so it may not be the most family friendly of pets. Thinking this deal is too good to pass up, she buys it without hesitation.

She gets home and places the parrot near the entrance. The parrot looks around and says, "New house, new madame!" The woman is startled by this but laughs it off. Later, her two teenage daughters get home, the parrot looks at them and remarks, "New house, new madame, new prostitutes!" The girls are shocked by this but after some explaining by the mom, they all laugh it off. The woman is delighted and eagerly awaits her husband so she can see what his reaction will be.

The husband arrives moments later. The parrot looks at him and says,"Hello Keith!"
***
I love my wife
My wife told me that she wanted to give me a deepthroat blowjob today.

"Really!" I exclaimed.

"No," She said, "April Foogargagggrraggggle."

That'll teach her to try and be funny...
***
A young man goes into a drugstore to buy condoms
The pharmacist says the condoms come in packs of 3, 9 or 12 and asks which the young man wants.

"Well," he said, "I've been seeing this girl for a while and she's really hot. I want the condoms because I think tonight's "the" night. We're having dinner with her parents, and then we're going out. And I've got a feeling I'm gonna get lucky after that. Once she's had me, she'll want me all the time, so you'd better give me the 12 pack."

The young man makes his purchase and leaves.

Later that evening, he sits down to dinner with his girlfriend and her parent's. He asks if he might give the blessing, and they agree. He begins the prayer, but continues praying for several minutes.

The girl leans over and says, "You never told me that you were such a religious person." 

He leans over to her and whispers, "You never told me that your father is a pharmacist."
***
My friend Dave drowned yesterday
his funeral is on Wednesday. I've made him a wreath in the shape of a buoyancy aid. It's what he would have wanted.
***
Looking
Two guys, one old and one young, are pushing their carts around a shopping mall when they collide.
The old guy says to the young guy, "Sorry about that. I'm looking for my wife, and I guess I wasn't paying attention to where I was going."
The young guy says, "That's OK. It's a coincidence. I'm looking for my wife, too. I can't find her and I'm getting a little desperate."
The old guy says, "Well, maybe we can help each other. What does your wife look like?"
The young guy says, "Well, she is 24 yrs old, tall, with blonde hair, blue eyes, long legs, big boobs, and she's wearing tight white shorts, a red halter top and no bra. What does your wife look like?"
The old guy says, "Doesn't matter - let's look for yours."

***
Group Therapy
A psychiatrist was conducting a group therapy session with four young mothers and their small children. "You all have obsessions," he observed.

To the first mother, Mary, he said, "You are obsessed with eating. You've even named your daughter Candy."

He turned to the second Mom, Ann: "Your obsession is with money.  Again, it manifests itself in your child's name, Penny."

He turned to the third Mom, Joyce: "Your obsession is alcohol. This too shows itself in your child's name, Brandy."

At this point, the fourth mother, Betty, quietly got up, took her little boy by the hand, and whispered, "Come on, Dick, this guy has no idea what he's talking about. Let's pick up Peter and Willy from school and go get dinner."
***
Is sex work?
A U.S. Marine Colonel was about to start the morning briefing to his staff. While waiting for the coffee machine to finish its brewing, the colonel decided to pose a question to all assembled.
He explained that his wife had been a bit frisky the night before and he failed to get his usual amount of sound sleep. He posed the question of just how much of sex was "work" and how much of it was "pleasure?" A Major chimed in with 25-75% in favor of work . A Captain said it was 50-50%. A lieutenant responded with 25-75% in favor of pleasure , depending upon his state of inebriation at the time.
There being no consensus, the colonel turned to the PFC (Private First Class) who was in charge of making the coffee. What was HIS opinion?
Without any hesitation, the young PFC responded, "Sir, it has to be 100% pleasure."
The colonel was surprised and, as you might guess, asked why.
"Well, sir, if there was any work involved, the officers would have me doing it for them."
***
Why did the semen cross the road?
Because you wore the wrong sock today.

While I'm up here on the moral highground, let me tell you about poor little Ukurugenzi.

Ukurugenzi is an 8-year old Kenyan orphan who walks 11 miles to his mud-hut school every day. With your donation of just 25 cents a day, we can buy a whip and make that lazy bastard run.
***
A guy sticks his head into a barber shop and asks "Hey, Buddy! how long before I can get a haircut?"
The barber look around the shop and says "about 2 hours," and the guy leaves. 

A few days later the same guy sticks his head in the door and asks..."how long before I can get a haircut?" 

Again, the barber looks around at shop full of customers and says "about 2 hours." The guy leaves. 

A week later the same guy sticks his head in the shop and asks "how long before I can get a haircut?" The barber looks around the shop and says "about an hour and a half". The guy leaves. 

The barber looks over at a friend in the shop and says "Hey, Joey, I'll give you a free cut if you follow that guy and see where he goes." 

In a little while, Joey comes back into the shop laughing hysterically. The barber says, "this must be good, where did he go when he left here?" 

Joey says, "To your house!"
***
Three bees in a jar
You should go up to a person and start telling them this:

"There are three bees stuck in a jar. Two females and one male. The females want to get out of the jar, and the male knows how to get out of the jar. One of the females goes to the male and asks him, 'How do I get out of this thing?' The male bee is very horny and he replies, 'Fuck me and I'll tell you'. Out of desperation, the female bee fucks him and says, 'Now tell me how to get out of this jar.' The male keeps his promise and tells the female bee 'to go round the corner and shoot upwards, the jar lid will pop open.' She complies and does what he said; she goes round the corner and goes up, but she hits the lid so hard that she dies and it lid remains closed.

Now there is one male and female bee. The last female bee is also desperate to get out, so she goes to the male bee and asks him, 'How do I get out of this jar?' The male bee, being very horny says again, 'Fuck me and I'll tell you.' The female, being equally desperate fucks him and he tells her how to get out, 'go round the corner and shoot upwards, the jar lid will pop open'. Same advice he gave to the first bee. The second female bee listens to him and she goes round the corner and shoots upwards, she too hits the lid and falls down and dies.

Now the male bee is remaining alone in the jar. He feels lonely and he knows how to get out of the jar. So he does what he told the female bees: goes round the corner and shoots up. The jar pops open and he leaves."

At this point, the person you're telling it to would be like, "How?"

To which, you should reply, "Fuck me and I'll tell you."
***
2 engineers v/s a Blonde
Two engineers were standing at the base of a flagpole, looking at its top.

A blonde walked by and asked what they were doing.

"We're supposed to find the height of this flagpole," said Sven, "but we don't have a ladder."

The woman took a wrench from her purse, loosened a couple of bolts, and laid the pole down on the ground. Then she took a tape measure from her handbag, took a measurement and announced, "Twenty one feet, six inches," and walked away.

One engineer shook his head and laughed, "Typical blonde! We ask for the height and she gives us the length!"
***
A Linux sysadmin walks into a pharmacy
A Linux sysadmin walks into a pharmacy. 

"ephedrine?"

"I can't serve you that"

"sudoephedrine"

"There you go". 
***
A trucker who has been out on the road for two weeks decided to have a pit stop at a brothel...
A trucker who has been out on the road for two weeks decided to have a pit stop at a brothel outside Atlanta. He walks straight up to the Madam, drops down $500 and says, "I want your ugliest woman and a grilled cheese sandwich!"

The Madam is astonished. "But sir, for that kind of money you could have one of my finest ladies and a three-course meal."

The trucker replies, "Listen, I ain't horny. I'm homesick."
***
A mummy calls a restauraunt.
- Hello, I'd like to reserve a table for the pharaoh Sakhrakhotep I.
- Could you spell it out, please?
- Of course. Bird, two triangles, wavy line, the sun, bird again, jackal's head and a scarab.
***
A man arrives at the gates of heaven...
...St. Peter looks through his book and tells him "I don't see any reason why we should let you in.  You don't seem to have done anything worthy in your life."

The guy replies: "what about the time I was driving and saw a woman with a flat tire beside the road?  A bunch of bikers had surrounded her and were giving her a hard time.  I stopped and got out; they turned on me so I grabbed a tire iron and told them to back off."

St. Peter: "You really did that?  When did this happen?"

The guy: "About 5 minutes ago!"
***
So, Anonymous has declared war on ISIS
... ironic that 72 virgins are now attacking the terrorists

EDIT: Almost 4 years on Reddit and I´m finally a faget! Yay!!
EDIT2: Wow, thanks u/lordzxil for the gold!
***
A driver was stuck in a traffic jam on the highway outside Washington, DC. Nothing was moving. Suddenly a man knocks on the window.
The driver rolls down the window and asks, “What’s going on?”
“Terrorists have kidnapped Congress. They’re asking for a $100 million ransom. Otherwise, they’re going to douse them all in gasoline and set them on fire. We’re going from car to car collecting donations....”
“How much is everyone giving, on average?” the driver asks.
The man replies, “Roughly a gallon.”
***
A woman decided to have a face lift for her birthday. She spent $5000 and felt really good about the results.
On her way home she stopped at a dress shop to look around. 
As she was leaving, she said to the sales clerk, "I hope you don't mind me asking, but how old do you think I am?"
"About 35,"he replied.
"I'm actually 47," the woman said, feeling really happy.
After that she went into McDonald's for lunch and asked the order taker the same question.
He replied, "Oh, you look about 29."
"I am actually 47!" she said, feeling really good.
While standing at the bus stop she asked an old man the same question. 
He replied, "I am 85 years old and my eyesight is going. But when I was young there was a sure way of telling a woman's age. If I put my hand up your skirt I will be able to tell your exact age." 
There was no one around, so the woman said, "What the hell?" and let him slip his hand up her skirt.
After feeling around for a while, the old man said, "OK, You are 47."
Stunned, the woman said, "That was brilliant! How did you do that?"
The old man replied, "I was behind you in line at McDonald's."
***
Little Johnny lives with his mother on a farm...
One day he comes running in and screams: "Mommy, Mommy, the bull is fucking the cow!"
 His Mother slaps him hard and says: "We don't use language like that in this house, the next time it happens, say 'The bull is *surprising* the cow.'" Rubbing his cheek, Little Johnny walks away. 

A couple of days go by and Little Johnny runs in again, screaming "Mommy, Mommy, the bull is surprising all the cows!", his Mother turns around and says "That's not possible, he can't be surprising all the cows at once" 
 Little Johnny says: "Yes he can, because he's fucking the horse!"
***
If God were an engineer...
3 Engineers are sitting at the bar, having a conversation along the lines of "If God were an engineer, what kind of engineer would he be?"

The Mechanical Engineer: "Obviously he was mechanical. Look at the joints, the complex range of motion, the connective tissue. Mechanical Engineer for sure!"

The Electrical Engineer: "No way. Electrical. Look at that brain! All the nerves, neurons, every little electrical impulse that ties it together! Must've been Electrical!

The Civil Engineer: Takes a sip of his drink. "Nope. I can say for a fact that the human body was designed by a Civil Engineer. Who else would run a toxic waste pipeline through a recreation area?"
***
TIL After Nigeria was unable to win any medals in this year's Olympics, the Nigerian Sports Minister personally offered to refund all the expenses of fans that traveled to Brazil.
He said he just needs their bank details and pin numbers to complete the transaction.
***
A couple's young son...
...accidentally sees his father having fun with the maid. He runs to his mother and tells her what he saw. The mother gets extremely angry, but decides to have a little fun of her own and instructs her son not to tell anything until she says so.

A few days later it's the grandma's birthday, the whole family gathers from all over the country, there's at least fifty people. The party is going just fine when the mother stands up and says:

"I'd like some attention, please! Jimmy is gonna tell you a story!"

Everyone thinks little Jimmy is gonna tell a poem or a bedtime story. However, he says the following:

"Last week daddy entered the room where the maid was cleaning and he hugged her and kissed her and started taking off all her clothes..."

Everyone looks at the dad who gets redder than a lobster. Jimmy continues:

"After taking off her clothes, he got naked too. They lay down and then daddy started putting his... his thing... I can't remember how they call it..."

Jimmy looks at her mother (who smiles smugly) for help:

"Mummy, how do you call that thing you put in your mouth when the neighbour comes over?"
***
Wrong queue !
This girl was a prostitute, but her "granny" didn't know about it. One day, the police rounded up a group of pro's and the girl was caught. The cops had them lined up against a wall of the street where they were caught soliciting. Just then the grandmother walked by and saw her granddaughter.
 She asked the girl, "What are you lining up for?"
 The granddaughter, not willing to tell the truth, told her grandmother that she was lining up for some free oranges. Well, grandma, not one for passing up something free, joined the back of the line. A policeman who was going down the line taking information from each girl, soon reached the grandmother. He was stunned and bewildered to see her.
 So, he asked carefully, "Ma am, you're rather old to be out here, how do you still do it?"
 Grandma proudly replied, "Oh, it's easy, I just take out my teeth and suck'em dry."
***
What do Mexicans use to cut their pizza?
 Little Caesars 

http://imgur.com/QdWVk4r
***
The janitor at the zoo
A janitor at a zoo gets called into the managers office. The manager tells him they have to let him go due to budget issues. The janitor is set back and cries, "please, please let me keep my job! My mother is in the hospital and I have to pay her medical bills!" The manager scratches his chin for a few moments then replies, "you know.. there is something you can do. Our prized gorilla is sick and we need to ship him away for a few weeks so he can recover, but he is one of our most popular exhibits and we will lose tremendous revenue if he is gone. Come in tomorrow and I will have a gorilla suit for you to dress up in so you can pretend to be the gorilla. If we don't lose attendance during this time perhaps we can give you your old job back after."

The janitor is unsure, but with no other options, decides to accept the offer. He comes in early the next day, puts on his gorilla suit, and is instructed by the manager to stay in the corner of the animal pen all day and hold still so as not to give himself away. He does as he is told and to his surprise, no one notices that he is a fake.

After a few days of this, the janitor becomes bored of sitting around and holding still all day. That night he watches some videos of gorillas and starts practicing how they walk. The next day, he works up the courage to try it out, and starts walking around on his fists. The crowd gets excited which encourages the janitor to study some more the next night, and he practices beating his chest and grunting.

The next day he tries out his new moves and the crowd gets very excited at the sudden life that has come in to the gorilla. More and more people start to gather to watch as the gorilla starts beating his chest, grunting and running around. The janitor gets so encouraged by the crowd that he decides to climb up a tree and swing around on a vine. Lost in the excitement, he loses control and flies over into the next animal pen. A lion walks up into his face and lets out a loud "ROAARRRR!!" The janitor loses character and starts freaking out yelling, "help! help! someone get me out here!" Then the lion says to him, "shut up you fool, you'll get us all fired!"
***
Sally can't sell seashells down by the seashore anymore...
She was busted for conch-traband.
***
My Dad's bear story.
A long time ago, my Dad worked on the Canadian Geographic Survey, which took him into the Rocky Mountains.

He told me this story about it.

Dad:  I was working with my coworker all day, and then we returned to camp and started cooking dinner.  The smell must have carried on the wind, and attracted the wildlife, because I turned around, and there was a full grown Grizzly Bear in the middle of the camp!

Me: :-O  What did you do?

Dad: I picked up some shit, and threw it right in his face!

Me:  uhhhh...  where'd you get the shit?

Dad: It was right there in my pants!
***
A Russian, visiting the USA, went for an eye check up
A Russian, visiting the USA, went for an eye check up.

The Doctor shows the letters on the board:
CZWXNQSTAZKY

Doctor: Can you read this ?

Russian: Read ??? I even know the guy, he's my cousin.
***
Little Billy comes home early from school, only to find his Dad masturbating in the living room...
As Billy is quite young, he is shocked and confused at what he is seeing. His Dad tries to explain:
"Don't be scared, Billy. I'm not hurting myself, I'm doing something completely normal. In fact, you are going to start doing it pretty soon as well."
"Why is that, Dad?", young Billy asks.
"Because, son, my hand is getting tired and I need someone to take over."
***
A German man goes on holiday
to Poland, he gets stopped at the border (because it's an out of date joke), and the border guard checks his papers and decides to ask him a few questions

"Name?"

"Hans Schmidt"

"Age?"

"32"

"Place of birth?"

"Dusseldorf"

"Occupation?" 

"No, just visiting"
***
The 100 Dollar Tattoo.
Larry gets home late one night and his wife, Linda, says "Where in the hell have you been?"

He replies, "I was out getting a tattoo."

"A tattoo?" she frowned. "What kind of tattoo did you get?"

"I got a hundred dollar bill on my privates" he said proudly.

"What the hell were you thinking?" she said, shaking her head in disdain. "Why on earth would an accountant get a hundred dollar bill tattooed on his privates?"

"Well, for one; I like to watch my money grow, and two; once in a while I like to play with my money, thirdly; I like how money feels in my hand, and lastly; instead of you going out shopping, you can stay right here at home and blow a hundred bucks anytime you want." 
***
President Obama visits the Pentagon...
President Obama visits the Pentagon to test out the latest in military technology.

A scientist says to him "We have two projects that we are very proud of. One is a powered exoskeleton and the other is an invisibility cloak. Which would you like to try first?"

Obama replies,  "Uh, let me be clear."
***
A woman who has just given birth has fallen into a coma.
After 7 months the mother finally awakes and asks the doctor about her baby.

Doctor: Good news, you had twins! a boy and a girl. They are healthy, luckily your brother named them for you.

Mother: Oh no, not my brother! he's so stupid! What did he name my daughter? 

Doctor: Denise.

Mother: well that isn't so bad, and what did he name my son?

Doctor: Denephew.
***
A teacher is teaching a class and she sees that Johnny isn't paying attention..
so she asks him, "If there are three ducks sitting on a fence, and you shoot one, how many are left?" Johnny says, "None." The teacher asks, "Why?" Johnny says, "Because the shot scared them all off." The teacher says, "No, two, but I like how you're thinking."

 Johnny asks the teacher, "If you see three women walking out of an ice cream parlor, one is licking her ice cream, one is sucking her ice cream, and one is biting her ice cream, which one is married?"

The teacher says, "The one sucking her ice cream." Johnny says, "No, the one with the wedding ring, but I like how you're thinking!"
***
My Favorite Animal
Our teacher asked what my favorite animal was, and I said, "Fried chicken."
She said I wasn't funny, but she couldn't have been right, because everyone else laughed.
My parents told me to always tell the truth. I did. Fried chicken is my favorite animal. 
I told my dad what happened, and he said my teacher was probably a member of PETA.
He said they love animals very much.
I do, too. Especially chicken, pork and beef. Anyway, my teacher sent me to the principal's office.
I told him what happened, and he laughed, too. Then he told me not to do it again.
The next day in class my teacher asked me what my favorite live animal was. 
I told her it was chicken. She asked me why, so I told her it was because you could make them into fried chicken.
She sent me back to the principal's office. He laughed, and told me not to do it again.
I don't understand. My parents taught me to be honest, but my teacher doesn't like it when I am.
Today, my teacher asked me to tell her what famous person I admired most. I told her, "Colonel Sanders."
Guess where I am now...

***
A genie gives a man three wishes...
One day a man was waking along the beach when he tripped over a lamp. He turned around and kicked the lamp out of anger. A few seconds later, a genie popped out of the lamp.

Reluctantly, the genie said, "Even though you kicked me, I still have to give you three wishes. However, because of what you did, I will also give twice what you wish for to the person you hate the most: your boss."

So the man agreed and made his first wish. "I want lots of money", he said. Instantly 22 million dollars appeared in the man's bank account and 44 million appeared in his boss' account.

For his second wish, the man wished for a couple of sports cars. Instantly a Lamborghini, Ferrari and Porsche appeared. At the same time two of each car appeared outside of his boss' house.

Finally the genie said, "This is your last wish, you should choose carefully," and to this the man replied, "I've always wanted to donate a kidney..."
***
A husband and wife are having dinner...
A husband and wife are having dinner at a veryfine restaurant when an absolutely stunningyoung woman comes over to their table, gives thehusband a big open-mouthed kiss, then saysshe'll see him later and walksaway.‪‪The wife glares at her husband and says,"Who in the hell was that?""Oh," replies the husband, "She's my mistress.""Well, that's the last straw," says the wife. "I've had enough. I want a divorce!""I can understand that," replies her husband, "But remember, if we get a divorce it will mean no moreshopping trips to Paris, no more wintering in Barbados,  no more summers in Tuscany, no more Jaguar in the garage,  and no more yacht club. Not only that,  but no more diamonds, no more credit card, and large bank account."  "But, he said, "The decision is all yours."Just then, a mutual friend oftheirs enters the restaurant with a gorgeous babe on his arm."Who's that woman with Bobby?" asks the wife."That's his mistress," says thehusband.                                                                          "Ours is prettier," she replies !
***
So I tried Colgate for the first time.. was not impressed-
The tube said 'Guaranteed whiteness in 3 brushes". 3 brushes later, I'm still Asian.

(Speaking of still Asians, my grandma's a quadriplegic. She's a pretty still Asian)
***
A train goes under a tunnel. Credits to /u/capilot
A soldier, an officer, a young woman, and a matron are sitting in a train compartment. The train goes into a tunnel, and for a moment all is dark. A kiss is heard, followed by a slap. The light comes back, and the officer is rubbing his face.

The matron thinks "that awful officer kissed the young woman and got what he deserved."

The young woman thinks "that blind fool tried to kiss me, and kissed the old woman instead."

The officer thinks "That cheeky private kissed the girl and she thought it was me."

The soldier thinks "That worked out pretty well. I kissed the back of my own hand and got to slap an officer."
***
Guy walks into a bar...
A guy walks into a bar and asks the bartender for a drink. While he sits there he notices a jar full of money on the bar. Next to the jar is a sign that reads, "complete the challenge win the prize." Curious, the guy asks the bartender about the challenge. The bartender explains there are three parts that must be completed. First: Down a gallon of tequila straight in under five minutes. Second: An alligator out back has a terrible tooth and ache and the tooth has to be pulled. Third: Have sex with the dirtiest hooker in the place. The guy thinks it over and he accepts the challenge. He downs the tequila in no time. Then he staggers out back and everyone in the bar hears an awful commotion. Then silence. The guy stumbles back in the door his clothes torn to sheds. He yells, "Now! Where's that hooker with the tooth ache?"
***
So Harambe walked into a bar
Bartender: What will you be having to drink?
Harambe: I'll have a beer
Me: No, he'll have just ice.
Bartender: Just ice?
Me: Yes, justice for Harambe
***
The old man in his deathbed looks his wife in the eye:

"Honey, please be honest with me. I'm not long for this world, and something has really been eating at me for a while.
I've always found our 6th son a bit weird...different, if you may. He has a different father from the other ones, hasn't he?"
The wife, in tears and sobbing uncontrollably, asks for forgiveness and buries her face in her hands, while nodding.
The husband, curious:
"So, who's the father?"
The wife, very sincere, answers
"It's you..."

***
A DEA officer stopped at our farm yesterday...
"I need to inspect your farm for illegal growing of drugs."

I said, "Okay, but don't go into that field over there....."

The DEA officer verbally exploded saying, "Mister, I have the authority of the federal government with me!" Reaching into his rear pants pocket, the arrogant officer removed his badge and shoved it in my face. "See this fucking badge?! This badge means I'm allowed to go wherever I wish... On any land! No questions asked or answers given. Have I made myself clear?! Do you understand?!"

I nodded politely, apologized and went about my chores. A short time later, I heard screaming, looked up, and saw the DEA officer running for his life being chased by my big, old, mean bull... With every step the bull was gaining ground on the officer, and it seemed likely that he sure enough would get gored before he reached safety. The officer was clearly terrified.

I threw down my tools, ran for the fence, and yelled at the top of my lungs...

"Your badge! Show him your fucking BADGE!!"
***
What did the Nazi say to the clock that only went: "tick ____ tick ____ tick ____" ?
"Ve have Vays of making you tock!"
***
Blonde at the Superbowl
A guy took his blonde girlfriend to the Super Bowl game.

They had great seats right behind their team's bench.

After the game, he asked her how she liked it.

"Oh, I really liked it," she replied, "especially the

tight pants and all the big muscles, but I just couldn't

understand why they were killing each other over 25 cents."

Dumbfounded, her boyfriend asked, "What do you

mean?"

"Well, they flipped a coin, one team got it,  then for the rest of the game, all they kept screaming was...

 

'Get the quarterback! Get the quarterback!'

I'm like...Helloooooo? It's only 25 cents!"


***
I was watching the news this morning when the presenter said..
"A man has been arrested after half a million indecent images of children were found at his home in Bradford. Our reporter Gary O'Donoghue has more."

Gary, you filthy bastard.
***
A sadist, a masochist, a murderer, a necrophile, a zoophile and a pyromaniac are all sitting on a bench in a mental institution, bored out of their minds.
"How about having sex with a cat?" asked the zoophile.  
"Let's have sex with the cat and then torture it," says the sadist.  
"Let's have sex with the cat, torture it and then kill it," shouted the murderer.  
"Let's have sex with the cat, torture it, kill it and then have sex with it again," said the necrophile.  
"Let's have sex with the cat, torture it, kill it, have sex with it again and then burn it," said the pyromaniac.  
Silence took over... and the masochist says: "Meow."  
***
A man is sobbing into his beer...
It being a slow night, the bartender asks him what's wrong and offers him some sympathy.

The man responds "My roommate says I should quit drinking, last night I came home and I blew chunks all over the living room."

"Harsh," the bartender replies, "But that's hardly a reason to quit drinking."

"No man, I blew chunks in the kitchen, I blew chunks on the stairs, I blew chunks in the bathroom, I blew chunks EVERYWHERE."

"I'd hate to agree with your roommate, seeing as how that means less business for me, but maybe he's got a point. That's an awful lot of vomit to have to mop up..."

"No, no, you don't understand," The man sobbed, "Chunks is my Dog."
***
A man tells his wife he's going to the store...
A man tells his wife that he's going out to buy cigarettes. When he gets to the store he finds out it's closed. So the guy ends up going to the bar to use the vending machine. While there, he has a few beers and begins talking to this beautiful girl. He has a few more beer and the next thing he knows he's in this girl's apartment and having quite a pleasurable time. The next thing he know it was 3:00 AM.

"Oh my, god, my wife is going to kill me!" he exclaimed. "Quick give me some talcum powder!"

She gets him some and he rubs it all over his hands. When he got home his wife is up waiting for him and she's furious. "Where the hell have you been!"

He says, "Well to tell you the truth, I went into a bar, had a few drinks, went home with this blonde and I slept with her." "Let me see your hands!" she demands. He shows his wife his powdery hands.

"Damn liar, you were out bowling again!"

***
The other day, I was going down on my girlfriend...
...I said to her, "Jeez you got a big pussy. Jeez you got a big pussy." She said, "Why did you say that twice?" I said, "I didn't." 
***
Three men are walking along the beach...
Three men are walking along the beach of a tropical island when they encounter a lone mermaid. The mermaid seems friendly, and the men are amazed at seeing this beautiful woman, so they strike up a conversation with her.

Eventually, the first man asks "Have you ever been kissed 
before?"

"No," responds the mermaid. So the first man kisses her, and she enjoys it.

The second man then asks "Have you ever had your breasts fondled before?"

"Oh, my, no!" says the mermaid, clearly embarrassed. The second man then convinces her to allow him to fondle her breasts, and she enjoys it also.

Finally, the third man says to the mermaid "have you ever been fucked before?"

"Oh, goodness, no!", the mermaid says, her face bright red from embarrassment.

The third man responds, "Well, you are now, the tide's out."
***
Sunday Morning Sex
Upon hearing that her elderly grandfather had just passed away, Katie went straight to her grandparent's house to visit her 95 year-old grandmother and comfort her. 

When she asked how her grandfather had died, her grandmother replied, "He had a heart attack while we were making love on Sunday morning." Horrified, Katie told her grandmother that 2 people nearly 100 years old having sex would surely be asking for trouble. 

"Oh no, my dear," replied granny. "Many years ago, realizing our advanced age, we figured out the best time to do it was when the church bells would start to ring. It was just the right rhythm. Nice and slow and even. Nothing too strenuous, simply in on the Ding and out on the Dong." She paused to wipe away a tear, and continued, "He'd still be alive if the ice cream truck hadn't come along."
***
John Snow.
John Snow was at a bar outside the great wall drinking. A beautiful girl comes inside and her eyes meet his. She likes him, so she goes and introduce herself. 

-Hello, handsome. My name is Jenny Spring. What's yours? 


John laughs and continues with his drink. 

-Why is this funny? 

John responds,

-Nothing. I just imagine how rare it would be to have 7 inches of Snow in spring...
***
Cockpit duties...
Years ago on a long AA flight, an elderly lady asked if she could visit the cockpit. 

When she got up there, she found four crewmen. She asked the first what he did, and he explained that he was the navigator and what his responsibilities were. 

She turned to next one and asked what he did. He explained that he was the engineer and his job was to monitor and troubleshoot any system problems to keep the flight operating smoothly. 

She turned to the next one and asked what he did. He explained that as the captain he was responsible for everything on the airplane and the functioning of the crew. She turned to the first officer and asked "Well young man, what is your job?" 

He replied "Ma'am, I am the captain's sexual advisor."

Somewhat shocked, she said "I beg your pardon, but what do you mean by that?"

"Very simple ma'am. The captain has told me that when he wants my fucking advice, he'll ask me."

***
A man walks into a job interview...
He sits down on a chair, and the interviewer starts questioning him.

"So son, where did you receive your education?"

The man replied "Yale". 

The interviewer, pleasantly surprised, says "Yale? Hard to believe you went to Yale to become a janitor. So what's your name?"

The man replied "Yack Yackson".
***
A joke from WWII
A German soldier is talking to a Swiss soldier:

"How many soldiers could Switzerland mobilize if we were to invade?"

"Half a million within two days."

"And if we invade with a million troops?"

"We shoot twice and go home."
***
I don't see why we Brits don't celebrate the 4th of July. Surely 239 years of being officially separate from America is something to be happy about.

***
So a woman had been in a coma for a few years. . .
And everyday, when the nurse comes in to bathe her, she notices slight changes in her vital stats whenever she washes near her crotch. So the nurse fetches the woman's husband and says, 
"I think a little oral sex is all your wife needs to come out of this coma." 
The husband nods and asks for a little privacy. The nurse leaves, but after a few minutes she hears a horrible clatter followed by the woman flat-lining. The nurse runs in and yells, 
"What the hell happened?"
The husband replied, "I don't know! I think she choked!"
***
Ukrainian authorities are planning to turn the Chernobyl exclusion zone into an amusement park
They say the only difference between it and Disneyland will be that the six foot tall mouse isn't a costume.
***
Eight year old tells funniest joke
My eight year old cousin told me this one:

Why was Beethoven mad at his chicken?

Because he kept saying Bach Bach Bach 

EDIT: god damn you autocorrect! always running my jokes! 
***
A drunk that smelled like a brewery got on a bus one day...
He sat down next to a priest. The drunk's shirt was stained, his face was full of bright red lipstick and he had a half-empty bottle of wine sticking out of his pocket. He opened his newspaper and started reading. A couple minutes later, he asked the priest, "Father, what causes arthritis?"

"Mister, it's caused by loose living, being with cheap, wicked women, too much alcohol, and contempt for your fellow man," the priest replied.

"Imagine that," the drunk muttered. He returned to reading his paper.

The priest, thinking about what he had said, turned to the man and apologized: "I'm sorry, I didn't mean to come on so strong. How long have you had arthritis?"

"I don't have arthritis, Father," the drunk said, "but I just read in the paper that the Pope does."
***
Guess how old I am?
A man decides to have a face-lift for his birthday. He spends $5,000 and feels really good about the results. On his way home, he stops at a newsstand and buys a paper.  
Before leaving, he says to the sales clerk, "I hope you don't mind me asking, but how old do you think I am?"  

"About 35," was the reply.  
"I'm actually 47," the man says, feeling really happy.  

After that, he goes into McDonalds for lunch and asks the clerk the same question.  
The reply is, "Oh, you look about 29".  

"I'm really 47!", he says, feeling better than ever.  

Later, while standing at a bus stop, he asks an old woman the same question.  
She replies, "I am 85 years old, and my eyesight is going. But when I was young, there was a sure way of telling a man's age. If I put my hand down your pants and play with your balls for 10 minutes, I will be able to tell you your exact age."  
As there was no one around, the man thinks, What the hell and lets her slip her hand down his pants.  
Ten minutes later, the old lady says, "Okay, it's done. You are 47."  
Stunned, the man says, "That was brilliant. How did you do that?"    

The old lady replies, "I was standing behind you at McDonalds."  

Edit: Fixed a bit  

***
I'm not sure churches are the best places for PokèStops...
a priest just asked me in and offered me a Slowpoke

edit: whoops, rip inbox. don't get sucked in by priests, kiddies.
***
Finally proves all blondes aren't dumb
Two bored casino dealers are waiting at a craps table. A very attractive blonde lady comes in and wants to bet twenty-thousand dollars on a single roll of the dice. She says, "I hope you don't mind, but I feel much luckier when I'm completely nude." With that she strips naked from her neck down, and rolls the dice while yelling, "Momma needs new clothes!" She then begins jumping up and down and hugging each of the dealers. Then hollers... "YES! I WIN! I WIN!" With that she picks up her money and clothes and quickly leaves. The dealers just stare at each other dumbfounded. Finally one of them asks, "What did she roll anyway?" The other answers, "I thought YOU were watching!" 
***
Pavlov's birds
An MIT student spent an entire summer going to the Harvard football field every day wearing a black and white striped shirt, walking up and down the field for ten or fifteen minutes throwing birdseed all over the field, blowing a whistle and then walking off the field.  At the end of the summer, it came time for the first Harvard home football team, the referee walked onto the field and blew the whistle, and the game had to be delayed for a half hour to wait for the birds to get off of the field.  The guy wrote his thesis on this, and graduated.
***
A man drives by a police camera and it flashes...
A man drives by a police camera and it flashes. Relatively sure that he was not speeding, he goes around and drives by the camera again, this time keeping an eye on his speed and going 10 mph under the limit and it still flashes.

Surprised, he goes around and drives by a 3rd time, this time going even slower while looking at the camera. As he passes by, it flashes a 3rd time. 

Finding it hilarious, he goes around a 4th time, this time he goes at a crawling speed while making faces at the camera and indeed it flashes. He laughs his ass off and goes home, eager to tell his story to his wife.

2 weeks later he receives 4 infractions for not wearing his seat belt. 

edit: a word
***
A man is driving down a country road
A man is driving down a country road when he loses control of his car and ends up in a ditch. He gets out of the car and knocks on a farmhouse door for help. He explains his situation to the farmer. The farmer gets his horse and they walk to the crash scene. The farmer then uses rope to tie the horse to the car

"Pull, Zoomer, pull" the farmer shouts, but the horse doesn't move.

"Pull, Radar, pull" the farmer yells again, but again, the horse stands still

"Pull, Dasher, pull" yells the farmer, but the horse stands like a rock.

"Pull, Dusty, pull" shouts the farmer, and the horse finally gets the car out with minimal effort.

The driver is dumbfounded so he asks the farmer, "why do you call your horse different names?"

"You see," the farmer replies, "Dusty is blind. If he knew he was working by himself, he wouldn't have pulled."


***
A couple in their 80's
A couple in their 80's were having problems remembering things, so they decided to the go the doctor for a checkup. The doctor tells them that they are physically okay, but they might want to start writing things down to help them remember.

Later that night, while watching TV, the old man gets up from his chair. His wife asks, "Where are you going?" "To the kitchen for a drink," he replies. She asks, " Will you get me piece of cake?" The husband says, "Sure." She gently reminds him, "Don't you think you should write it down so you don't forget it?" He says, "No, I can certainly remember that!"

Then the woman says, "Well, I'd like some strawberries on top. You'd better write it down because I know you'll forget it." The man replies, "I can remember that! You want some cake with strawberries."

She adds, "I'd also like whipped cream on top. Now I'm certain you're gonna forget that, so you'd better write it down ok." Irritated, he says, "I don't need to write it down woman! I can remember that! Cake with strawberries! And whipped cream!" He then grumbles into the kitchen. After about 30 minutes the old man returns from the kitchen and hands his wife a plate of bacon and eggs. She stares at the plate for a moment and says, "Where's my toast?
***
How to Sell a Dead Donkey
Young Chuck moved to Texas and bought a donkey from a farmer for $100.
The farmer agreed to deliver the donkey the next day.
The next day the farmer drove up and said, 'Sorry Chuck, but I have some bad news The donkey died.'
Chuck replied, 'Well, then just give me my money back.'
The farmer said, 'Can't do that. I went and spent it already.'
Chuck said, 'OK, then, just bring me the dead donkey.'
The farmer asked, 'What ya gonna do with a dead donkey?
Chuck said, 'I'm going to raffle him off.'
The farmer said 'You can't raffle off a dead donkey!'
Chuck said, 'Sure I can. Watch me. I just won't tell anybody he's dead.'
A month later, the farmer met up with Chuck and asked, 'What happened with that dead donkey?'
Chuck said, 'I raffled him off. I sold 500 tickets at two dollars apiece, less the $100 I gave you and made a profit of $898.00.'
The farmer said, 'Didn't anyone complain?'
Chuck said, 'Just the guy who won. So I gave him his two dollars back.'
***
Why did Jimmy bring his cat to school?
The teacher asked Jimmy, "Why is your cat at school today Jimmy?" Jimmy replied crying, "Because I heard my daddy tell my mommy, 'I am going to eat that pussy once Jimmy leaves for school today!'" 

***
One hell of a day
There I was sitting at the bar staring at my drink when a large, trouble-making biker steps up next to me, grabs my drink and gulps it down in one swig.  

"Well, whatcha' gonna do about it?" he says, menacingly, as I burst into tears.  

"Come on, man," the biker says, "I didn't think you'd CRY.  I can't stand to see a man crying."  

"This is the worst day of my life," I say.  

"I'm a complete failure. I was late to a meeting and my boss fired me. When I went to the parking lot, I found my car had been stolen and I don't have any insurance. I left my wallet in the cab I took home. I found my wife with another man... and then my dog bit me."  

"So I came to this bar to work up the courage to put an end to it all, I buy a drink, I drop a cyanide capsule in and sit here watching the poison dissolve; and then you show up and drink the whole damn thing!  

But hell, enough about me, how are you doing?"   


***
Why doesn't George RR Martin use twitter?
Because he killed all 144 characters

  -stolen from /r/gameofthrones
***
A Mexican Magician...
A Mexican magician says he will dissappear on the count of three. 

Uno... Dos... *poof*

He's disappeared... 

Without a tres.
***
TIL the american flag planted on the moon is now completely white due to radiation from the sun.
Great, now future archeologists are gonna think the French got there first.
***
Hunger Games : Mockingjay
For the last installments of the Hunger Games series, the director has decided to make a change. In the new movies, Philip Seymour Hoffman will unexpectedly be killed by the heroine.
***
A cowboy rides into a strange town and sees carpenters finishing work on a gallows....
He sees a guy tying up his horse in front of the saloon and calls, "Hey, are you folks gonna hang someone?"

The guy nods. "Yup. We're fixin' to hang Brown Paper Larry."

The cowboy's brow furrows. "How come he's called Brown Paper Larry?"

"Well," says the guy, "the man always wears clothes made of brown paper. Brown paper shirts. Brown paper pants. Even brown paper socks."

The cowboy ponders this for a moment, then asks, "What are ya hangin' him for?"

"Rustling."

***
Why did the chef add extra oregano to the sauce?
He was making up for lost thyme. 

Thank you, thank you. I'll just show myself out now.

*Wow, thanks! I was expecting a much chilier reception, but your warm comments have kept those fears at bay (that's what you get for encouraging me :)*
***
A policeman pulls over a driver...
for swerving in and out of lanes on the highway. He tells the guy to blow a breath into a breathalyzer.
“I can't do that, officer.”

“Why not?”

“Because I'm an asthmatic. I could get an asthma attack if I blow into that tube.”

“Okay, we'll just get a urine sample down at the station.”

“Can’t do that either, officer.”

“Why not?”

“Because I'm a diabetic. I could get low blood sugar if I pee in a cup.”

“Alright, we could get a blood sample.”

“Can’t do that either, officer.”

“Why not?”

“Because I'm a hemophiliac. If I give blood I could die.”

“Fine then, just walk this white line.”

“Can’t do that either, officer.”

“Why not?”

“Because I’m drunk.”
***
It was the end of the sixth day of the Creation and God summoned Adam and Eve.
God:  Adam, Eve, I have a very important decision for both of you to make.  Throughout the day I have created the beasts of the land and have bestowed upon them traits and abilities.  I have given flight to the birds, speed to the cheetah, the ability to breathe underwater to the fish of the sea, and so forth.

Now I have only two traits left, one for each of you.  You get to choose between yourselves which one you will take for your gender.

Eve:  So what do we have to choose from?

God:  The first is the ability to pee while standing up and the-

Adam:  OH OH OH!  THAT ONE!  I WANT THAT ONE!

God:  Very well.  Adam, you and every man after you will urinate standing up.  Eve you get multiple orgasms.
***
Two hillbillies walk into a restaurant
While having a bite to eat, they talk about their moonshine operation.
  
Suddenly, a woman at a nearby table, who is eating a sandwich, begins to cough. After a minute or so, it becomes apparent that she is in real distress. One of the hillbillies looks at her and says,
'Kin ya swallar?'

  
The woman shakes her head no.
  
Then he asks, 'Kin ya breathe?'
  
The woman begins to turn blue and shakes her head no.
  
The hillbilly walks over to the woman, lifts up her dress, yanks down her drawers and quickly gives her right butt cheek a lick with his tongue.  
The woman is so shocked that she has a violent spasm and the obstruction flies out of her mouth.
As she begins to breathe again, the Hillbilly walks slowly back to his table.  
  
His partner says, 'Ya know, I'd heerd of that there 'Hind Lick Maneuver' but I ain't niver seed nobody do it!'
***
Trouble asking a girl out
So there's this kid, let's call him Jerry. He's been eyeing this girl at school for months now, and there's a big dance coming up. He knows she doesn't have a date, and he would give anything to go with her- but there's a problem. Whenever he gets close to her, he gets an erection that would rival that of Charlie Sheen in an unsupervised pharmacy. He thinks he has a solution: just call her! He calls her, and stutters a bit on the phone, but she finds his stammering cute and accepts his proposal. "Pick me up at seven," she says. "Oh joyous day!" says Jerry. His joy is short-lived, however, because he realizes that he has only delayed the inevitable. How can he conceal his boner? He tries a number of solutions, including willpower, distractions, baggy pants-- nothing works. Finally, he decides to just tie it to his leg. Feeling confident, he heads off to her house. He's all dressed up, he brought her flowers, his car is cleaned, everything is in order. He walks up to the door and rings the bell. She opens the door. He kicks her in the face.
***
A black man is driving his Mercedes when he gets pulled over by a cop....
The cop asks him for his license and regristration and begins to question him about his car. "Where'd you get the money to buy such a nice Benz?" The man replies, "I'm a specialty surgeon, I enlarge assholes." Skeptical, the officer asks more about the procedure. The man explains, "First you work a finger in, then two, three, until you can get your whole hand in...then you do the other and slowly pull and work the rim until you can get a foot in for more leverage, then both feet and pull and stretch it until it's about 6'. The cop asks, "What the hell do you do with a 6 foot asshole?" The black man replies, "Give it a badge and a radar gun".


Edit: Wow, who does number 2 in r/jokes work for!
***
"Fifty Bucks is Fifty Bucks" reminded me of this one.
A man and his wife were driving from New York to California. Along the way the wife would find every little thing wrong with her husband's driving.    
"You're driving too fast." "You missed that exit." "You're tailgating."    
This went on throughout the trip. As their car crossed the border into Colorado, a cop flashed his lights and the man pulled over. The cop walks up to the driver's side and the man rolls down his window.    
"Hey, Buddy, didn't you notice your wife fell out of the car about a quarter-mile back?"    
The man said to the cop: "Thank God, I thought I went deaf."
***
Creationism v Feminism
In the beginning god made everything and said it was good. 

Then he asked Adam, "Is there anything else you could possibly want?"

Adam replied, "I want a companion. Someone that will always be there for me. Someone that will love me, console me when I'm sad, celebrate with me when I'm happy, and stimulate me when I'm bored. I want a true soul mate."

God says "Ok... But that will cost you an arm and a leg." 

Adam sighs and says "Alright then... What can I get for a rib?"
***
LPT: How to pick up girls
Try this: 

1. Acquire several dozen limes.
1. Go up to them and then drop all the limes.
1. Start picking them up, but keep dropping them. The clumsier you look the better.
1. Keep doing this until you have their attention (this could take up to thirty minutes).
1. Finally gather up the limes. Try looking a bit sheepish.
1. Look them deeply in the eyes and say, "Sorry, I'm bad at Pickup Limes."
***
White priest goes and lives with an African tribe...
He spends his days teaching the way of the lord. After several years, a village woman gives birth to a white baby. The Chief is not happy with this. When he confronts the priest, the priest tries to explain these things happen in nature. With the chief not understanding, the priest tries to explain further....

 "ok chief. See that flock of sheep?" 

"Mmm yes".

"See they are all white, but that one black one?"

"Mmm yes".

"Does that help you to understand?"

"Mmm yes. I no say nothing about baby, you no say nothing about sheep."
***
How bout a blowjob?
Two married buddies are out drinking one night when one turns to the other and says, "You know, I don't know what else to do. Whenever I go home after we've been out drinking, I turn the headlights off before I get to the driveway. I shut off the engine and coast into the garage. I take my shoes off before I go into the house, I sneak up the stairs, I get undressed in the bathroom. I ease into bed and my wife STILL wakes up and yells at me for staying out so late!"

His buddy looks at him and says, "Well, you're obviously taking the wrong approach. I screech into the driveway, slam the door, storm up the steps, throw my shoes into the closet, jump into bed, rub my hands on my wife's ass and say, 'How about a blowjob?' ....And she's always sound asleep."
***
The ventriloquist...
...and his dummy were getting big laughs with their repertoire of blonde jokes.  

Midway through the act, a blonde woman in the audience stood up and yelled, "This is offensive!  Is it right to stereotype people by their race?  No!  Is it right to stereotype people by their religion?  No!  So why is it okay to stereotype women by their hair color?  I'm a blonde, and I'M not stupid!"

"I'm sorry, Miss," said the ventriloquist.  "I certainly didn't mean any offense."

"You stay out of this, buddy," said the blonde.  "I'm talking to that little smartass on your knee!"
***
A woman is having an affair during the day while her husband is at work. Her 9 year old son comes home unexpectedly..
.. sees them and
hides in the bedroom closet to watch.
The woman's husband also comes home.
She puts her lover in the closet, not realizing that the little boy is in
there already.
The little boy says, "Dark in here."
The man says, "Yes, it is."
Boy - "I have a baseball."
Man - "That's nice."
Boy - "Want to buy it?"
Man - "No, thanks."
Boy - "My dad's outside."
Man - "OK, how much?"
Boy - "$250"
In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the lover are
in the closet together.
Boy - "Dark in here."
Man - "Yes, it is."
Boy - "I have a baseball glove."
The lover remembering the last time, asks the boy, "How much?"
Boy - "$750"
Man - "Fine."
A few days later, the father says to the boy, "Grab your glove, let's go
outside and have a game of catch." The boy says, "I can't, I sold my
baseball and my glove." The father asks, "How much did you sell them
for?"
Boy - "$1,000"
The father says, "That's terrible to overcharge your friends like
that...that is way more than those two things cost. I'm going to take
you to church and make you confess."
They go to the church and the father makes the little boy sit in the
confession booth and he closes the door.
The boy says, "Dark in here."
The priest says, "Don't start that shit again."
***
The boss wondered why one of his most valued employees was absent...
The boss wondered why one of his most valued employees was absent but had not phoned in sick one day. Needing to have an urgent problem with one of the main computers resolved, he dialled the employee's home phone number and was greeted with a child's whisper. ' Hello ? ' 

'Is your daddy home?' he asked. 

'Yes,' whispered the small voice. 
'May I talk with him?' 

The child whispered, 'No.' 
Surprised and wanting to talk with an adult, the boss asked, 'Is your Mummy there?' 'Yes' 
'May I talk with her?' Again the small voice whispered, 'No' 

Hoping there was somebody with whom he could leave a message, the boss asked, 'Is anybody else there?' 

'Yes,' whispered the child, 'a policeman.' 

Wondering what a cop would be doing at his employee's home, the boss asked, 'May I speak with the policeman?' 

'No, he's busy,' whispered the child. 

'Busy doing what?' 

'Talking to Daddy and Mummy and the Fireman,' came the whispered answer. 

Growing more worried as he heard a loud noise in the background through the earpiece on the phone, the boss asked, 'What is that noise?' 

'A helicopter,' answered the whispering voice. 

'What is going on there?' demanded the boss, now truly apprehensive. Again, whispering, the child answered, 

'The search team just landed a helicopter.' 

Alarmed, concerned and a little frustrated the boss asked, 'What are they searching for?' 

Still whispering, the young voice replied with a muffled giggle... 

'ME.' 
***
An old man goes to the doctors office. ..
As he approached the desk, the receptionist said, "Yes sir, what are you seeing the doctor for today?"
"There's something wrong with my penis," he replied.  The receptionist became irritated and said, "You shouldn't come into a crowded office and say things like that."
"Why not? You asked me what was wrong and I told you," he said.  The receptionist replied, "You've obviously caused some embarrassment in this room full of people. You should have said there is something wrong with your ear or something and then discussed the problem further with the doctor in private."  The man walked out, waited a few minutes and then re-entered.  The receptionist smiled smugly and asked, "Yes?'  "There's something wrong with my ear," he stated.  The receptionist nodded approvingly and smiled, knowing he had taken her advice. "And what is wrong with your ear, Sir?"  "I can't piss out of it..."
***
A construction worker on the 5th floor of a building needed a handsaw...
He spots another worker on the ground floor and yells down to him, but the worker on the ground floor can't hear him. So the worker on the 5th floor tries to use sign language instead. He points to his eye meaning "I", then he points to his knee meaning "need", then moved his hand back and forth in a saw motion. The worker on the ground floor nods his head, pulls down his pants, whips out his cock and starts masturbating. The worker on the 5th floor is furious so he runs down to the ground floor and says "what the fuck is wrong with you, I said I needed a handsaw!" The other worker says "I knew that, I was trying to tell you I'm coming."
***
A kindergarten student told his teacher he'd found a cat...
A kindergarten student told his teacher he'd found a cat, but it was dead. "How do you know that the cat was dead?" she asked her student. "Because I pissed in its ear and it didn't move," answered the child innocently. "You did WHAT?!?!?!" the teacher yelled in shock. "You know," explained the boy, "I leaned over and went 'Pssst!' and it didn't move." 
***
A guy walks into a bar and sees a sign that reads...
A guy walks into a bar and sees a sign that reads:

Cheese Sandwich: $1.50
Chicken Sandwich: $2.50
Hand Job: $10.00

He checks his wallet and beckons to the sexy bartender.

"Are you the one who gives the hand jobs?" he asks.

"Yes," she purrs. "I am."

"Well, wash your fuckin' hands," says the man. "I want a chicken sandwich!"
***
A little old lady
A little old lady was walking down the street dragging two large plastic garbage bags behind her. One of the bags was ripped and every once in a while a $20 fell out onto the sidewalk.

Noticing this, a policeman stopped her, and said, "Ma'am, there are $20 bills falling out of that bag." "Oh, really? Darn it!" said the little old lady. "I'd better go back and see if I can find them. Thanks for telling me officer.

"Well, now, not so fast," said the cop.“Where did you get all that money? You didn't steal it, did you?"

"Oh, no, no", said the old lady. "You see, my back yard is right next to a Golf course. A lot of Golfers come and pee through a knot hole in my fence, right into my flower Garden. It used to really tick me off. Kills the flowers, you know. Then I thought, 'why not make the best of it?

So, now, I stand behind the fence by the knot hole, real quiet, with my hedge clippers. Every time some guy sticks his thing through my fence, I surprise him, grab hold of it and say, 'O.K., buddy! Give me $20, or off it comes.'

"Well, that seems only fair," said the cop, laughing. "OK. Good luck! Oh, by the way, what's in the other bag?"
the old lady said.... "well,Not everybody pays."
***
Why I didn't get the job...
I applied for an executive position at a major corporation.  They called me in for an interview with the board of directors, and it went pretty well.  The next day I got a call... it was the vice president on the line!

"Listen, sir", he told me, "you left me very impressed yesterday.  But there's another candidate for the job.  Very similar education and work background, impressive interview... it's practically a tie between you two".

"Really? So which one of us are you going to hire?" I asked.

"Well," the VP responded, "the Board of Directors has decided to have you both come in to answer a ten question test about our company.  Whoever gets the higher score will get the job.  Be here at 9am sharp tomorrow morning".

So the next morning I go to the VP's office.  The other candidate is there - a very charismatic guy, and obviously really smart.  So we get sat down at two desks, side by side, and are given the test.

A little while later, the VP calls me back into his office.  "Listen... we've scored the tests.  You both got nine out of ten, and both missed question #5.  But we're going to have to go with the other guy."

"What?" I asked, shocked.  "But we got the same question wrong!"

"Yes," the VP answered, "but it had more to do with your answers to #5.  The other candidate answered, 'I don't know', and you answered 'Neither do I'."
***
So a man walks into a bar...
And sees an extraordinarily short man playing the piano. He ignores this, as he then spots a lamp on his usual barstool. He rubs it, and a genie comes out.
The genie, with a commanding genie esque voice says that he will grant the man one wish. 
The man replies "Awesome! I want a million bucks".
And so, one by one, a million ducks walk into the bar. 
The man, furious, exclaims "what the hell? is this genie deaf? I asked for a million bucks, not a million ducks"
The man sitting in the barstool next to him turns around and says "do you really think I asked for a 12 inch pianist?"
***
3 little girls walk up to their father
The first little girl asks, "Daddy, why is my name Rose?"
and the dad says, "because when you were born, a rose petal fell on your head, so we decided to call you rose."  
The second little girl asks, "Daddy, why is my name Lily?"
and the dad says, "because when you were born, a lily petal fell on your head, so we decided to call you Lily."  
The third little girl says, "hurdddurflbbbbb dur."  
and the dad says, "shut up Cinderblock."
***
A kangaroo walks into a bar
A kangaroo walks into a bar and orders a beer.  He pays with a twenty and the bartender figures, "What does a kangaroo know about money?" gives him a single in change.

Then his curiosity gets the better of him.  "You know," he says to the kangaroo, "we don't get a lot of kangaroos in this place."

The kangaroo replies sourly, "Yeah, and at $19 for a beer, you won't be getting many more."
***
A man playing on a new golf course got confused as to what hole he was on.
He saw a lady playing ahead of him. He walked up to her and asked
if she knew what hole he was playing. She replied, "I'm on the 7th 
hole, and you're a hole behind me, so you must be on the 6th hole." He
thanked her and went back to his golf.

On the back nine, the same thing happened, and he approached the lady
again with the same request. She said, "I'm on the 14th, you are a 
hole behind me, so you must be on the 13th." Once again he thanked
her.

He finished his round and went into the club house and saw the lady
sitting at the end of the bar. He went up to her and said, "Let me buy 
you a drink to show my appreciation for your help." He started a
conversation and asked her what kind of work she did. She said she was
in sales, and he said he was in sales also. He asked what she sold.

She replied, "If I told you, you would only laugh."

"No, I wouldn't," he said.

She said, "I sell tampons."

With that he fell on the floor laughing so hard.

She said, "See, I knew you would laugh."

"That's not what I'm laughing at," he replied. "I'm a toilet paper
salesman, so I'm STILL one hole behind you!"
***
A very christian woman
A very Christian woman marries a very Christian man. Following the words of the Bible, "Be fruitful and multiply," they have many children. 16 over the course of 18 years, to be exact.

A few years later, the husband dies suddenly of a heart attack. The lady remarries another man, and they have 17 children over the course of 22 years. The woman's second husband dies of old age.

The woman herself dies a few years later. At her funeral, her sister remarks, "Well, at least they're finally together."

"Who? She and her husbands?" asks the pastor.

"No," says the sister. "Her legs."
***
The Nun
A soldier ran up to a nun. Out of breath he asked, "Please may I hide under your skirt? I will explain later." 

The nun agreed. A moment later Military Police ran up and asked, "Sister, have you seen a soldier run by here?"

 The nun replied, "Nope, not today sir, god bless you" After the Police ran the other direction the soldier crawled out from under her skirt and said, "I can't thank you enough Sister, you see, I don't want to go to war in Iran." The nun said, "I understand completely." The soldier added, "I hope this isn't rude sister but you have a great set of legs!"

 The nun replied "Well, If you had looked a little higher you would have seen a great pair of balls... I don't want to go to Iran either!"
***
A koala was sitting in a tree smoking a joint...
when a lizard walks up and says "Hey koala what are you doing?"

The koala answers "Smoking a joint, come up and have some."

The lizard climbs up and the two share the joint. After a while the lizard says his mouth is dry and excuses himself to a nearby river to have a drink.

The lizard, so stoned, leans over too far and falls in. A crocodile swims out to rescue him. When they get onto dry land, the croc asks, "What's wrong with you, lizard?"

The lizard tells him that he was smoking a joint with a koala, and he got too stoned and fell in while taking a drink.

The croc has to see this for himself, so he asks the lizard to take him to the koala. When they get back to the tree, the croc looks up at the koala and says "Hey, you."

The koala looks down and says "Shiiiit dude, how much water did you drink?"

***
A cowboy and an Indian are riding horseback.
The Indian stops his horse, jumps off and puts his ear to the ground.

He looks up at the cowboy and says, "Buffalo come".

The cowboy looks around and then back at the Indian. "How the hell do you know that?"

The Indian replied, "Ear sticky".
***
The cast of Star Wars VII just finished their first read through (spoilers)
Mark Hamill pulled JJ Abrams to the side and said "Can I have a word?"
***
An Englishman, a Scotsman and an Irishman walk into a bar...
An Englishman, a Scotsman and an Irishman walk into a bar...

The Englishman wanted to go so they all had to leave.
***
I bumped into an old school friend today
I bumped into an old school friend today. He started showing off, talking about his well paid job and expensive sports car.

Then he pulled out a photo of his wife and said, "She's beautiful, isn't she?"

I said, "If you think she's gorgeous, you should see my girlfriend."

He said, "Why? Is she a stunner?"

I said, "No, she's a fucking optician."

Edit: apparently people don't like the fuck. Too fucking late.
***
An Arab student e-mails his dad
Dear Dad,

Berlin is wonderful, people are nice and I really like it here,
but Dad, I am a bit ashamed to arrive at my college with my pure-gold Ferrari 599GTB when all my teachers and many fellow students travel by train.  

Your son, Nasser.
  
  
The next day, Nasser gets a reply to his e-mail from his dad:
  

My dear loving son,

Twenty million US Dollar has just been transferred to your account. Please stop embarrassing us. Go and get yourself a train too.

Love,
your Dad
***
Jesus holds up the bread...
Jesus holds up the bread and says, "This is my body."

Next, Jesus hold up the wine and says, "This is my blood."

After that, Jesus holds up the mayonnaise and Peter says, "That's enough!"
***
Bill Clinton says "Hey Monica, you want to see the clock in the Oval Office?.......
She says "sure"... and goes in there.  Bill Clinton unzips his pants and pulls out his little Billy.

Monica says "That's not a clock".  

To which Bill replies "It is if you put two hands and a face on it".
***
A girl walks into a bar...
and sits down next to some guy. She orders a Bud light. The guy says she should try the magic beer. "Magic beer?" She asks. "Yeah watch this." He takes a sip of his beer, walks to the window, opens it and flies around to the front door, walks in and sits down. The girl says "that's amazing, do it again." He flies around to the front door and sits down at the bar again. The girl says "bartender, magic beer." She takes a sip, walks to the window, jumps out and falls 20 stories to her death. Bartender looks at the man and says, "superman, you're a real dick when you get drunk"
***
A little old lady and a sack full of $20's
A little old lady was walking down the street, dragging two large trash bags behind her.  One of the bags was ripped, and every once in a while a $20 fell out onto the sidewalk.  
  

Noticing this, a policeman stopped her and said, "Ma'am, there is money falling out of your bag."   
"Oh really?" said the lady.  "I'd better go back and see if I can find them.  Thanks for letting me know."  
  

"Well not so fast," says the cop.  "Where did you get all that money?  You didn't steal it did you?"  
  

"Oh of course not," says the old lady.  "You see, my back yard is right next to a golf course.  A lot of golfers come and pee through a knot hole in my fence, right into my flower garden.  It used to really tick me off.  It kills the flowers, you know.  But then I thought, why not make the best of it.  
  

So now I stand behind the fence by the knot hole, real quiet, with my hedge clippers.  Every time some guy sticks his thing through my fence, I surprise him, grab hold of it and say, "OK, buddy!  Give me $20 or off it comes!"  
  

"Well, that seems only fair," said the cop, laughing.  "Well good luck!  Oh, by the way, what's in the other bag?"  
  
"Not everybody pays."
***
The history of the condom.
In 1272, a Welsh inventor created the first condom using a sheeps lower intestine. 



In 1873 the English somewhat refined the idea by taking it out of the sheep first.

~ Obligatory edit. No, it took them 601 years to get the welsh out of the sheep to make the condoms.


***
In the prison shower
A man is being send to prison, on the first day in the shower he is approached by a giant muscular inmate who asks him intimidatingly 

"With or without spit?!" 

The man thinks to himself that it will happen no matter what and that it might hurt less with spit so he frighteningly stammers

"With spit"

To which the giant shouts to another inmate.

"Hey come on over Spit, this dude wants a threesome!"



*Have mercy on my joke, I am not a native English speaker and this joke might work better in German.*
***
There was once a blonde woman.
There was once a blonde woman on a plane to Detroit. She was in the economy class, but after takeoff, she saw an empty seat in first class and moved there. An attendant saw her and said, "Excuse me, ma'am, but you have a ticket for economy class, not first. You cannot stay here." The blonde replied, "I can and I will." The attendant told the copilot, who came and talked to the woman. "Ma'am, we really can't have you staying in this seat, your ticket was for economy." "You can't make me move." The copilot told the captain, who tried to talk her out of the seat but it didn't work. Finally, a man who had heard what had been going on told the attendant to let him have a go at getting the woman out of the seat because he was married to a blonde too, so he knew how to deal with her. After a quick chat with her, she moved. The shocked attendant asked him how he did it. The man replied, "I told her first class wasn't going to Detroit."
***
You're The Father of One of My Kids
A guy goes to the supermarket and notices an attractive woman waving at him. 

She says hello. He's rather taken aback because he can't place where he knows her from. So he says, 'Do you know me?' To which she replies, 'I think you're the father of one of my kids.' 

Now his mind travels back to the only time he has ever been unfaithful to his wife and says, 'Are you the stripper from the bachelor party that I made love to on the pool table with all my buddies watching while your partner whipped my butt with wet celery???' 

She looks into his eyes and says calmly, 'No, I'm your son's teacher.'
***
Kid: Waaaahhhhh! MY TOY IS BROKEN!
Dad: Nothing a little duct tape can't fix.  
Kid: mrnm... mmrm.. rnmr...
***
Two scientists walk into a bar.
"I'll have H2O," says the first.

"I'll have H2O, too," says the second.

The bartender gives them both water because he is able to distinguish the boundary tones that dictate the grammatical function of homonyms in coda position, as well as pragmatic context.
***
A man and his dog walk into a bar...
...The man proclaims, "I'll bet you a round of drinks that my dog can talk."

Bartender: "Yeah! Sure...go ahead."

Man: "What covers a house?"

Dog: "Roof!"

Man: "How does sandpaper feel?"

Dog: "Rough!"

Man: "Who was the greatest ball player of all time?"

Dog: "Ruth!"

Man: "Pay up. I told you he could talk."

The bartender, annoyed at this point, throws both of them out the door. Sitting on the sidewalk, the dog looks at the guy and says, "or is the greatest player Mantle?"
***
A drunk staggers out of a bar and runs right into two priests...
A drunk staggers out of a bar and runs right into two priests. He says, "I'm Jesus Christ." The first priest says, "No, son, you're not." So the drunk says it to the second priest. The second priest says, "No, son, you're not." The drunk says, "Look, I can prove it." He walks back into the bar with the two priests. The bartender takes one look at the drunk and exclaims, "Jesus Christ, you're here again?"
***
My neighbour owes me £500 and he won’t pay up...
A man went to his lawyer and told him, ‘My neighbour owes me £500 and he won’t pay up. What should I do?’ ‘Do you have any proof he owes you the money?’ asked the lawyer. ‘Nope,’ replied the man. ‘OK, then write him a letter asking him for the £1,000 he owed you,’ said the lawyer. ‘But it’s only £500,’ replied the man. ‘Precisely. That’s what he will reply and then you’ll have your proof!’
***
A male patient is lying in bed in the hospital, wearing an oxygen mask over his mouth and nose, still heavily sedated from a difficult surgery.
A young, student nurse appears to give him a partial spongebath. 

“Nurse”, he mumbles, from behind the mask. “Are my testicles black?”

Embarrassed, the young nurse replies, “I don’t know, Sir. I’m only here to wash your upper body and feet.” 

He struggles to ask again, “Nurse, are my testicles black?” 

Concerned that he may elevate his vitals from worry about his testicles, she overcomes her embarrassment and sheepishly pulls back the covers. She raises his gown, holds his penis in one hand and his testicles in the other. She takes a close look and says, “There’s nothing wrong with them, Sir!”

The man pulls off his oxygen mask, smiles at her and says very slowly ,”Thank you very much. That was wonderful, but, listen very, very closely… "A r e –  m y – t e s t – r e s u l t s – b a c k?"
***
The Devil went to a small church...
The congregation at a die hard church was in full swing when with a stench of brimstone and puff of smoke the devil appeared! All them members ran from the church except one little old man in the first row who sat looking calmly at him.
 The devil loomed over the old man and growled " Do you realize who I am?"
 " Sure do." the little old man replied.
 " Do you know i can kill you with a thought?"
 " Sure do."
 " Do you realize i can mangle your body with a touch?"
 " Sure do."
 " Do you realize I can carry you off to Hell for eternity?"
 " Sure do."
 " Then why aren't you scared of me?" The Devil asked quietly.
 " Been married to your sister for 50yrs."
***
"S-H-I-T"
A business man got on an elevator in a building. When he entered the elevator, there was a blonde already inside and she greeted him by saying, "T-G-I-F" (letters only).

He smiled at her and replied, "S-H-I-T" (letters only)."

She looked at him, puzzled, and said, "T-G-I-F" again.

He acknowledged her remark again by answering, "S-H-I-T."

The blond was trying to be friendly, so she smiled her biggest smile and said as sweetly as possibly "T-G-I-F" another time.

The man smiled back to her and once again replied with a quizzical expression, "S-H-I-T."

The blond finally decided to explain things, and this time she said, "T-G-I-F, Thank Goodness It's Friday, get it?"

The man answered, "Sorry, Honey, It's Thursday."
***
asshole
An elderly couple are getting ready for bed. The husband kisses his wife and the couple drifts into sleep. The husband wakes up suddenly to see a tall, pale man standing next to his bed. 
"What are you doing in my room?" he asks.
The man replies, "You have died and I'm here to take you to Heaven."
The husband is in disbelief. "But I never got to say goodbye to my wife."
The tall, pale man is silent for a second. "Well, I can't change that, but I can allow you to come back to the world as a dog, a chicken or an ant."
Without hesitation the man responds, "A chicken."
In the blink of an eye the old man is now a chicken standing among other chickens in a pen. After a few minutes of pecking around he gets a terrible pain in his stomach. He turns to one of the other chickens, "What is this pain I'm feeling?"
The chicken says, "Well, you're a chicken and chicken's lay eggs. Just push and it will be over quickly."
So he starts pushing and sure enough out pops an egg. "Wow! That wasn't so bad." But the pain returns. Again, he turns to a chicken, "The pain is back. Are you sure there's nothing wrong?"
The chicken says, "Well, you're a chicken and chicken's don't usually lay just one egg. Just push and it will be over quickly."
So again he starts pushing and sure enough out pops another egg. "I think I got the hang of this being a chicken thing." Seconds later the pain returns and being prepared for it he starts pushing but the egg isn't coming out as easy this time. He pushes harder. Still nothing. Harder.
Suddenly his wife smacks him in the chest, "Wake up asshole! You're shitting in the bed again!"
***
The CIA, GIGN and KGB......
are all trying to prove they are the best at catching criminals. The Secretary General of the UN decides to set them a test. He releases a rabbit into a forest, and each of them has to catch it. 

The CIA people go in. They place animal informants throughout the forest. They question all plant and mineral witnesses. After three months of extensive investigations, they conclude that the rabbit does not exist. 

The GIGN goes in. After two weeks with no leads they burn the forest, killing everything in it, including the rabbit, and make no apologies: the rabbit had it coming.

 The KGB goes in. They come out two hours later with a badly beaten bear. The bear is yelling: “Okay! Okay! I’m a rabbit! I’m a rabbit!”
***
A Jewish man was talking to a Hindu man
Jew: Yeah, so in my religion we only believe in one God.

Hindu: No way! 

Jew: Yahweh
***
A Guy Goes Into A Bar
A guy goes into a bar, orders a martini, and strikes up a conversation with an attractive woman sitting next to him. "This is a special day," he says, "I'm celebrating." "I'm celebrating, too," she replies, clinking glasses with him. "What are you celebrating?" he asks. "For years I've been trying to have a child," she answers. "Today my gynecologist told me I'm pregnant!"

"Congratulations," the man says, lifting his glass. "As it happens, I'm a chicken farmer and for years all my hens were infertile. But today, they're finally fertile."

"How did it happen?"
"I switched cocks."
"What a coincidence," she says, smiling.
***
10 catholic priests all die in a bus accident....
When they arrive at the Pearly Gates, St. Peter acknowledges them.

He sees that they're all priests and immediately says, "If any of you are paedophiles, there's no point waiting here. You might as well fuck off straight to hell right now!"

9 of the priests turn around and begin to walk away.

St. Peter calls after them,

"AND TAKE THE DEAF BASTARD WITH YOU TOO!"
***
Four men are on the golf course....
Four men went golfing together one day; three headed to the first tee and one went into the club house to take care of the bill. The three men started talking, bragging about their sons. The first man told the others, “My son is a home builder and he’s so successful that he gave a friend a new home – for free.”

The second man said, “My son was a car salesman and now he owns a multi-line dealership. He’’s so successful that he gave a friend two Cadillacs.”

The third man, not wanting to be outdone bragged, “My son is a stock broker and he’s doing so well that he gave his friend an entire stock portfolio.”

The fourth man joined them on the tee after a few minutes of taking care of business. The first man mentioned, “We were just talking about our sons. How is yours doing?” The fourth man replied, “Well, my son is a gay prostitute. I’m not totally thrilled about it, but he must be damn good. Just In the last year his best clients gave him a house, two cars, and a stock portfolio.”
***
Holidays
With the Holidays upon us I would like to share a personal experience with my friends about drinking and driving.
 
As you may know some of us have been known to have brushes with the authorities from time to time on the way home after a "social session" out with friends. Well, two days ago I was out for an evening with friends and had several cocktails followed by some rather nice red wine. Feeling jolly I still had the sense to know that I may be slightly over the limit.
 
That's when I did something that I've never done before - I took a cab home.
 
Sure enough on the way home there was a police road block, but since it was a cab they waved it past. I arrived home safely without incident.
 
This was a real surprise as I had  never driven a cab before, I don't know where I got it and now  that it's in my garage I don't know what to do with it.
***
A soldier ran up to a nun
A soldier ran up to a nun. Out of breath he asked, "Please, may I hide under your skirt. I'll explain later."
The nun agreed...
A moment later two Military Police ran up and asked, "Sister, have you seen a soldier?"
The nun replied, "He went that way."
After the MPs ran off, the soldier crawled out from under her skirt and said, "I can't thank you enough, sister. You see, I don't want to go to Syria."
The nun said, "I understand completely."
The soldier added, "I hope I'm not rude, but you have a great pair of legs!"
The nun replied, "If you had looked a little higher, you would have seen a great pair of balls…. I don't want to go to Syria either."
***
A boy meets a girl's father for the first time
A boy comes over to his girlfriend's house so he could take her out to a dance. There he meets her father for the first time. As the girlfriend gets ready, the boy nervously takes a seat in the living room with the father. No words are spoken as the boy waits, clearly intimidated by the older man. Finally the father breaks the silence.

"You know my daughter, she loves to screw."  
The boy couldn't believe his ears. "Come again sir?"  
"Yeah, she loves to screw. She tells me all the time. You two should do that tonight. It's her favorite!"  
"Are you sure you're okay with that?"  
"Sure! She can screw all night long, that girl."  

The boy, now excited, waited anxiously until his girlfriend was ready and took her to the dance with this new information at hand. The father even gives him a little wink as the couple leave the house. The boy couldn't be happier.

A few hours later however, the daughter comes barreling home with tears streaming her face. The boy is running behind her with a visible red mark of a hand across his face. They get to the father and the daughter screams:

"It's called the TWIST dad! The fucking TWIST!"
***
Usain Bolt goes to a golf course...
He turns up and walks into the clubhouse to get his membership and play a round.

The receptionist says 'Sorry Sir, we don't allow black people in this golf club.'

'That is ridiculous, its 2014 and you don't allow black people in your golf club?'

'Please don't make a scene Sir, there is another gold club 5 minutes down the road and they will let you in.'

'But I'm Usain Bolt!'

'OK then, 2 minutes.'
***
God said to Adam "I'm going to make you a woman"
God: "She's going to clean for you, cook anything you want whenever you want it, always look beautiful, never be bad tempered, give you children, always obedient, and she'll never argue with you."  
Adam: "That sounds great, but what'll it cost me?"  
God: "Oh, an arm and a leg."  
Adam: "That's a bit steep. What can I get for a rib?"
***
A teenager got his driver's license...
...and asked his father, who was a minister, if he could use his car. 


The father said, "If you bring your grades up, study the Bible, and get a haircut, then you can use the car."

One month later, the teenager asked his father about using the car again. The father said, "Son, I'm proud of you. You have brought your grades up and studied the Bible every day. But you still haven't gotten a haircut!"

His son said, "Dad, in my studying of the Bible, I found that many great people had long hair. Samson had long hair. Moses, Noah, and John the Baptist had long hair. Even Jesus had long hair."

His father said, "Yes, and they walked everywhere they went!"
***
Junior Builder....
A young family moved into a house next door to an empty plot. One day, a gang of building workers turned up to start building on the plot.

The young family's 5-year-old daughter naturally took an interest in all the activity going on next door and started talking with the workers.

She hung around and eventually the builders, all with hearts of gold, more or less adopted the little girl as a sort of project mascot. They chatted with her, let her sit with them while they had tea and lunch breaks, and gave her little jobs to do here and there to make her feel important.

They even gave the child her very own hard hat and gloves, which thrilled her immensely.

At the end of the first week, the smiling builders presented her with a pay envelope - containing two pounds in 10p coins. The little girl took

her 'pay' home to her mother who suggested that they take the money to the bank the next day to open a savings account.

At the bank, the female cashier was tickled pink listening to the little girl telling her about her 'work' on the building site and the fact she had a 'pay packet'.

'You must have worked very hard to earn all this', said the cashier.

The little girl proudly replied, 'Yes, I worked every day with Steve and Wayne and Mike. We're building a big house.'

'My goodness gracious,' said the cashier, 'And will you be working on the house again next week?'

The child thought for a moment. Then she said seriously:

'I think so. Provided those wankers at Jewsons deliver the fucking bricks on time.'
***
'NSFW' Why didn't Mrs. Claus ever have kids?
Because Santa always comes down the chimney.
***
An old married couple is laying in bed when the husband fart. "Seven points," he says.
His wife rolls over and says, 'What in the world was that?' The old man replied, 'its fart football.'

A few minutes later his wife lets one go and says, 'Touchdown, tie score...'

After about five minutes the old man lets another one go and says, 'Aha. I'm ahead 14 to 7.'

Not to be outdone the wife rips out another one and says, 'Touchdown, tie score.'

Five seconds go by and she lets out a little squeaker and says, 'Field goal, I lead 17 to 14.' Now the pressure is on for the old man.

He refuses to get beaten by a woman, so he strains real hard.

Since defeat is totally unacceptable, he gives it everything he's got, and accidentally poops in the bed.

The wife says, 'What the hell was that?'

The old man says, 'Half time, switch sides
***
A doctor had sex...
A doctor had sex with one of his female patients and felt guilty all day long. No matter how much he tried to forget about it, he just couldn't.

The guilt and sense of betrayal of his patient were overwhelming. But every once in a while he'd hear an internal, reassuring voice in his head that said: "Don't worry about it. You aren't the first medical practitioner to have sex with one of his patients and you won't be the last. And you're single. Just let it go."

But, invariably, another voice in his head would bring him back to reality, whispering...

"You're a veterinarian, you sick sex fiend."
***
This woman's husband had been slipping in and out of a coma for several months...
This woman's husband had been slipping in and out of a coma for several months, yet she had stayed by his bedside every single day.

One day, when he came to, he motioned for her to come nearer.

As she sat by him, he whispered, eyes full of tears, "You know what? You have been with me through all the bad times. When I got fired, you were there to support me. When my business failed, you were there. When I got shot, you were by my side. When we lost the house, you stayed right here. When my health started failing, you were still by my side... You know what?"

"What dear," she gently asked, smiling as her heart began to fill with warmth, eyes welling with tears.

"I think you're bad luck..."
***
Unjustice In Hell
A man died and was taken to his place of eternal torment by the devil. 

As he passed sulphurous pits and shrieking sinners, he saw a man he recognized as a lawyer snuggling up to a beautiful woman. 

'That's unfair!' he cried. 'I have to roast for all eternity, and that lawyer gets to spend it with a beautiful woman.' 

'Shut up,' barked the devil, jabbing the man with his pitchfork. 
'Who are you to question that woman's punishment?'
***
A bus full of ugly people unexpectedly crashes and kills everyone on board
Everyone shows up at the Gates of Heaven where God comes to meet them all Himself.

"Gee guys, I didn't intend for that to happen, I'm really sorry. I can't just resurrect you all, but to make up for it I'll grant you all one wish before I let you in."

The first person steps up and thinks for a moment. He says "You know God, I've been ugly all my life. For once I would like to know what it is like to be beautiful. Make me beautiful." So God snaps his fingers and it is so.

Everyone else starts chattering amongst themselves at such a brilliant idea. They all start wishing for the same thing.

God steps up to the last guy in line who is laying on his side laughing so hard he is crying. After several minutes of patiently waiting, God finally says "Now what in Heaven could be so funny boy?" The man stands up, wipes a tear from his eye and says "Make them all ugly again."
***
What happened?
A passerby saw a man laid flat on the sidewalk in front of the local beauty shop and ran to offer assistance. As the man came blinking into consciousness, the passerby asked, “What happened?”

The man rubbed the back of his head and said, “I don’t know! Last thing I remember, my wife was coming out of the salon there and I said, “Well, at least they tried.”
***
A man came home from a poker game...
A man came home from a poker game late one night and found his hideous harpy of a wife waiting for him with a rolling pin. "Where the hell have you been?" she asked.
"You'll have to pack all your things, dear," he ad-libbed. "I've just lost you in a card game." "How did you manage to do that?" "It wasn't easy, honest. I had to fold with a royal flush." 
***
Three guys die and go to heaven.
God tells them, "Your vehicle in heaven will be determined based on how well you treated your wife."


The first guy says, "I never cheated on my wife." As such, he gets a Lamborghini.

The second guy says, "I cheated on my wife a little." So he gets a used car.

The third guy says, "I cheated on my wife a lot." So he gets a ~~motorcycle~~ ~~dirtbike~~ ~~bicycle~~ shitty bicycle.


The second and third guys see the first guy crying. They ask, "Why are you crying? You got the best vehicle of all."

The first guy says, "I just saw my wife on rollerskates."


***
So a newlywed couple is in bed after their wedding day when...
The husband lets out a massive fart and the wife says " What was that?"
The husband responds "A game. Im winning 7-0" later the wife lets out a fart and says "7-7!"
The wife follows up with another poot and claims the score 14-7. Finally the the husband fart so explosively that he shits the bed. The wife says "What does that mean?"
The husband replies "halftime switch sides."
***
What's the difference between America and Europe?
In America, we call our inbred hillbillies.

In Europe, they call them royals.
***
Kiss me
"A male engineering student was crossing a road one
day when a frog called out to him and said, “If you kiss
me, I’ll turn into a beautiful princess.” He bent over,
picked up the frog, and put it in his pocket. The frog
spoke up again and said, “If you kiss me and turn me
back into a beautiful princess, I will stay with you for
one week.” The engineering student took the frog out
of his pocket, smiled at it; and returned it to his pocket.
The frog then cried out, “If you kiss me and turn me
back into a princess, I’ll stay with you and do ANYTHING you want.” Again the boy took the frog out,
smiled at it, and put it back into his pocket. Finally, the
frog asked, “What is the matter? I’ve told you I’m a
beautiful princess, that I’ll stay with you for a week and
do anything you want. Why won’t you kiss me?” The
boy said, “Look I’m an engineer. I don’t have time for a
girlfriend, but a talking frog is cool."
***
Starting salary.
Reaching the end of a job interview, the Human Resources Person asked a young Engineer fresh out of MIT, "And what starting salary were you looking for?" 

The Engineer said, "In the neighborhood of $125,000 a year, depending on the benefits package." 

The interviewer said, "Well, what would you say to a package of 5-weeks vacation, 14 paid holidays, full medical and dental, company matching retirement fund to 50% of salary, and a company car leased every 2 years say, a red Corvette?" 

The Engineer sat up straight and said, "Wow! Are you kidding?" 

And the interviewer replied, "Yeah, but you started it."
***
Why did the hipster drown?
Because he went ice-skating before it was cool ‎( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
***
Tribal Wisdom
So a cowboy is riding along a trail in the old west and sees an Indian lying on his stomach with his ear to the ground. As he gets closer he hears the Indian saying to himself "Wagon...two gray horses...two passengers, man and woman...man driving" The cowboy goes "Wow! you can tell all that by just putting your ear to the ground?" The Indian replies "No. Wagon pass half hour ago, run me over."
***
A Russian couple walks down a street in Moscow when the man feels a drop hit his nose.
"I think it's raining," he says to his wife.

"No, that feels like snow to me, dear," she replies.

Just then, a minor communist party official walks towards them.

"Let's not fight about it," the man says. "Let's ask Comrade Rudolph whether it's officially raining or snowing."

"It's raining, of course" Comrade Rudolph says and walks on.

But the woman insists, "I know that felt like snow."

To which the man quietly says, "Rudolph the Red knows rain, dear."

Credit to /u/Bidonet
***
My favorite joke of all time.
Guy walks into a bar, sits down next to a lady who'd obviously been there for a bit. After a while they start talking and the conversation eventually turns to relationships. He says, "I'm actually here tonight because my girlfriend just left me - she thought I was too kinky in bed." Her eyes light up. "My husband just left me because he thought *I* was too kinky." They make eyes at each other and she asks him if he'd like to go back to her place, and he agrees.


They get to her apartment, she excuses herself to the bedroom to "slip into something more comfortable." She puts on a tight leather outfit, whips, chains, nipple clamps, the whole bit. She walks out just as he's about to leave. "Where are you going?!"


"I just fucked your cat and shit in your purse. I'm outta here."
***
A boy is selling fish on a corner.
To get his customers' attention, he is yelling, "Dam fish for sale! Get your dam fish here!" A pastor hears this and asks, "Why are you calling them 'dam fish.'" The boy responds, "Because I caught these fish at the local dam." The pastor buys a couple fish, takes them home to his wife, and asks her to cook the dam fish. The wife responds surprised, "I didn't know it was acceptable for a preacher to speak that way." He explains to her why they are dam fish. Later at the dinner table, he asks his son to pass the dam fish. He responds, "That's the spirit, Dad! Now pass the f*cking potatoes!"
***
Saw a hooker on the street who said she'd do anything for $50.
Guess who got the front porch repainted.

EDIT: Holy crap this blew up (no pun intended). Front page! RIP to my inbox. 

Thank you kind Redditor for my first gold! 
***
What is the difference between a well dressed man on a unicycle and a poorly dressed man on a bicycle?
Attire

Edit: I wasn't aware this was posted on /r/jokes recently, I didn't care to research either.. Deal With It!
***
A police officer pulls over a driver...
A police officer pulls over a driver and informs him that he has just won $5,000 in a safety competition, all because he is wearing his seat belt.

"What are you going to do with the prize money?" the officer asks.

The man responds, "I guess I'll go to driving school and get my license."

His wife says, "Officer, don't listen to him. He's a smart aleck when he's drunk."

The guy in the back seat pops up out from under the blanket and says, "I knew we wouldn't get far in this stolen car."

Just then a knock comes from the trunk and a voice calls out, "Are we over the border yet?"
***
A man walking along a California beach was in deep prayer
when all of a sudden he said aloud, "Lord grant me one wish." The sky clouded and a booming voice said, "Because you have tried to be faithful I will grant you one wish." The man said, "Build me a bridge to Hawaii so I can drive over any time I want to." The Lord answered, "Your request is very materialistic. Think of the logistics of that kind of undertaking ;the supports required to reach the bottom of the Pacific;the concrete and steel it would take. I can do it,but it is hard for me to justify your desire for worldly things. Take a little more time to think of another wish,one that will honor and glorify me". After thinking long and hard,he finally said,"Lord I wish that I could understand women. I want to know what they feel inside, what they're thinking, why they cry,what they mean when they say' nothing',and how I can make a woman truly happy." After a few minutes the Lord said, "How many lanes you want on that bridge? "
***
An old Jewish man dies.
His last wish to his son is to print an obituary. The son goes to newspaper office and asks how much they charge for an obituary. They tell him $5 per word. 

He says then print "Solomon dead". The newspaper tell him they require minimum 5 words. He thinks for a moment and says, then make it "Solomon dead, wheelchair for sale".
***
Latvian man die and go to hell
Latvian man die and go to hell.

Once there, devil punish. He say: Man, go burn in lake of fire.

But man is warm. Man is happy.

So devil make lake even hotter. But man now warmer. Now he is even more happy.

Devil get angry. So freeze fire lake into ice lake. Now lake is colder than coldest Latvian winter. But Latvia man now most happy!
He say, "Devil! Hell is freeze over! Latvia is finally happiest country!"

But is not true. Is only story. Also, man not in hell, only Latvia.
***
What's a policeman's favorite gaming console?
wii-u

wii-u

wii-u

wii-u


heh

***
It's dark in here.
A woman takes a lover during the day, while her husband is at work.

One day, her 9-year-old son hides in the closet during one of her romps. Her husband comes home unexpectedly, so she hides the lover in the closet.

The little boy says, "It's dark in here."
The man whispers, "Yes, it is."
Boy - "I have a baseball."
Man - "That's nice."
Boy - "Want to buy it?"
Man - "No, thanks."
Boy - "My dad's outside."
Man - "OK, how much?"
Boy - "$250."

In the next few weeks, it happens again that the boy and the mom's lover end up in the closet together.

Boy - "It's dark in here."
Man - "Yes, it is."
Boy - "I have a baseball glove."
Man - Remembering last time, asks, "How much?"
Boy - "$750."
Man - "Fine."

A few days later, the father says to the boy, "Grab your ball and glove. Let's go outside and toss the baseball."

The boy says, "I can't. I sold them."

The father asks, "How much did you sell them for?"

The son says "$1,000."

The father says, "It's terrible to overcharge your friends like that. That's way more than those two things cost. I'm going to take you to church and make you confess."

They go to the church and the father makes the little boy sit in the confession booth and he closes the door.

The boy says, "It's dark in here."
The priest says, "Don't start that shit again!"
***
Not Horny.....
A trucker who has been out on the road for two weeks stops at a brothel outside Atlanta. He walks straight up to the Madam, drops down $500 and says, "I want your ugliest woman and a grilled cheese sandwich!"

The Madam is astonished. "But sir, for that kind of money you could have one of my finest ladies and a three-course meal."

The trucker replies, "Listen, I ain't horny. I'm homesick."
***
A wealthy lawyer
One afternoon, a wealthy lawyer was riding in the back of his limousine when he saw two men eating grass by the roadside. He lowered the window between him and his driver, and ordered the car to be stopped.  The driver pulled the car to the side of the road, and the lawyer got out to investigate. “Why are you eating grass?” he asked one man.
 
“We don’t have any money for food,” the poor man replied.
 
“Oh, come along with me then,” instructed the lawyer.
 
“But, sir, I have a wife and two children!”
 
“Bring them along!” replied the lawyer. He turned to the other man and said, “Come with us.”
 
“But sir, I have a wife and six children!” the second man answered.
 
“Even better. Bring them as well!” answered the lawyer as he headed for his limo.
 
They all climbed into the car, which was no easy task, even for a car as large as the limo. Once underway, one of the poor fellows says, “Sir, you are too kind. Thank you for taking all of us with you.”
 
The lawyer replied, “No problem. The grass at my home is almost a foot tall.”
***
A man doing market research knocked on a door and was greeted by a young woman.
A man doing market research knocked on a door and was greeted by a young woman with three small children running around at her feet.

He said, "I'm doing some research for Vaseline. Have you ever used the product?"

She said, "Yes. My husband and I use it all the time."

"If you don't mind me asking, what do you use it for?"

"We use it for sex."

The researcher was a little taken aback.

He said, "Usually people lie to me and say that they use it on a child's bicycle chain or to help with a gate hinge. But, in fact, I know that most people do use it for sex. I admire you for your honesty. Since you've been frank so far, can you tell me exactly how you use it for sex?"

The woman said, "I don't mind telling you at all. My husband and I put it on the door knob and it keeps the kids out."

***
You will forget.
An 80 year old couple were having problems remembering things, so they decided to go to their doctor to get checked out to make sure nothing was wrong with them. When they arrived at the doctor's, they explained to the doctor about the problems they were having with their memory. 


After checking the couple out, the doctor tells them that they were physically okay but might want to start writing things down and make notes to help them remember things. The couple thanked the doctor and left. 


Later that night while watching TV, the old man got up from his chair and his wife asks, "Where are you going?" 


He replies, "To the kitchen." 


She asks, "Will you get me a bowl of ice cream?" 


He replies, "Sure." 


She then asks him, "Don't you think you should write it down so you can remember it?" 


He says, "No, I can remember that." 


She then says, "Well, I also would like some strawberries on top. You had better write that down cause I know you'll forget that." 


He says, "I can remember that, you want a bowl of ice cream with strawberries." 


She replies, "Well, I also would like whip cream on top. I know you will forget that so you better write it down." 


With irritation in his voice, he says, "I don't need to write that down, I can remember that." He then fumes into the kitchen.
 

After about 20 minutes he returns from the kitchen and hands her a plate of bacon and eggs. 


She stares at the plate for a moment and says, "You forgot my toast." 

***
Morning sex
Upon hearing that her elderly grandfather had just passed away, Katie went straight to her grandparent's house to visit her 95 year-old grandmother and comfort her. When she asked how her grandfather had died, her grandmother replied, "He had a heart attack while we were making love on Sunday morning." Horrified, Katie told her grandmother that 2 people nearly 100 years old having sex would surely be asking for trouble. "Oh no, my dear," replied granny. "Many years ago, realizing our advanced age, we figured out the best time to do it was when the church bells would start to ring. It was just the right rhythm. Nice and slow and even. Nothing too strenuous, simply in on the Ding and out on the Dong." She paused to wipe away a tear, and continued, "He'd still be alive if the ice cream truck hadn't come along."
***
A husband will only have sex with his wife on one condition
A married couple of 20 years were as normal as could be, bar one little quirk the husband had in the bedroom.

He'd only have sex with the lights off.

The wife assumed he merely had some shame in the penile department, but she loved him, so happily obliged. An added bonus was that it felt like he was actually reasonably well-equipped downstairs, so everything was good.

However, 20 years of blind sex took its toll on her and their relationship. In the middle of one of their love-making sessions, the wife dived for the lamp and turned on the light.

She saw her husband with his pants on and a dildo in hand.

There was a brief moment of silence, then the wife sternly stated "You have some explaining to do."

The husband looked her dead in the eye and said "I'll explain this when you explain the kids".
***
TIL that for release in Finland, the original Mortal Kombat had to be censored in an unusual way. Censors were fine with the gore, but insisted the music be replaced with traditional Christian songs.
FINNISH HYMN!!!
***
Who has better friends?
A husband and wife are having a friendly debate one night, centered on the topic of who has better friends. They each offer a wide variety of anecdotes and stories, but in the end, they decide to put it to the test.

"Here's what we'll do," the wife suggests. "I'll call your friends, and you call mine. We'll both pretend that the other person hasn't come home yet, and that we're worried. Whoever's friends give the best advice about where to find us clearly know us better, and therefore *are* better."

The husband agrees to the game, and they both head off into separate rooms. When they reconvene a half an hour later, the husband looks defeated.

"Okay, honey," he says, "I think it's pretty clear that you have better friends. Every one of them listed each of your favorite restaurants, salons, shops, and art galleries, and they had phone numbers for each of them. They knew your work hours by heart, your office extension, your boss's name, and even the route that you take home."

The wife shakes her head. "No, dear," she replies, "*you* have better friends."

"Why do you say that?" asks the husband.

"Well," the wife replies, "most of them said that you'd been at their place, and three of them said that you were still there."
***
A man is passing through a small town and sees a horse tied up in front of a bar
There's a sign next to the horse that says "Make this horse laugh, win $500 and free drinks for the night"

The man decides to give it a shot. He walks up to the horse and whispers something in his ear. 

The horse bursts out laughing. 

The bartender is shocked and begrudgingly pays the man and gives him a night of free drinks. 

The man wakes up the next morning and continues on with his journey. 

On his way back home, this man sees a new sign next to this horse that reads "Make this horse cry, win $1,000 and free drinks for two nights." 

Having been successful the first time, the man walks up to the horse and a few moments later the horse is sobbing.

The bartender is pissed that the same man won his contest both times. He pays up and starts pouring beer for him. 

After a few drinks, the bartender breaks and says "look, I'm losing a lot of money on this. You have to tell me how you did it."

The man finishes his beer and says with a grin, "Last week, i told the horse my dick was bigger than his. This week, i proved it."
***
Two Jews were arguing whether or not white is a color
After arguing for a week they went for  an advice to their rabbi  
Rabbi looked into an old book and said yes, white is a color.
A week later same Jews were arguing for a week whether black is a color
Went to the same rabbi who said yes, black is also a color
See!!! says one of them, I did sell you a color TV!!!!
***
BLONDE SUICIDE
A blonde hurried into the emergency room late one night with the tip Of her index finger shot off. 'How did this happen?' the emergency room doctor asked her.

'Well, I was trying to commit suicide,' the blonde replied.

'What?' sputtered the doctor. 'You tried to commit suicide by shooting Off your finger?'

'No, silly' the blonde said. 'First I put the gun to my chest, and then I thought, 'I just paid $6, 000.00 for these implants...

I'm not shooting myself in the chest.'

'So then?' asked the doctor.

'Then I put the gun in my mouth, and I thought, 'I just paid $3,000.00 To get my teeth straightened I'm not shooting myself in the mouth.'

'So then?' questioned the doctor. 

'Then I put the gun to my ear, and I thought: 'This is going to make a loud noise. So I put my finger in my other ear before I pulled the trigger.'

***
The Circumcision Surgeon
A surgeon retires from his long career as a specialist in circumcision.
  
Throughout his career, he has saved hundreds of foreskins as mementos and now wishes to turn them into a souvenir.  

He takes his specimens to a leathersmith and asks him to make something out of them.  

A week later the surgeon returns and the leathersmith presents him with a wallet. 

"All those foreskins and you only made me a wallet?"  exclaims the surgeon.  

The leathersmith replies, "Yes, but if you stroke it, it becomes a briefcase."
***
You must be single...
A woman was shopping at her local supermarket where she selected:
a half-gallon of 2% milk, a carton of eggs, a quart of orange juice, a head of romaine lettuce, a 2 lb. can of coffee, and a 1 lb. package of bacon.

As she was unloading her items onto the conveyor belt to check out, a drunk standing behind her was watching.

While the cashier was ringing up her purchases, the drunk calmly stated, "You must be single."

The woman was a bit startled by this proclamation, but she was intrigued by the derelict's intuition, since she was indeed single. She looked at her six items on the belt and saw nothing particularly unusual about her selections that could have tipped of the drunk to her marital status. Curiosity getting the better of her, she said, "Well, you know what, you're absolutely correct. But how on Earth did you know that?"

The drunk replied, "'Cuz you're ugly."
***
3 drunk guys enterd a taxi
The taxi driver knew that they were drunk so he started the engine & turned it off again. Then said, "We have reached your destination". The 1st guy gave him money & the 2nd guy said "Thank you". The 3rd guy slapped the driver. The driver was shocked thinking the 3rd drunk knew what he did. But then he asked "What was that for?". The 3rd guy replied, "Control your speed next time, you nearly killed us!
***
An older woman (around age 47) gets pulled over for speeding. As the officer approaches the vehicle, she rolls down her window
Woman: Is there a problem, Officer?  

Officer: Ma'am, you were speeding.  

Woman: Oh, I see.  

Officer: Can I see your license please?  

Woman: I'd give it to you but I don't have one.  

Officer: Don't have one?  

Woman: Lost it, 4 years ago for drunk driving.  

Officer: I see...Can I see your vehicle registration papers please.  

Woman: I can't do that.  

Officer: Why not?  

Woman: I stole this car.  

Officer: Stole it?  

Woman: Yes, and I killed and hacked up the owner.  

Officer: You what?!?!

Woman: His body parts are in plastic bags in the trunk if you want to see.  

The Officer looks at the woman and slowly backs away to his car and calls for back up. Within minutes 5 police cars circle the car. A senior officer slowly approaches the car, clasping his half drawn gun.  

Officer 2: Ma'am, could you step out of your vehicle please! 

The woman steps out of her vehicle.  

Woman: Is there a problem sir?  

Officer 2: One of my officers told me that you have stolen this car and murdered the owner.  

Woman: Murdered the owner?  

Officer 2: Yes, could you please open the trunk of your car, please.  

The woman opens the trunk, revealing nothing but an empty trunk.  

Officer 2: Is this your car, ma'am?  

Woman: Yes, here are the registration papers. The officer is quite stunned.  

Officer 2: One of my officers claims that you do not have a driving license.  

The woman digs into her handbag and pulls out a clutch purse and hands her license to the officer.  The officer examines the license. He looks quite puzzled.  

Officer 2 : Thank you ma'am, one of my officers told me you didn't have a license, that you stole this car, and that you murdered and hacked up the owner.  

Woman: Bet the liar told you I was speeding, too
***
A blonde woman walks into a library
A blonde woman walks into a library and talks to the lady at the front desk and says " I'll have a cheeseburger, a large fry, and a pepsi."

The lady replies "Ma'am, this is a library."

The blonde looks around, then whispers " I'll have a cheeseburger, a large fry, and a pepsi."

(Credit goes to my dad for this one. He had another one that I can't remember but once I do I'm coming back to post it)
***
A guy enters a bar...
A guy enters a bar and orders a whole tequila bottle. The barman asks him what's up and the guy says: "I've just found out one of my sons is gay".
Next day, the same guy orders two tequila bottles. "Today, the other son told me he's also gay..." explains him to the barman.
The third day - now the guy asks for 3 tequila bottles.
"So, I guess there is no one left in your family who likes pussy..." - says the barman.
"Oh yes, there is", replies the guy. "My wife."
***
A horny gorilla sees a lion bent over a small stream, taking a drink
The gorilla runs up behind the lion, grabs on, and has his way with him.  The gorilla then takes off running, with the very angry lion on his heels.  As they run through the jungle, the gorilla gets a bit of a lead, and sees a British safari camp ahead.

The gorilla enters the camp, grabs some khakis that are hung out to dry, and puts on pants, a shirt, and a hat. He sits on a chair by the campfire and grabs a copy of the local paper, pretending to read, to hide his face.

The lion enters the campsite and lets out a huge roar.  He yells, "did anyone see a gorilla run through here?"

The gorilla, in full disguise, calls out, "you mean the one that fucked the lion up the ass?"

The lion exclaims, "oh my god! It's in the paper already?"
***
Pretty woman sneezes
At a hotel restaurant, a man sees an attractive woman sitting alone at the next table. 

Suddenly, she sneezes, and a glass eye comes flying out of her eye socket.  It hurls by the man, and he snatches it from the air and hands it back to her.

"This is so embarrassing," the woman says, and she pops her eye back in place. "I'm sorry to have disturbed you.  Let me buy dinner to make it up to you.  May I join you?"  He nods.

The woman is a stimulating conversationalist, stunningly pretty, and the man finds they have a lot in common.  He gets her phone number and asks, "You are the most charming woman I've ever encountered.  Are you this nice to every guy you meet?" 

"No," she replies. "You just happened to catch my eye."
***
Bill works in a pickle factory...
Bill has worked in a pickle factory for several years. One day he confesses to his wife that he has a terrible urge to stick his penis into the pickle slicer. His wife suggests that he see a therapist to talk about it, but Bill vows to overcome this rash desire on his own.

A few weeks later, Bill returns home absolutely ashen. His wife asks, "What's wrong, Bill?"

"Do you remember how I told you about my tremendous urge to put my penis into the pickle slicer?"

His wife gasps, "My God, Bill, what happened?"

"I got fired."

"No, Bill -- I mean, what happened with the pickle slicer?"

"Oh, um, she got fired, too."
***
What's the difference between someone falling from 21st floor and 1st floor?
21st floor person goes: AHHHHHHHHHH *thump*

1st floor goes: *thump* AHHHHHHHHHH
***
A teacher sent out an announcement that her class will have a day off tomorrow.
One of her students comes home to tell his grandfather. *I don't have to go to school tomorrow, can you take me to the park?* He agrees.

He immediately calls his secretary at work. *Something came up so probably we can't meet up at the hotel tomorrow, let's do it some other time?* She agrees.

The secretary texts her husband. *Hey honey, I don't have to go to that conference out of state anymore. Wanna stay in and do something tomorrow?* He agrees.

Her husband then gives the teacher a voicemail: *Man, my bitch ass wife is staying home tomorrow. Don't come over!*

Disappointed, the teacher retracts her announcement and requires her students to come to class again tomorrow.
***
A woman is in the hospital in a coma...
and the husband is in the waiting room. The doctor comes out and tells the husband every time he gets near her crotch, her heart rate increases, and tells the husband he believes oral sex will bring her out of the coma.

The husband enters the room. Shortly after, the doctor hears a flatline and rushes into the room, asking what happened. The husband replies, "I dont know, Doc. I think she choked."

EDIT: /u/strenling has been edited.
***
A woman awakes in the middle of the night to find her husband not in bed.
She puts on her robe and goes downstairs to look for him.
She finds him sitting at the kitchen table with a cup of hot cocoa in front of him.
He appears to be in deep thought, just staring at the wall.
She watches as he wipes away a tear from his eye.
"What's the matter, dear?" she whispers as she steps into the room.... "Why are you down here at this time of night!?"
The husband looks up from his drink, "It's the 20th Anniversary of the day we met."
She can't believe he has remembered and starts to tear up.
The husband continues, "Do you remember 20 years ago when we started dating? I was 18 and you were only 15," he said solemnly.
Once again, the wife is touched to tears thinking that her husband is so caring and sensitive. "Yes, I do" she replies.
The husband pauses....... The words were not coming easily.
"Do you remember when your father caught us in the back seat of my car?"
"Yes, I remember" said the wife, lowering herself into a chair beside him.
The husband continued. "Do you remember when he shoved the shotgun in my face and said, Either you marry my daughter or I will make sure you spend the next 20 years in prison?"
"I remember that, too" she replied softly...
He sighed as he wiped another tear away from his cheek and said, "I would have gotten out today."


Edit: wow front page, glad you guys liked it.



Edit 2:Just so people know. The couple met, had sex, and were married all on the same day. Its a joke so it doesn't matter if its unrealistic.
***
A boy grows up with an outhouse...
He's in bed one night and thinks to himself,

"This is bullshit! It's 2016, we're the only ones with an outhouse! 

Once it rains and the river floods some, I'm pushing it in."

The boy wakes up for school the next morning and see that it rained a bit, enough for the river to rise enough for him to push the outhouse into it.

After a day at school, he steps off the bus and his dad is sitting on the porch.

"Son, someone pushed the outhouse into the river."

The boy knows he's caught,

"...George Washington told the truth about cutting down the cherry tree, and he didn't get in trouble!"

His dad looks at him,

"Well, was George Washington's dad in the fucking cherry tree?!"
***
A dad buys a lie detector robot that slaps you if you lie.
Dad: Son, where were you at school hours?

Son: At school.

The robot slaps the son

Son: Okay I was watching KungFu Panda!

The robot slaps his son again.

Son: Okay I was watching violent movies!

Dad: What?! When I was your age I never watched those kinds of movies!

The robot slaps the dad.

Mom: Haha, after all, he is your son.

The robot slaps the mom...﻿
***
A little old Christian lady...
...comes out onto her front porch every morning and shouts, "Praise the Lord!"

And every morning the atheist next door yells back, "There is no God!"

This goes on for weeks. "Praise the Lord!" yells the lady. "There is no God!" responds the neighbour.

As time goes by, the lady runs into financial difficulties and has trouble buying food. She goes out onto the porch and asks God for help with groceries, then says, "Praise the Lord!"

The next morning when she goes out onto the porch, there are the groceries she asked for. Of course, she shouts, "Praise the Lord!"

The atheist jumps out from behind the bush and exclaims, "Aha! I bought those groceries. There is no God!"

The lady looks at him and smiles. She shouts, "Praise the Lord! Not only did you provide for me, Lord, you made Satan pay for the groceries!"
***
Neighbor
The judge says to a double-homicide defendant, "You're charged with beating your wife to death with a hammer." A voice at the back of the courtroom yells out, "You bastard." The judge says, "You're also charged with beating your mother-in-law to death with a hammer." The voice in the back of the courtroom yells out, "You God-damned bastard." The judge stops, and says to the guy in the back of the courtroom, "Sir, I can understand your anger and frustration at this crime. But no more outbursts from you, or I'll charge you with contempt. Is that a problem?" The guy in the back of the court stands up and says, "For fifteen years, I've lived next door to that bastard, and every time I asked to borrow a hammer, he said he didn't have one."
***
An Ugly man walks into a bar and a beautiful woman approaches him......
... the woman asks the man, "How would you like to get out of here?" and the man is stunned. He never thought a woman like her would ever approach him so he agrees. They both get into his car and drive really far. He stops at a cliff with the view of the whole city. Within seconds they start taking off their clothes. After 15 minutes of vigorous sex they finally finish. They both put their clothes on and they both just sit there awkwardly. The woman speaks up and says "I'm a prostitute and its going to be 100 dollars for my service." The Man is stunned and saddened that she didn't really like him. He gives her the money and they both sit there awkwardly. The Woman tells him that she is ready to leave and the man replies "I'm a taxi driver and its going to be 150 Dollars for the ride here and back."
***
A man worked for a road crew. One day he woke up ill...
...with a touch of laryngitis - but being a dedicated employee he went to work.

The boss felt rather sorry for him and didn't want him to do any physical labor - as they were repairing a part of the freeway. He says, "Why don't you go down the road and tell people to slow down going through the construction?"

The worker is glad for the easy day. He stops the first vehicle: "Sir," he whispers, his throat feeling worse, "please slow down, there's a road crew up ahead."

"Okay," the driver whispers back, "I'll try not to wake them."
***
A horny guy went into a whorehouse...
A horny guy went into a whorehouse and says, "I need a blow job, but I only have $5".
"Okay", the owner said, "that is not much, but for $5 we can give you a penguin". 
"What's a penguin?" The man asked. 
"you'll see", she replied. 
So he went upstairs. A young woman came and started giving him a blow job. But just as he was about to finish, she stopped and walked away. 
Frustrated, he waddled after her with his pants around his ankles, screaming "What's a penguin?"
***
Funniest thing my gf has ever said
We were at a a red light and i noticed a woman in the car behind me making a lot of arm and hand motions. No one was in the car with her (probably on bluetooth). 

Me: Hey babe look at this woman behind us. What is she doing? She's just flailing her arms around but there isn't any one with her.

GF: Maybe she's deaf and she's singing to herself.
***
Sometimes I ask myself if I'd rather be black or blind, then I realize it doesn't matter.
Either way, I wouldn't see my dad again

Edit: Yall need some anal cream if you find this offensive, its a joke mang! What do you call 500,000 white guys jumping out of a plane?.. SNOW! See everybody gets shit here!
***
Man in ecstasy
He was in ecstasy, with a huge smile on his face, as his wife moved forward, then backwards, forward, then backwards again, back and forth, back and forth...in and out...in and out.

It was going on 20 minutes at this point...

Her heart was pounding...her face was flushed...then she moaned, softly at first, then began to groan louder. Finally, totally exhausted, she let out an almighty scream and shouted:

*"OK, OK! I can't park the damn car! You do it, you smug bastard!"*
***
Irishman looking for a parking place
Paddy was driving down the street in a sweat because he had an important meeting and couldn't find a parking place. Looking up to heaven he said, "Lord take pity on me. If you find me a parking place I will go to Mass every Sunday for the rest of me life and give up me Irish Whiskey!"
Miraculously, a parking place appeared.
Paddy looked up again and said, "Never mind, I found one."
***
Halloween Joke
This guy goes to a Halloween costume party, but he’s just wearing street clothes, and he has his girlfriend sitting on his shoulders.

The host says to him, “Dude, this is a Halloween party! You’re supposed to be wearing a costume?”

The guy replies, I am wearing a costume! I’m a snail!”

“You’re a snail?”

“Yeah, I’m a snail,” says the guy. Then he points to his girlfriend and says, “This is Michelle.”

***
Halloween Party (NSFW)
A young lady was invited to a Halloween party, and upon arrival she notices a man wearing nothing but a glass jar on his penis... Intrigued, she approaches the man and asks what he's dressed as.

"A fireman" he replies

"Fireman? How so? You're only wearing a glass jar." She says

"Exactly. Break the glass, pull the knob, and I'll come as fast as I can"
***
My favorite joke, and very easy to personalize.
Three guys are on a casual walk one day when they pass by The Guinness Book of World Records corporate office. All three of them have the same idea. "It would be awesome to hold a world record for something!" 

So the first guy says, "I have big hands, I bet I have the worlds largest hands." He goes in and comes out a few minutes later with a plaque for the worlds largest hands. 

The next guy says, "I bet I have the worlds largest feet." And then he goes in and comes out smiling with a plaque for the worlds largest feet. 

Finally, the last guy says, "I bet I have the worlds smallest penis." So he goes in the the office and comes out a few minutes later with a dejected look on his face. The guy with the biggest hands says, "what happened? I thought you for sure had the smallest penis."

The guy replies, "I don't know. Who the fuck is (put in friends name)?"
***
A sweet couple in their 80's...
A couple in their 80's were having problems remembering things, so they decided to the go the doctor for a checkup. The doctor tells them that they are physically okay, but they might want to start writing things down to help them remember.

Later that night, while watching TV, the old man gets up from his chair. His wife asks, "Where are you going?" "To the kitchen for a drink," he replies. She asks, " Will you get me piece of cake?" The husband says, "Sure." She gently reminds him, "Don't you think you should write it down so you don't forget it?" He says, "No, I can certainly remember that!"

Then the woman says, "Well, I'd like some strawberries on top. You'd better write it down because I know you'll forget it." The man replies, "I can remember that! You want some cake with strawberries."

She adds, "I'd also like whipped cream on top. Now I'm certain you're gonna forget that, so you'd better write it down ok." Irritated, he says, "I don't need to write it down woman! I can remember that! Cake with strawberries! And whipped cream!" He then grumbles into the kitchen. After about 30 minutes the old man returns from the kitchen and hands his wife a plate of bacon and eggs. She stares at the plate for a moment and says, "Where's my toast?

***
Warm Milk
In a convent in Ireland , the 98-year-old Mother Superior lay dying. The
nuns gathered around her bed trying to make her last journey comfortable.
They tried giving her warm milk to drink but she refused it.

One of the nuns took the glass back to the kitchen. Then, remembering a
bottle of Irish Whiskey that had been received as a gift the previous
Christmas, she opened it and poured a generous amount into the warm milk.

Back at Mother Superior's bed, they held the glass  to her lips. The frail
nun drank a little, then a little more and before they knew it, she had
finished the whole glass down to the last drop.

As her eyes brightened, the nuns thought it would be a good opportunity to
have one last talk with their spiritual leader..
"Mother," the nuns asked earnestly,
"Please give us some of your wisdom before you leave us."

She raised herself up in bed on one elbow,
looked at them and said: "

"DON'T SELL THAT COW."
***
Going to Vegas
A man comes home from work to find his wife packing her things. "What are you doing?" he asks.
His wife replies, "I'm leaving you and moving to Las Vegas. I hear that men will pay me $500 to do to them what I do to you for free."
The man says nothing, walks over to the closet, grabs his suitcase and begins packing his things.
"What do you think you're doing?" his wife asks.
The man replies, "I'm going to Vegas. I want to see how you're going to live off of $500 a year."
***
The Queen's Surprise
The Queen of England is taking a tour of one of America's best hospitals. They are going through different areas, and occasionally meeting with some of the patients. 

They walk into a room, and inside, a patient is intensely masturbating. 

The Queen is shocked. "My heavens, what is the meaning of this?"

The doctor explains, "I'm sorry your majesty. This patient has a serious medical condition where his testicles rapidly fill with semen. If he doesn't relieve the pressure several times per day, his testicles will explode, and he'll die."

Embarrassed, the queen apologies for her reaction, and they continue on with the tour.

A little later, they enter another patients room. Inside, she see a nurse giving a patient a blow job. The Queen is outraged.

"By heavens, what on earth is going on here?"

The doctor says, "Your majesty, this patient has the same condition as the previous man. But he has a much better health care plan."
***
I refused to believe my road worker father was stealing from his job...
...but when I got home, all the signs were there.

Few more:

* I hate Russian dolls, they’re so full of themselves.

* I asked my North Korean friend how it was there, he said he couldn’t complain.

* My girlfriend started smoking, so I slowed down and applied Lubricant.

* I, for one, like Roman numerals.

* People used to laugh at me when I would say “I want to be a comedian”, well nobody’s laughing now.

* Throwing acid is wrong, in some people’s eyes.

* I haven’t slept for three days, because that would be too long. 

* The first time I got a universal remote control, I thought to myself “This changes everything.”

* My grandfather has the heart of a lion and a lifetime ban from the local zoo.

* My friend gave me his Epi-Pen as he was dying. It seemed very important to him that I have it.

* I’ve spent the past four years looking for my ex-girlfriend’s killer, but no one will do it.

* I saw a sign that said “watch for children” and I thought, “That sounds like a fair trade.”

* I recently decided to sell my vacuum cleaner, all it was doing was gathering dust.

* People say I’m condescending. That means i talk down to people.
***
A man in a ballon
A man was stuck in a hot air balloon and realized that he was lost.  He  reduced his height and saw a woman down on a field. 

He went further down and yelled at the woman : "Excuse me, Could you help me? I had arranged a meeting with a friend an hour ago, but I have no idea were I am."

The woman on the ground responded:  "You are in a hot air balloon about 30 feet over the sea at  55°41'47'' northerner half and 10°12'47'' western length"

the man  gave her a look and said: "You must be an engineer"

"I am" the woman replied " how did you know?" 

"Well, technically everything you said is correct, but I have no idea what I should use this information for and I still have no clue were I am. 
The only thing I've gotten out of your help is being even more delayed." 

The woman looked at him and said  "You have to be in management then"

"I am, how did you know?" 

"It's simple. You don't know where you are or where you're going.  You got up with a load of hot air.  You agreed to a meeting you cannot hold, while  expecting  people under you to solve your problem.  
 fact is you are still in the same situation as before you met me, but suddenly it's my fault. "


***
A mexican magician told the audience he'll disappear on the count of three. He said "Uno, dos" *POOF*
He disappeared without a tres.



**edit Front page??? Thats Punbelieveable!
***
Robin Williams' Favorite Joke
Guy's having sex with his wife. All of a sudden he looks over, and there in the doorway is his son, about eight years old. Kid looks horrified, and the kid runs away. The guy says to his wife, ''Well, I'd better talk to Timmy.''

He puts on his clothes and goes to Timmy's room. He opens the door , and there's Timmy nailing Grandma. The father goes ''Oh, my God!'' And the kid goes, ''Not so funny when it's your mom, is it?"
***
Three friends die and go to heaven...
When they get to the gate saint peter says, "Hi, welcome to heaven. You're going to have a great time. We only have one rule in heaven, and that is to never, ever, no matter what, step on a duck."

 "Ducks?"
 
"Yes, if you do, you will receive a terrible punishment. You may enter."
So the friends enter heaven, and much to their suprise, there are ducks everywhere. Every square yard there were probably 2 ducks. The first friend takes the warning lightly and accidentally steps on a duck the first day, and as punishment the most hidiously ugly person gets put in front of him to look at for all of eternity. The person was like uglier than the mcpoyles, he/she (because the friend coudn't tell if it was a boy or a girl) was really really ugly.
 
So the second and third friends see this and say to themselves that they would never step on a duck. But sure enough the second friend steps on a duck in the third week and gets the same punishment as the first friend. So the third friend vows to never move, and only move if absolutely necessary,

 After about 7 months a beautiful woman comes down from the sky, and I'm talking crazy hot, almost angelic. The third friend gets to look at her forever, and asks, "what could I have possibly done to deserve this?"

 And she says, "I don't know but I stepped on a duck."

edit: made it into paragraphs
***
An 86 year old man goes to the doctor with a perplexing issue...
The doctor asked him how he was feeling, and the man said, 
>Things are great and I've never felt better.    
>I now have a 20 year old bride who is pregnant with my child.    
>So what do you think about that Doc?

The doctor considered his question for a minute and then began to tell a story.

>I have an older friend, much like you, who is an avid hunter and never misses a season. One day he was setting off to go hunting.  In a bit of a hurry, he accidentally picked up his walking cane instead of his gun.

>As he neared a lake, he came across a very large male beaver siting at the water’s edge...

>He realized he'd left his gun at home and so he couldn't the magnificent creature.  Out of habit he raised his cane, aimed it right at the animal as if it were his favorite hunting rifle and went 'bang bang'.

>Miraculously, two shots rang out and the beaver fell over dead.

>Now what do you think about that?

asked the doctor.

The 86 year-old said,     
>Logic would strongly suggest that someone else pumped a couple of rounds into that beaver.'

The doctor replied, 
>My point exactly.

***
One day an old dog lost his way while chasing rabbits
One day an old dog lost his way while chasing rabbits. Soon he noticed a lion in the distance running towards him with a hungry look in his eye.

Noticing some bones on the ground close by, the dog immediately settled down to chew on the bones with his back to the approaching cat. Just as the lion was about to leap, the old dog exclaimed, "That was one delicious lion! I wonder, if there are any more around here?" Upon hearing this, the young lion stoped mid-stride and hurried to safety in the trees.

A squirrel who had been watching from a nearby tree, knew the dog's tricks and decided to trade his knowledge for protection from the lion. Catching up with the lion, he explained what happened and struck a deal. The young lion was furious at being made a fool of and said, "Hop on my back and see what's going to happen to that conniving canine!"

The old dog spied the lion coming with the squirrel on his back. Instead of running, he sat down with his back to the pair, pretending he hadn't seen them yet. When they got close enough tohear, the old dog said, "Where's that squirrel? I sent him off an hour ago to bring me another lion!"
***
TIL that the toothbrush was invented in West Virginia...
otherwise it would have been called the teethbrush.


Edit: Sorry for picking on you WV, when there appears to be numerous other states I could have equally offended with this joke. 
***
A blonde tried to sell her old car
A blonde tried to sell her old car. She was having a lot of problems selling it because the car had 250,000 miles on it.

One day she mentioned her problem to a brunette she worked with at a salon. The brunette told her, "There is a way to make your car easier to sell, but it's not legal."

"That doesn't matter," replied the blonde, "as long as I can sell the car."

"Okay," said the brunette. "Here's the address of a friend of mine. He owns a car repair shop. Tell him I sent you and he will turn the odometer in your car back to 50,000 miles. Then it shouldn't be a problem to sell."

The following weekend, the blonde made the trip to the mechanic.

About one month after that, the brunette asked the blonde, "Did you sell your car?"

"No," replied the blonde, "why should I? It only has 50,000 miles on it." 
***
A man parks his car on the street and goes into a shop....
...When he comes out, the car is not where he left it and apparently was stolen. So he calls the police and hopelessly goes back home. Two days later, he finds his car at his front door, with a note left in:

“I am very sorry but I had to borrow your car, because my wife was in labor and about to give birth and I had to act quickly. I deeply apologize and send these front-row concert tickets for you and your wife to enjoy this tuesday evening.”

So the man and his wife go to the concert tuesday evening. When they return home, they realize someone broke in and the house was burgled. And a note was left on the floor: “Soo, did you like the concert? ” 

Sorry for the terrible grammar :D
***
Lawyer joke
There is a trucker who hates lawyers so much he always runs them over with his truck whenever he sees one. One day he sees a priest hitchhiking and decides to give a ride to the holy man. As they go along the road, the trucker spots a lawyer by the side of the road and steers to run him over. At the last minute he remembers the priest in the truck and swerves away hoping to avoid judgment of his sins. 

He says "I'm sorry father, I don't know what came over me!" 

The priest replies, "Don't worry, I got him with the door!"
***
Daughter's Vibrator
A mother was walking down the hall when she heard a humming sound coming from her daughter's bedroom.
When she opened the door she found her daughter naked on the bed with a vibrator.

What are you doing?" she exclaimed.

The daughter replied, "I'm 35 and still living at home with my parents and this is the closest I'll ever get to a husband."

Later that week the father was in the kitchen and heard a humming sound coming from the basement.
When he went downstairs, he found his daughter naked on the sofa with her vibrator.

"What are you doing?" he exclaimed.

The daughter replied, "I'm 35 and still living at home with my parents and this is the closest I'll ever get to a husband."

A couple of days later the mother heard the humming sound again, this time in the living room.
In there, she found her husband watching the Super Bowl on television with the vibrator buzzing away beside him.

"What are you doing?" she exclaimed.

He replied............"Watching the game with my son-in-law."
***
Scottish bloke goes on a skiing holiday to Canada
This Scottish bloke goes on a skiing holiday to Canada. After a hard day on the slopes he retires to a bar at the bottom of the mountain. After about five or six whiskeys, he looks up and notices a stuffed animal with antlers on the wall. He asks the barman, "What the fuck is that?".
The barman says, "It's a Moose." The Scottish chap says, "Fuck me! How big are the cats?"
***
My oldest dirty joke, From my grandfather around the campfire...
**An old couple gets pulled over and...**

Lady cop - "May I see you license and registration sir?"

Old man - "ugh, what did she say?"

Old wife - "She needs to see you license and registration dear."

**The old man hands it to the lady cop and...**

Lady cop - "Oh, I see you are from New York. I used to have a lover from New York, he was the worst lover I ever had."

Old man - "ugh, what did she say?"

Old wife - "Nothing dear, She thinks she used to know you."

*Cue my grandmother scolding my grandfather for telling a dirty joke in front of the kids.*


***
Three Biker's and a Drunk
Three guys were sitting in a biker bar.  A man came in, already drunk, sat down at the bar and ordered a drink.  The man looked around and saw the 3 men sitting at a corner table.  

He got up, staggered to the table, leaned over, looked the biggest one in the face and said, "I went by your grandma's house and I saw her in the hallway, buck naked.  Man, she is fine!"  The biker looked at him and didn't say a word.  His buddies were confused,because he was a bad ass, and would fight at he drop of a hat. 

The drunk leaned on the table again and said, "I got it on with your grandma and she is good, the best I ever had!" The biker still said nothing.  His buddies were starting to get mad. The drunk leaned on the table again and said, "I'll tell you something else boy, your grandma liked it!"  

The biker stood up, took the drunk by the shoulder and said, "Damn it, Grandpa, you're drunk! Go home!"
***
"If you win the lottery,
the first thing I want you to get me is a face lift and a boob job," said my 49 year old girlfriend as I was checking my ticket. 







"Well, actually, the first thing I would buy is a reconditioned engine and a respray for my Mondeo," I replied.







"Why would you waste your money tarting that old thing up, you might as well get yourself a new one," she said.







"My point exactly."
***
Two guys meet at the store.
Two guys, one old, one young,
are pushing their carts around the grocery store
when they collide.
The old guy says to the young guy,
"Sorry about that. I'm looking for my wife,
and I guess I wasn't paying attention
to where I was going."
The young guy says, "That's OK, it's a coincidence.
I'm looking for my wife, too...
I can't find her and I'm getting a little desperate."
The old guy says, "Well,
maybe I can help you find her...
what does she look like?"
The young guy says,
"Well, she is 27 yrs. old, tall,
with red hair,
blue eyes, is buxom wearing no bra,
long legs,
and is wearing short shorts.
What does your wife look like?'
To which the old guy says, "Doesn't matter,
--- let's look for yours."
***
Cheaper Pub in the World
Guy walks into a pub and asks the bar man for a pint; 

"That will be $0.05 please sir". 

"Wow, in that case I will have a shot of whisky too"

"Certainly, that will be $0.03 sir". 

"Damnnn, OK and a packet of crisps". 

"0.01 please sir, $0.08 all together". 

"This is astonishing, can I speak to the owner of this place, I'd like to thank him". 

"Oh, not just now, he is busy, he is upstairs with my wife". 

"...What is he doing upstairs with your wife?"

"Same thing I am doing down here with his business".


***
A young man has sex for the first time
The young man was very nervous about having sex with his girlfriend for the very first time, because he was convinced that his penis would be too small.

Eventually he realized that he could not postpone it forever and he nervously invited her over to his house.

Hesitatingly he started to take off his clothes and after that he dimmed the lights. Very carefully he started taking off her clothes and he started stroking her. 

Finally he nervously nestled his erection inside her hand, hoping she didn't realize how small it was.

"No thank you," she said, "I don't smoke."
***
A large woman, wearing a sleeveless sun dress, walked into a bar in Dublin...
She raised her right arm, revealing a huge, hairy armpit and, as she pointed
to all the people sitting at the bar she asked, "What man here will buy a lady a drink?"
 
The bar went silent as patrons tried to ignore her. But down at the end of the bar,
an owly-eyed drunk slammed his hand down on the counter and bellowed,
"Give the ballerina a drink!"
 
The bartender poured the drink and the woman chugged it down.
 
She turned to the patrons and again pointed around at all of them, revealing 
the same hairy armpit, and asked, "What man here will buy a lady a drink?"
 
Once again, the same little drunk slapped his money down on the bar and said,
"Give the ballerina another drink!"
 
The bartender approached the little drunk and said, "Tell me, Paddy, it's your business if you want to buy the lady a drink, but why do you keep calling her the ballerina?"
 
The drunk replied, "Any woman who can lift her leg that high has got to be a ballerina!"

***
Before it starts...
A man came home from work, sat down in his favourite chair, turned on the TV, and said to his wife, "Quick, bring me a beer before it starts"

She looked a little puzzled, but brought him a beer. When he finished it, he said, "Quick, bring me another beer. It's gonna start."

This time she looked a little angry, but brought him a beer.

When it was gone, he said, "Quick, another beer before it starts."

"That's it!" She blows her top, "You bastard! You waltz in here, flop your fat ass down, don't even say hello to me and then expect me to run around like your slave. Don't you realize that I cook and clean and wash and iron all day long?"

The husband sighed. "Oh shit, it started!”
***
A boy was born of an Indian, Chinese, Irish, and Italian grandmother...
They couldn't settle on a name, until it hit them!

They named him Ravi O. Lee

Sorry
***
A woman was in bed with her lover when she heard her husband opening the front door.
"Hurry!" she said, "stand in the corner." She quickly rubbed baby oil all over him and then she dusted him with talcum powder. "Don't move until I tell you to," she whispered. "Just pretend you're a statue."

"What's this, honey?" the husband inquired as he entered the room.

"Oh, it's just a statue," she replied nonchalantly. "The Smiths bought one for their bedroom. I liked it so much, I got one for us too." No more was said about the statue, not even later that night when they went to sleep.

Around two in the morning the husband got out of bed, went to the kitchen and returned a while later with a sandwich and a glass of milk.

"Here," he said to the 'statue', "eat something. I stood like an idiot at the Smiths' for three days and nobody offered me as much as a glass of water."




***
A wife and her husband were having a dinner party for some important guests.
 The wife was very excited about this and wanted everything to be perfect. At the very last minute, she realized that she didn't have any snails for the dinner party, so she asked her husband to run down to the beach with the bucket to gather some snails.

Very grudgingly he agreed. He took the bucket, walked out the door, down the steps, and out to the beach. As he was collecting the snails, he noticed a beautiful woman strolling alongside the water just a little further down the beach.

He kept thinking to himself, "Wouldn't it be great if she would even just come down and talk to me?" He went back to gathering the snails.

All of a sudden he looked up, and the beautiful woman was standing right over him. They started talking and she invited him back to her place. They ended up spending the night together. At seven o'clock the next morning he woke up and exclaimed, "Oh no!!! My wife's dinner party!!!"

He gathered all his clothes, put them on real fast, grabbed his bucket, and ran out the door. He ran down the beach all the way to his apartment. He ran up the stairs of his apartment. He was in such a hurry that when he got to the top of the stairs, he dropped the bucket of snails. There were snails all down the stairs. The door opened just then, with a very angry wife standing in the door way wondering where he's been all this time.

He looked at the snails all down the steps, then he looked at her, then back at the snails and said, "Come on guys, we're almost there!!"

***
The Naughty Doctor
A doctor had sex with one of his female patients and felt guilty all day long. 

No matter how much he tried to forget about it, he just couldn't.

The guilt and sense of betrayal of his patient were overwhelming. 

But every once in a while he'd hear an internal, reassuring voice in his head that said: "Don't worry about it. You aren't the first medical practitioner to have sex with one of his patients and you won't be the last. And you're single. Just let it go."

But, invariably, another voice in his head would bring him back to reality, whispering...

"You're a veterinarian, you sick sex fiend."
***
A husband and wife love golfing together, but they aren't very good, so they decide to take private lessons.
The husband has his lesson first. After the pro sees his swing, he says, "No, no, no, you're gripping the club way too hard!" "Well, what should I do?" asks the man. "Hold the club gently," the pro replied, "just like you'd hold your wife's breast."

The man takes the advice, takes a swing, and WOW! He hits the ball 250 yards straight up the fairway. The man goes back to his wife with the good news, and the wife can't wait for her lesson.

The next day the wife goes for her lesson. The pro watches her swing and says, "No, no, no, you're gripping the club way too hard." "What can I do?" asks the wife. "Hold the club gently, just like you'd hold your husband's penis." 

The wife listens carefully to the pro's advice, takes a swing, and THUMP. The ball goes straight down the fairway ... about 15 ft. 

"That was great," the pro says. "Now take the club out of your mouth and try swinging it with your hands."
***
Two men are walking through the forest when they stumble upon a large sinkhole.
Guy says, "Woah! This thing looks deep; how deep down do you think it goes?" The two men search around for a long stick or branch to assess the depth, but find nothing of use. They continue their search and they stumble across an old, rusty anvil; and naturally, they haul the anvil over and toss it into the hole. They wait and wait, but they don't hear anything happen. Suddenly, a donkey comes running full speed ahead and just leaps into the sinkhole. The two men are shocked, "Did you see that donkey!? I've never seen an animal sprint like that!" Minutes later, a farmer comes sprinting into the scene and says, "Guys! Have you seen my donkey? He was just on the farm and completely took off!" One of the men answers back, "He was just here! He came sprinting through the woods and took a leap into this sink hole!" The farmer answers back, "No, that's absolutely impossible. He was tied to an anvil." 
***
A girl with no arms or legs was on a beach...
...As a man walked pass her she started crying. The man asked, "Whats the matter, dear?" The girl replied with "I've never been hugged before." So the man hugs her and the girl starts crying again. The man asks "Whats wrong now?" The girl replies with "I've never been kissed before." So the man kisses her and the girl starts crying yet again. So the man asks, "Whats the matter now?" The girl replies with, "I've never been fucked before." So the man picks her up and throws her into the ocean and says "You're fucked now."﻿
***
A biker walks into a bar...
..and sits down on a bar stool near the end of the bar.

He takes a look at the menu and it reads as follows:

Hamburger - 2.99

Cheeseburger - 3.99

Chicken Sandwich - 4.99

Hand Jobs - 19.99

The crusty old biker waves the bartender down, and up walks this tall, busty, beautiful redhead in her mid-twenties. She smiles at the biker coyly, and he asks in a quiet voice "Are you the one who gives the hand jobs?" The bartender blushes slightly and says "Yes, I am" with a sexy little smile.

The biker grins and says "Well wash your hands, because I want a cheeseburger."
***
The big bed...
Three salesmen are travelling together when their car breaks down. They walk to the nearest town and go into the bar. Over a couple of rounds of drinks, they explain their situation to the bartender who tells them, 

"I have a bed in the back room. It's just one bed, but it should be big enough for all three of you to stay for tonight."

The three salesmen agree and continue drinking. At closing time, the bartender kicks all the other customers out and shows the salesmen to the room where the bed is. The three of them immediately pass out for the night.

The next morning, the man who slept on the left side of the bed says,

"Man, I had this incredible dream that I was getting a handjob from a beautiful woman!"

The man who slept on the right side of the bed says,

"Hey, I had a dream that I was getting a handjob from a beautiful woman as well!"

The man who slept in the middle says,

"I had a dream that I was skiing!"
***
The Perfect Husband
Several men are in the locker room of a golf club. A cell phone on a bench rings and a man engages the hands-free speaker- function and begins to talk. Everyone else in the room stops to listen.

MAN: "Hello"


WOMAN: "Honey, it's me. Are you at the club?"


MAN: "Yes."


WOMAN: "I'm at the mall now and found this beautiful leather coat. It's only $1,000. Is it OK if I buy it?"


MAN: "Sure, go ahead if you like it that much."


MAN: "How much?"


WOMAN: "$65,000."


MAN: "OK, but for that price I want it with all the options."


WOMAN: "Great! Oh, and one more thing. The house we wanted last year is back on the market. They're asking $950,000."


MAN: "Well, then go ahead and give them an offer, but just offer $900,000."


WOMAN: "OK. I'll see you later! I love you!"


MAN: "Bye, I love you, too."


The man hangs up. The other men in the locker room are looking at him in astonishment.


Then he smiles and asks: **"Anyone know whose phone this is?"** 
***
A man walks into a brothel...
So a man walks into a brothel. He's a little down on his luck and only has $5. He asks the woman at the front desk, "So what can I get with this?" and hands her the $5. She takes the money and says, "Second door on the left." The man goes to the room and sees a chicken on the bed. He's confused and searches the room for a woman. He fails to do so and looks at the chicken. "Well, I guess it's better than nothing." He proceeds to have sex with the chicken. Turns out it was the best he's ever had.

A week later he comes back with $1. "So, uhh, what can I get for this?" The woman at the front desk says, "First room on the left." He walks into the room and sees a bunch of guys crowded around a hole in the wall. He gets a chance to peek through and sees two sexy lesbians getting it on. "Man, they're really going at it," he says, "This is pretty crazy." One guy from the crowd says, "Oh that's nothing. You should have been here last week, there was a dude fucking a chicken."

Edit: Prevented a time paradox or two
***
A Priest was about to finish his tour of duty in the jungle where he has spent years teaching the natives to be civilized and kind to each other when he realizes that the one thing he never taught them was how to speak English.
So he takes the chief for a walk in the forest. He points to a tree and says to the chief, "This is a tree."

The chief looks at the tree and grunts, "Tree."

The Priest is pleased with the response. They walk a little further and he points to a rock and says, "This is a rock."

Hearing this, the chief looks and grunts, "Rock."

The Priest was really getting enthusiastic about the results when he hears a rustling in the bushes. As they peek over the top, he sees a couple of natives in the midst of heavy sexual activity.

The Priest is really flustered and quickly responds, "Man riding a bike."

The chief looks at the couple briefly, pulls out his blowgun and kills them both..

The Priest goes ballistic and yells at the chief that he has spent years teaching the tribe how to be civilized and be kind to each other, so how could he kill these people in cold blood that way?

The chief replied, "My bike."
***
A good friend of mine . . .
A good friend of mine worked in a pickle factory.

For many years, he had a powerful, almost uncontrollable desire to put his penis in the pickle slicer.

Unable to stand it any longer, he finally sought professional help from the factory psychologist.
 
After six months of intense therapy, however, the frustrated therapist
gave up.  The therapist advised my friend to go ahead and do it,
otherwise he would probably never have any peace of mind.
 
The next day, my friend came home from work very early. His
wife became alarmed and wanted to know what had
happened.
 
For the first time, my friend tearfully confessed to her his
tormenting desire to put his penis in the pickle slicer. He
went on to explain that today he finally went ahead and did
it, and he was immediately fired.
 
His wife gasped and ran over to her husband. She quickly
yanked down his pants and shorts only to find a normal,
completely intact penis.
 
She looked up and said, "I don't understand. What about the
pickle slicer?"

My friend replied, "I think she got fired too."
***
the old french lady
Heard a story once about an old French lady who'd run a small shop in her village for years, until one day a huge corporate supermarket set up across the road from her little shop. They put up signs advertising their prices, including one that said "Butter - 10 francs".
In response, the lady added a sign to her own window, "Butter - 9 francs".
The next day, the big supermarket had a new sign, "Butter - 8 francs". Sure enough, the day after the lady's sign now read "7 francs".
This went on for a while, until eventually one of the lady's customers pointed to the sign and said, "Madame, you cannot keep your prices so low for long. These big companies can use their buying power to sell products cheaper, but a little store like yours can never compete."
In response, the old lady bent forward conspiratorially and muttered, "Monsieur, I don't even sell butter."
***
Three old women are discussing how their memory isn't what it used to be.
The first woman says, "Sometimes, I'm in the elevator, and I don't remember if I'm going up or down."
"The second woman says, "sometimes, I have a bottle of mayonnaise in my hand, and I don't remember if I'm taking it out of the fridge or putting it back."
"The third woman says, "Well, I don't have any of those problems, knock wood," knocking on the table.  "Oh, hold on a second, someone's at the door."

***
A bar on the Empire State Building..
So as some people know, there's a bar at the top of the Empire State Building.

 One night, 2 guys were drinking and one guy says, "hey did you guys know that one of the reasons this building has such interesting design is that they made it so when people jump out of windows, the wind holds them from falling too fast and they just float to the ground, unhurt?"


The 2nd guy say, "No way, prove it!"
So he jumps out the window! A few minutes later the elevator dings and out walks the guy. 


"See! It works!"


So, the 2nd drunk guy goes over, jumps out and falls to his death.


The bartender speaks up, "Superman, you sure are an asshole when you're drunk!"
***
Two arabs come to america.
They make a bet who would be the most "americanized" in a year. 

After this year, one brother says, "i just dropped my kids off at baseball and we're having mcdonald's later". 

The other brother says, "fuck off, towelhead!"
***
Barack Obama is having a race with Joe Biden around the white house.
After finishing the race Obama says "Whew, just under 10 minutes. Did I break the record?"

Biden replies "No, Bush did 9:11."
***
"Am I mentioned in the will?" the nephew asked anxiously.
"You certainly are" , replied the lawyer.

Right here in the third paragraph your uncle says:
To my niece Sarah I bequeath a hundred thousand dollars,
to my cousin Janice fifty thousand dollars,
and to my nephew Charles, who was always curious to know if he was mentioned in my will, I say "Hi, Charles"
***
Two sisters
There were once two sisters, one called Petal and one called Fridge. One day, Petal asks her parents, "Why did you call me Petal?" and they replied "Because just after you were born, a petal fell on you."

"Bllaaarrarararraraaarg", says Fridge from the corner.





Edit: neat, near the top of /r/jokes frontpage! That's, cool, thanks! 

And yeah, there's a few versions of this, but I found I had posted this as my status on Facebook about 6 years ago (along with a statement that I had woken up my sleeping ex haha) and was reminded of it in memories. Got a chuckle from my past self and thought I'd see if I could do the same for you guys! 
***
A guy walks in to his backyard and sees a gorilla in his tree
He gets online and finds a man who specializes in gorilla removal. When he arrives at the house he has a stick, a set of handcuffs, a chihuahua, and a shotgun. 
He tells the homeowner  "I'm going to climb up in the tree and use the stick to hit the gorilla until he falls out of the tree. Upon landing, the trained chihuahua will viciously lunge for the gorillas genitals and when he attempts to protect himself we will slap on the handcuffs."
The homeowner, a little bewildered, says "that's crazy enough it just might work, but what is the shotgun for?"  
"If I fall out of the tree first....shoot the chihuahua."
***
Wife tells her husband that their 13-year-old son had sex with his teacher...
The wife demands the husband go upstairs and discipline the boy.  The husband goes up to the room, shuts the door and says "I heard you had sex with your teacher."
The boy sheepishly says, "yes, dad."
The dad whispers, "You're not in trouble.  I'm actually proud of you!  I didn't have sex with my teacher until I was a senior in high school!  You know that new bike you wanted?  Let's go get it."
So the dad takes the boy to the bike shop and buys him the new bike.
"How about you ride your new bike home, son," says the dad proudly.
"Naw, that's okay," the son replies.  "My ass is still a little sore."
***
A blind man enters a bar and find his way to a barstool.
After ordering a drink, and sitting there for a while, the blind guy yells to the bartender, 



“Hey, you wanna hear a blonde joke?” 



The bar immediately becomes absolutely quiet. In a husky, deep voice,the woman next to him says, 



“Before you tell that joke, you should know something. The bartender is blonde, the bouncer is blonde and I’m a 6′ tall, 200 pound blonde with a black belt in karate. What’s more, the fella sitting next to me is blonde and he’s a weightlifter. The woman to your right is a blonde, and she’s a pro wrestler. Think about it seriously, mister. You still wanna tell that blonde joke?” 



The blind guy says, “Nah, not if I’m gonna have to explain it five times.”
***
A priest goes golfing with his sailor buddy one day..
The sailor took his first shot missed and said, "Fuck, I missed." Surprised, the priest replied, "Don't use that kind of language or god will strike you down." 

The sailor took aim and hit his shot second shot. Again he missed and under his breath the said, "I fucking missed again." The priest overheard and replied, "My son, please don't use that language or god will strike you down."

The sailor took his third shot and once again he couldn't help mutter, "Oh fuck, I missed". The priest said, "That's it god will certainly strike you down."

Suddenly, the skies darkened, thunder boomed and a bolt of lightning came down...but it hit the priest. From the heavens a deep voice said, "Oh fuck I missed".

***
The Long Cold Winter.
It was October and the Indians on a remote reservation asked their new Chief if the coming winter was going to be cold or mild. 

Since he was a Chief in a modern society he had never been taught he old secrets. 

When he looked at the sky he couldn't tell what the winter was going to be like. 

Nevertheless, to be on the safe side he told his tribe that the winter was indeed going to be cold and that the members of the village should collect firewood to be prepared. 

But being a practical leader, after several days he got an idea. He went to the phone booth, called the National Weather Service and asked, "Is the coming winter going to be cold?" 

"It looks like this winter is going to be quite cold," the meteorologist at the weather service responded. 

So the Chief went back to his people and told them to collect even more firewood in order to be prepared. 

A week later he called the National Weather Service again. "Does it still look like it is going to be a very cold winter?" 

"Yes," the man at National Weather Service again replied, "it's going to be a very cold winter." 

The Chief again went back to his people and ordered them to collect every scrap of firewood they could find. 

Two weeks later the Chief called the National Weather Service again. "Are you absolutely sure that the winter is going to be very cold?" 

"Absolutely," the man replied. "It's looking more and more like it is going to be one of the coldest winters ever." 

"How can you be so sure?" the Chief asked. 

The weatherman replied, "We're sure it's going to be cold because the Indians are collecting firewood like crazy!" 
***
Two boys were misbehaving...
...so their mother went to the local priest to look for advice.

The priest thought it would be best if the boys learned integrity, by way of understanding that "God is everywhere, and He sees everything you do so you shouldn't misbehave."

The mother and the priest thought it best that the priest talked to the boys, so the mother agreed to take the boys in one at a time to talk to the priest.

She brought the first boy (Ray) to the church and left the second boy (Jim) at home. She took Ray into the priest's office and stayed outside while the priest and Ray talked.

"Where is God?" The priest calmly asked expecting to make the point that "God is everywhere". Ray, petrified, said nothing. So the priest asked again slightly louder, "Where is God?!". Ray still said nothing. So the priest stood up and slammed his hands on the desk yelling, "WHERE IS GOD?!?!". Ray stood up and ran out of the office, past his mother, and ran all the way home.

He came screaming in the front door and ran straight to Jim's room. He opened the door and said, "GOD IS MISSING AND THEY THINK WE TOOK HIM!".
***
Son: "Mom, Dad.. I'm gay"
Son: "Mom, Dad.. I'm gay"

Mom: *staring at dad

Dad: ...*clenches fists 

Mom: ...don't!

Dad: *sweats profusely

Mom:

Dad: HI GAY, IM DAD 




Kudos to @Lerky on Twitter
***
A woman is cooking dinner and her husband walks in the door, shaking his head and laughing...
"You'll never believe the bullshit I heard at work today. Bill Jenkins was bragging that he's fucked every woman on our street but one."

His wife smirks, stirring the gravy. "I bet it's that snooty old Cathy Anderson."
***
A Joke for everyone who isn't called Richard
Was chatting to a lovely Blonde the other day, Ruth she said her name was.

When she asked my name I said ‘Jason, but everyone calls me Dick for short’

‘How do you get Dick from Jason’ she asked

I replied ‘Ask nicely!’

***
My neighbour owes me £500 and he won’t pay up...........
A man went to his lawyer and told him, ‘My neighbour owes me £500 and he won’t pay up. What should I do?’ ‘Do you have any proof he owes you the money?’ asked the lawyer. ‘Nope,’ replied the man. ‘OK, then write him a letter asking him for the £1,000 he owed you,’ said the lawyer. ‘But it’s only £500,’ replied the man. ‘Precisely. That’s what he will reply and then you’ll have your Proof!’
***
A man is sitting next to a woman on a jet that's getting ready to take off.
Suddenly, the man sneezes. He unzips his pants and wipes off the end of his penis with his handkerchief. He zips up and continues reading his magazine. The woman cannot believe what she just saw.  
   
Then he sneezes again, unzips, pulls out his penis and wipes it off with a handkerchief. The woman says, "Excuse me, sir, but that is disgusting and rude — and if you do it again I am going to call the flight attendant and have you removed from this plane."  
He says, "I am so sorry, but I have this very rare, embarrassing physical handicap that causes me to have an orgasm every time I sneeze."  
   
The woman, disarmed by the man's honesty and somewhat embarrassed by her own callousness, says, "Oh you poor man. Are you taking anything for it?"   
   
He answers, "Pepper."
***
An officer pulls up at the scene of an accident
where a car has driven through a field, killed several livestock and crashed into a barn. He decides to interview Steve who is struggling to keep his balance and is being propped up by Karen. 







"Been out for a few have we mate?" asks the officer.







"Shuure ave mate" grins Steve.







"I realise you are very drunk sir," states the officer, "but that is absolutely no excuse to let your wife drive you home!"
***
Speeding motorist
A police officer in a small town stopped a motorist who was speeding down Main Street.

"But officer," the man began, "I can explain."

"Just be quiet," snapped the officer. "I'm going to let you cool your heels in jail until the chief gets back."

"But, officer, I just wanted to say,..."

"And I said keep quiet! You're going to jail!"

A few hours later the officer looked in on his prisoner and said, "Lucky for you that the chief's at his daughter's wedding. He'll be in a good mood when he gets back."

"Don't count on it," answered the fellow in the cell. "I'm the groom." 
***
A ventriloquist is in the middle of his act...
and is in the part of his routine where he riffs off a bunch of blonde jokes, one after the other.  A blonde woman in the front row is getting upset, and finally says, "I'll have you know, just because a woman is blonde doesn't mean she is dumb. There are plenty of highly intelligent, successful blonde women in the world. I should know, because I'm one of them. "

The ventriloquist says, "Hey lady, don't get upset. It's just harmless jokes. "

The blond replies, "You butt out of it, I'm talking to that little jerk on your lap. "




***
NSFW Mommy takes little johnny to the zoo..
As they pass the elephant cage, the elephant has an erection.        
"What's that, Mommy?" asks the child.     
"Nothing, Johnny, nothing," says the embarrassed mother, swiftly leading him on.     
A week later Johnny's dad takes him and the same happens. "What's that, Daddy?"        
"That, son, is the elephant's penis."      
"Mommy said it was nothing."          
"Son, I've spoiled that woman."
***
10 shots of whiskey please!
A man walks into a bar and orders 10 shots of whiskey. The bartender pours them and the guy starts downing them. By the 5th one the bartender asks, "Why are you drinking so fast?"

The guy says, "You'd drink this fast if you had what I have."

The bartender says, "What do you have?"

The guy says, "No money."
***
Masturbating into condoms...
Jack is dating this girl Paula. He takes her out five times before he finally gets her back up to his apartment for coffee. They're fooling around on the couch, they move to the bedroom, and they have sex. 

After it's done, Paula glances over at the nightstand and sees the box of Trojans. It's a 12-pack, but there are only five left in there.

"What happened to the rest of them?" she asks accusingly.

"Well... I masturbated into them," he says.

She accepts the answer, but she's curious. When she's with a few guy friends two days later, Paula asks them about it.

"Do you guys ever do that?" she asks.

"Sure, all the time," her friend says.

"Really, you masturbate into condoms?" she responds.

"Oh, no! I thought you were asking if I ever lie to my girlfriend!"
***
A man was cleaning out the basement of the house his grandfather left him...
...when he came across an old metal oil lamp. The man starts wiping it off with his shirt when two genies emerge from the lamp.

"Holy shit!" the guy exclaims.

"We are the genies of the lamp. We have been stuck inside that lamp for decades, and you have freed us. We will grant you three wishes!" the first genie proclaims.

The man thinks. "OK, first I want ten million dollars in my bank account, and I want it legal! No crimes or anything."

The second genie claps his hands. "IT IS DONE!" He looks at the man. "Your second wish?"

"I want my garage and driveway to be full of expensive cars. Nothing worth less than $500,000!" the man says.

"Done!" says the first genie, clapping his hands together. "And for your final wish?"

The man turns red. "Listen, uh...this is going to be a bit embarrassing so can I just whisper it to you?" he asks the second genie.

"Of course," the second genie replies.

The man leans over and whispers his final wish to the second genie. The second genie motions for the other genie to follow him and they both walk out of the basement.

A minute later, a group of men in white robes bursts into the basement and grabs the man who had made the wishes. The man struggled against them, but the men tied him up, tied a rope around his neck, and pulled him up by the rafters until he was dead.

After a few minutes, two of the robed men remove their hoods and look at each other. It's the two genies. "I can understand the wish for the money and the wish for luxury cars," the second genie said, "but why the fuck did he want to be hung like a black man?"
***
A blond goes to Target
A blonde was shopping at Target &
came across a shiny silver thermos.
She was quite fascinated by it, so she picked it up & took
it to the clerk to ask what it was.

The clerk said, 'Why, that's a thermos.....
It keeps hot things hot, And cold things cold.'

'Wow, said the blonde, 'that's amazing.....I'm going to buy it!'
So she bought the thermos & took it to work the next day.

Her boss saw it on her desk.
'What's that,' he asked?

'Why, that's a thermos.... It keeps hot things hot & cold things
cold,' she replied..

Her boss inquired, 'What do you have in it?'

The blonde replied......
'Two popsicles & some coffee.'

***
A boy comes home from school
A boy comes home from school:

Kid: Dad, math teacher wants to see you.

Dad: Why, what happened?

Kid: Today at class he asked me "What is 9x7?", I said 63. Then he asked me "What is 7x9?", I said "What the fuck is the difference?".

Dad thinks fair enough, says he will drop by. Next day, boy comes home, asks his dad:

Kid: Dad did you come to school?

Dad: Not yet.

Kid: Well, now my gym teacher wants to see you too.

Dad: Why, what happenned?

Kid: Today at gym class, he asked me to raise my right hand, i did. Then he asked me to raise my left hand, i did. Then he asked me to raise my right leg, i did. Then he asked me to raise my left leg, i asked, "Am i supposed to stand on my dick?".

Dad thinks fair enough, says he will drop by. Next day, boy comes home, asks his dad:

Kid: Dad did you come to school?

Dad: Not yet.

Kid: Well don't, i got expelled.

Dad: Why, what happened?

Kid: Today, they summoned me to principal's office. Math, gym and history teachers were waiting for me there.

Dad: What the fuck was the history teacher doing there?

Kid: I asked the same thing.  

Edit: Grammar. English is hard.
***
I saw Denzel Washington on the street today.
I said "Hey Denzel! Can I get a picture with you?"
And he's all like "I'm not Denzel Washington you racist piece of shit."
Classic Denzel.


***
Two guys sit down on a train...
Two men sit down on a train, in the same cabin, and begin reading the newspaper.

When they look up, they make eye contact, and both realize, they each had a black eye.

Both men start to chuckle, and decided to exchange stories

Guy1: "...Yeah, I really got it." 

Guy2: "Me too! What happened?"

Guy1: "Well, I went up to the ticket counter for the express train today."

Guy2: "Yeah?"

Guy1: "And there was a beautiful blonde, young female, with huge cans."

Guy1: "So, I went up to her and instead of saying 'i need a ticket for pittsburgh'

Guy1: " I said 'Excuse me maim, Can I get a picket for titsburg'."

Guy2: "Oh, you dog you."

Guy1: "Honest mistake, I am a sucker for blondes." 

Guy2: "I'm Sure"

Guy1: "So what's your deal?"

Guy2: "Well, similar story actually."

Guy1: "No Way!"

Guy2: "Yeah, Yeah"

Guy2: "So, I went downstairs to eat some breakfast with my wife."

Guy2: "You know normal day"

Guy2 "And instead of saying 'Pass the cheerios hun' I said 'You ruined my life you stupid bitch.'"
***
3 men are ship-wrecked on an island
Where they are captured by cannibals. The cannibal leader says he'll let them live if they go out in the forest and grab 10 of the same fruit.

They all run off, when after a while the first person comes back with 10 apples. The cannibal leader then says, "You must shove them up your ass without any facial expression, and then you will live." The man tries but he winces after the third apple and was killed on the spot.

The second person comes back with 10 cherries and is told the same thing. He starts shoving them up his ass with no difficulty, but he starts laughing hysterically after the ninth cherry and is killed on the spot.


In heaven the two people meet, where the first person ask, "Why did you laugh, you could have gotten away?" "I saw the other guy come back with pineapples."
***
A man was marooned on a desert island.
One day a beautiful woman arrives in a wet suit.  
'When did you last have a smoke?' she asks. 'Five years ago.' So she gets out a cigar and he smokes it.  
She unzips her wet suit a bit and says, 'When did you last have a drink?' He said, 'Five years ago.' So she gets out a bottle of Scotch and he has a drink.  
Then she unzips her wet suit a bit more and says, 'And when was the last time you played around?' He looks at her in amazement and says: 'You're not telling me you've got a set of golf clubs in there?'

Ronnie Corbett (1930 - 2016)
***
A guy asks his doctor if he had ever laughed at a patient.
The doctor says "In over 20 years I haven't because I try to remain professional."

With that the guy dropped his trousers revealing the tiniest dick the doctor had ever seen. It wasn't any bigger than a AAA battery. 

The doctor burst into uncontrolable hysteria. "I'm sorry I really am, I don't know what came over me. I promise it won't happen again. Now what seems to be the problem?" 

The guy starts sobbing and says "It's swollen."

***
Women are evil...
A woman and a man are involved in a car accident and it’s a bad one. 

Both of their cars are totally demolished but amazingly neither of them are hurt.

After they crawl out of their cars, the woman says, "Wow, just look at our cars! There’s nothing left, but we’re unhurt. You're a handsome man and I'm a beautiful woman. This must be a sign from God that we should meet and be friends and live together in peace for the rest of our days!”

Flattered and highly relieved, the man replied, “Oh yes, I agree with you completely! This must be a sign from God!”

The woman continued, “And look at this, here’s another miracle. My car is completely demolished but this bottle of wine didn't break. Surely God wants us to drink this wine and celebrate our good fortune.”

Then she hands the bottle to the man. 

The man nods his head in agreement, opens it and drinks half the bottle and then hands it back to the woman.

The woman takes the bottle and immediately puts the cap back on and hands it back to the man.

The man asks, “Aren't you having any?”

The woman replies, “No. I think I’ll just wait for the police."
***
Why did Steve Irwin's sunscreen get recalled?
It didn't protect him from harmful rays

Edit: Steve Irwin was the man. RIP
***
Hi. My name is Bill Gates and today, I will be teaching you how to count to ten:
1, 2, 3, 95, 98, NT, 2000, XP, Vista, 7, 8, 10



----

Edit: I think I may be missing a version, but looking through the comments it seems no one else knows what it is either. I'll have to google it.
***
How many Germans does it take to change a light bulb?
One. We are efficient and dont have humour.




Edit: Wow this blew up. As a German, I didnt expect this. 
***
An Atheist...
Walks up to the Pearly Gates. God says, "I will let you in if you can make me laugh."

The Atheist asks, "who is the greatest Jewish baker of all time? Hitler. He made over 60,000 Jews toast."

God looks at him and says, "A holocaust joke? That is not really funny." 

The atheist replied, "Eh, I guess you should have been there."
***
"I'm proud to be a black man"
"I'm proud to be a black man!" said the black man.  

"I'm proud to be an Asian man!" said the Asian man.  

"I'm proud to be a white man!" said the racist.


Edit: damn, I get it guys, you don't like white people. 

Edit 2: I have received more nasty PMs and death threats that I would have expected from /r/jokes
***
A couple is walking in Moscow when they feel a slight precipitation
The husband says "ah, it's raining"

 The wife replies "no it's snowing" 

"How about we ask this communist officer here" replies the husband, "he is always right!, 

"Officer Rudolph, Is it raining or snowing?"

 "definitely raining" replies Rudolph before walking off 

"see?" says the husband,


"Rudolph the red knows rain, dear"
***
She didn't realize tapping him on the shoulder would make him do this.
A lady in a taxi leaned forward to ask the driver a question. She gently tapped his shoulder to get his attention.

The driver screamed, lost control of the cab and nearly hit a bus. He drove over the curb, almost going through a shop window.

For a few moments the inside of the cab was silent. The shaken driver turned and said, "Are you ok? I'm very sorry, but you scared the piss out of me!" 

The passenger, very startled at this point, apologizes to the driver and says "I didn't realize a mere tap on the shoulder could scare some one so bad" 

The driver replied "no, no, I'm the one who is sorry, today is my first day driving a cab. I've been driving a hearse for over 20 years!"
***
A blonde, a brunette, and a redhead going up a stairway to heaven
A blonde, a brunette, and a redhead are waiting at the pearly gates. God then says to them "Normally you girls wouldn't be let in, but I'm in a good mood today. In front of you there is staircase of exactly a thousand steps. Every time you take a step up, I will tell you a joke. If you make it all the way to the top without laughing, you will be allowed into heaven. If you laugh at one of my jokes, you will be doomed to spend eternity in Hell." 

The brunette goes first. She makes it the the 250th step, and laughs. God then sends her to Hell. The redhead goes next. She makes it to the 500th step and laughs. God sends her to Hell as well. The blonde goes last. She makes it to the 999th step, and laughs. God then asks her, "you were so close to the top, why did you laugh?" The blonde responds "I just got the first one."
***
So this black kid was playing in the kitchen right..
He accidentally knocked a bag of flour off the shelf and it went all over him.

His mom came in the kitchen and he decided to make a joke of it. "Look Mom, I'm white!" he said. 

His mom slapped him across the cheek. "I can't believe you just said that boy, go tell your father what you just said."

Surprised and a little hurt, he walked over to his Dad in the TV room and said "Hey look Dad... I'm white!"

When his Dad heard that, he flat out punched the kid. Square in the face. The kid was shocked and confused. The Dad said "Boy that's the worst shit I've ever heard, go and show your grandma what you did and tell her what you said.

So the kid begrudgingly walked upstairs and walked into his Grandma's bedroom. "Hey Grandma look, I'm white..."

...and his Grandma just pummeled him. Relentlessly. So hard that both the kids' parents had came upstairs to break up the beating.

They all stood around him and asked him "Yeah well how do you feel about making that joke now?"

The kid just looked up at them and said "...Well I've only been white for 10 minutes, and I hate all you niggers already!"
***
Jesus take the wheel
Carlos take the stereo, Manuel get the seats and I'll be the Juan on watch.
***
A man goes to a massage parlor looking for a happy ending...
A man goes to a massage parlor looking for a happy ending.

He goes inside and meets with his massage therapist, a middle-aged Asian woman who is not wholly unattractive. She takes him into the room, lights a few candles and leaves the room so he can undress. He does so and lies down on the table.

She returns and begins to massage his back and buttocks, causing him to become aroused. After several minutes, she asks him to roll over, whereupon she notices the large bulge beneath his towel.

"Oh! You want wanky?" she asks, and the man nods emphatically. With a smile, the therapist signals to him with one finger and steps out of the room.

Thirty minutes or so pass, and the man is still lying on the table. By now, he is no longer horny. The therapist finally returns, and peeking her head into the room, she asks, "Are you done?"
***
A guy walks into a pub...
A guy walks into a pub and sees a sign hanging over the bar that reads:  
CHEESEBURGER: $1.50  
CHICKEN SANDWICH: $2.50  
HAND JOB: $10.00 
He walks up to the bar and beckons one of the three exceptionally attractive blondes serving drinks.  "Can I help you?" she asks.  "I was wondering," whispers the man. "Are you the one who gives the hand jobs?" "Yes," she purrs. "I am." The man replies, "Well, wash your hands. I want a cheeseburger."
***
Sunday Morning Sex
Upon hearing that her elderly grandfather had just passed away, Katie went straight to her grandparent's house to visit her 95 year-old grandmother and comfort her. 

When she asked how her grandfather had died, her grandmother replied, "He had a heart attack while we were making love on Sunday morning." Horrified, Katie told her grandmother that 2 people nearly 100 years old having sex would surely be asking for trouble. 

"Oh no, my dear," replied granny. "Many years ago, realizing our advanced age, we figured out the best time to do it was when the church bells would start to ring. It was just the right rhythm. Nice and slow and even. Nothing too strenuous, simply in on the Ding and out on the Dong." She paused to wipe away a tear, and continued, "He'd still be alive if the ice cream truck hadn't come along."

***
A young man named Chuck bought a horse from a farmer for $250.
A young man named Chuck bought a horse from a farmer for $250. The farmer agreed to deliver the horse the next day. The next day, the farmer drove up to Chucks house and said, ‘Sorry son, but I have some bad news, the horse died.’

Chuck replied, ‘Well, then just give me my money back.’

The farmer said, ‘Can’t do that. I went and spent it already.’

Chuck said, ‘Ok, then, just bring me the dead horse.’

The farmer asked, ‘What ya gonna do with him?

Chuck said, ‘I’m going to raffle him off.’

The farmer said, ‘You can’t raffle off a dead horse!’

Chuck said, ‘Sure I can, Watch me. I just won’t tell any body he’s dead.’

A month Later, the farmer met up with Chuck and asked, ‘What happened with that dead horse?’

Chuck said, ‘I raffled him off. I sold 500 tickets at five dollars a piece and made a profit of $2495.’

The farmer said, ‘Didn’t anyone complain?’

Chuck said, ‘Just the guy who won. So I gave him his five dollars back.’

***
A guy stuck his head into a barbershop full of customers.....
....He asks, "How long before I can get a haircut?" The barber looked around the shop full of customers and said, "About 2 hours." 

The guy left. 

A few days later, the same guy stuck his head in the door and asked, "How long before I can get a haircut?" The barber looked around at the shop and said, "About 3 hours." 

The guy left.  

A week later, the same guy stuck his head in the shop and asked, "How long before I can get a haircut?" The barber looked around the shop and said, "About an hour and a half." 

The guy left.  

The barber turned to his friend and said, "Hey, Bob, do me a favor, follow him and see where he goes. He keeps asking how long he has to wait for a haircut, but he never comes back." A little while later, Bob returned to the shop, laughing hysterically. The barber asked, "So, where does he go when he leaves?" 

Bob looked up, wiped the tears from his eyes and said, "Your house!"
***
A priest, a pastor, and a rabbi are on a sinking ship.
The pastor yells "Save the children!"

The rabbi replies "Pft, fuck the children!"

The priest says "Do you think we have time?"
***
A man is rushed into the ER with a golf club wrapped around his neck
He has also been beaten horribly about the head and face. The ER doctor says, "My God man! What happened to you?" Through broken teeth the patient tells his story. "My wife and I and another couple went out for a round of golf. We went to that new course by the dairy farm out on highway 12. Well, we'd played a few holes when my wife hit a drive that sliced and drifted over into the dairy's pasture. All four of us searched and searched for that ball, but couldn't find it anywhere. Just as we were about to give up, I noticed something white under one cow's tail. I lifted up the tail, and sure enough there was a golf ball in the cow's vagina. So, I pointed at it and said 'Hey honey, this looks like yours'.....
***
A man is walking on a beach...
And he trips over something. He looks down, and it is an old bottle. He picks it up, and out pops a genie. "I will give you one wish, and only one. What will it be?"

The man thinks, and thinks. He lives in California, but really loves to visit Hawaii, but he despises flying. So he asks the genie, "I want a bridge from California to Hawaii, over the Pacific ocean."

The genie looks at him for a bit. He says "No, no, no. Sorry, but a bridge over the Pacific? That is too much! Please think of something else". The man is pretty angry. He really wanted that bridge, and that was really the only thing on his mind. So he thinks, and thinks, and thinks for days. He had to get the right thing. He sleeps on it, and the next day comes returns to the beach.

The genie is still there, so the man asks him, "I want to understand women."
The genie's eyes widen, and he asks him "How many lanes do you want on that bridge?"
***
A guy walks into a pub...
...And sees a sign hanging over the bar that reads: CHEESEBURGER: $1.50 CHICKEN SANDWICH: $2.50 HAND JOB: $10.00 He walks up to the bar and beckons one of the three exceptionally attractive blondes serving drinks. "Can I help you?" she asks. "I was wondering," whispers the man. "Are you the one who gives the hand jobs?" "Yes," she purrs. "I am." The man replies, "Well, wash your hands. I want a cheeseburger."
***
2 original jokes
Here's 2 (bad) jokes I made up a few years ago. With all the reposts on here some new ones might be nice even if they are bad!

1. What do you call a long snake-like poo? A Poothon 

2. A family of poothons were floating down a river.

The son poothon asks his mother "dad told me that we're just a by-product of the human digestive system, is that true?"

The mother replies "don't listen to him, he's just talking shit!"
***
A man goes to India for a cheap penis extension..
The surgeon suggests a baby elephants trunk stitched on for £3000.
The man agrees.
6 weeks later, while having dinner with his new girlfriend he feels an unusual stirring in his pants and thinks this is the night.
While chatting over dinner his cock flies out and steals an apple off the table and goes back into his pants.
"Wow!", she says, "can you do that again?"
He says,"My cock can, but I don't think my arsehole can take another apple."
***
My first drink with my son
 I was reading an article last night about fathers and sons, and memories came flooding back of the time I took my son out for his first drink.
 Off we went to our local bar, which is only two blocks from the house.
 I got him a Miller Genuine. He didn't like it – so I drank it.
 Then I got him a Fosters, he didn't like it either, so I drank it.
 It was the same with the Coors and the Bud.
 By the time we got down to the Irish whiskey,
 I could hardly push the stroller back home.

***
What's the difference between Jesus and Mexicans?
Jesus doesn't have any tattoos of Mexicans.
***
A man goes to his doctor
"Doc, you gotta help me. I can't stop singing What's New Pussycat."  
"Oh, that sounds like Tom Jones Syndrome," said the doctor.  
"Tom Jones Syndrome? Is that rare?"   
"It's not unusual."  
***
So I picked up this girl the other day.....
and she took me back to her house where things got hot and heavy very quickly. I bent her over the kitchen table and started going at it when suddenly we heard the front door open.
"Oh shit , it's my boyfriend ! " she exclaimed "Quick, use the backdoor" .

Now it's at about this time I probably should have left but you just don't get an offer like that every day.

Edit: Well this is the Obligatory My best submission amendment.
I'd say I'm surprised that a joke about unexpexted anal sex is popular but this is Reddit.  I'm glad you enjoy it :).
***
I wrote this little ditty just seconds after waking up.
An auto worker storms into his union leader's office. "I have a really pesky booger in my nostril, and management won't get us anymore tissue boxes!!" he shouts.

The union manager calmly responds: "Maybe you should picket."
***
(NSFW)A beautiful woman walks into a doctor's office..
This beautiful woman one day walks into a doctors office and the doctor is blown away by how stunningly awesome she is that all his professionalism goes right out the window..

He tells her to take off her pants, she does and he begins to start rubbing her thighs. 

"Do you know what I'm doing?" The doctor asks. She replies "Yes, checking for abnormalities"

He then tells her to take off her top and bra and begins fondling her breasts and asks "Do you know what I'm doing now? She replies "Yes, checking for cancer"

Finally he tells her to take off her panties, lays her on the table and starts having sex with her. He says to her "Do you know what I'm doing now?" 

She replies "Yes, getting herpes that's why I'm here"
***
It was George the Mailman's last day on the job after 35 years of carrying the mail through all kinds of weather to the same neighborhood. When he arrived at the first house on his route, he was greeted by the whole family who congratulated him and sent him on his way with a tidy gift envelope.
At the second house, they presented him with a box of fine cigars. The folks at the third house handed him a selection of terrific fishing lures. 

At the fourth house, he was met at the door by a strikingly beautiful blonde woman in a revealing negligee. She took him by the hand, gently led him through the door, which she closed behind him, and took him up the stairs to the bedroom where she blew his mind with the most passionate love he had ever experienced. 

When he had enough, they went downstairs and she fixed him a giant breakfast: eggs, potatoes, ham, sausage, blueberry waffles, and fresh-squeezed orange juice. When he was truly satisfied, she poured him a cup of steaming coffee. As she was pouring, he noticed a dollar bill sticking out from under the cup's bottom edge. "All this was just too wonderful for words," he said, "But what's the dollar for?" 
"Well," she said, "Last night, I told my husband that today would be your last day, and that we should do something special for you. I asked him what to give you. He said, 'Screw him. Give him a dollar.' The breakfast was my idea."
***
A dwarf escaped from prison so he could fulfill his dream to go skydiving.
A dwarf escaped from prison so he could fulfill his dream to go skydiving. (Skydiving is when you jump out of a plane way up in the sky with a parachute to slow your fall) .... Sorry if that was a little con descending. 
***
A woman was desperate for finding a boyfriend...
So she decided to put a Newspaper Classified with her address saying this:

"I'm looking for a man who loves me, a man who doesn't hit me, one that won't run away from me and that pleassures me in bed."

The next day her doorbell rang and there was a man with no arms and no legs waiting outside. When she opened he said "Im here for the ad you posted yesterday"

The woman laughed and said "What makes you think you can make me happy?"

The man aswered. "As you can see, I have no arms so i will never hit you. Also I have no legs so I will never run away from you"

"And what about sex?" Said the woman.

"How do you think I rang the doorbell?"
***
A Higgs Boson walks into a church
The priest says “we don’t allow Higgs Bosons in here”. The Higgs Boson then replies “but without me, how could you have mass?”
***
Johnny and Ruth are mountain biking down a hill...
...Ruth hits a tree.  Johnny continues, ruthlessly. 
***
What does Tumblr and KFC's chicken have in common?
They both contain high amounts of trans fats.

Edit: Omg guys! I didn't expect this to take off this much, thanks guys!
***
Why does the Mexican guy take xanax?
For hispanic attacks

Edit: Happy Cinco de Mayo
***
A Jewish man is elected president...
Soon after, he calls up his mother to tell her the good news. "Mom, did you hear, I've been elected president!" "Oh, T
That's so great to hear, darling. I'm so proud of you!" 

"So," asks the man, "you'll be coming out for the inauguration, right?" "I'm not sure," says his mother, "D.C. is so cold this time of year." "I'm the president, mom. I can arrange for you to get any sweater you want."

"I'm still not sure," continues his mother, "flying across the country is such a hassle." "Mom, I'll have you flown out here on Air Force One. It'll be no trouble to you." Finally, his mother agrees.

The day of the inaguration rolls around, and his mother is seated between the Vice President and the Secretary of State. As the man is being sworn in, his mother nudges the vice president.

"You see that boy up there? The one with his hand on the Bible? His brother's a doctor. "
***
Olympic Condoms. (NSFW)
A man was shopping in a nearby supermarket when he noticed a package that said "Olympic Condoms". He bought it, and told his wife about it.



" - Olympic Condoms? What's so special about them?"



" - They have 3 colors: Gold, Silver and Bronze."



" - And what color are you going to wear tonight?"



" - Gold, obviously!"



" - Why not Silver? It'd be great if you came second, for a change."
***
A man walks into a bar with a gun..
A guy walked into a local bar, waving his unholstered pistol and yelled, “I have a 45 caliber Colt 1911 with a seven round magazine plus one in the chamber and I want to know who’s been sleeping with my wife.”


A voice from the back of the room called out, “You need more ammo!”
***
An Aussie favourite.
So there was a lizard who was walking through the rainforest, he looked up in the tree and saw a koala smoking a few joints. So the lizard goes up the tree and smokes a few more joints with the koala. After a little while, the lizard decides to go down to the pond to get a drink for his dry mouth, so he scurries down the tree and over to the pond where there was a crocodile waiting. 

The crocodile says "woah man, what are you doing drinking from the pond?" "Well I smoked a few joints with this koala and I have really bad dry mouth," the lizard responded. 

In shock, the crocodile says, "fuck me, there's a weed smoking koala? I have to see this!" 

So the crocodile climbs out of the pond and walks over to the tree where the koala has smoked 4 or 5 more joints since the lizard left.

The crocodile says, "Hey mate, what are you doing up there?"

The koala looks down in shock and says, "Bloody hell mate, how much fuckin water did you drink?"
***
Father's Day, at school, and all the students are supposed to make cards...
...by drawing a picture of their father at work. 

Teacher asks, "Logan, what does your father do?" 

"My dad's a cop. I'm gonna draw him catching a bad guy."

Then the teacher asks, "Briei, what does your father do?"

Briei says, "My dad's a writer. I'm going to draw him with his new book." 

Teacher gets to Jake. "And what does your father do, Jake?"

Jake says, "My dad's dead."

"Oh my," Teacher says, "What did your father do before he died?" 

"He turned blue and shit on the floor." 
***
its gonna be a long flight
A man sits next to a kid on a plane.
The man turns to the kid and says, "Let's talk."

The kid says, "sure, about what?"

The man, teasingly, says, "nuclear power."

The kid says, "sure, but first, let's talk deer, cows and horses. They all eat grass, but the deer drops pellets, the cow does patties, and the horse produces clumps. Do you know why?"

The man is stumped. "No", he says.

The kid replies, " do you really think we should talk about nuclear power when you don't know shit!?"
***
A woman says to her lawyer "I want to divorce my husband."
"On what grounds?"

"Grounds? We have two acres at the edge of town with a big lawn and some fruit trees."

"No, that's not what I meant. Do you have a grudge?"

"Yes, we have a two car garage but only one car so we use the rest for storage."

^(getting exasperated) "Does he beat you up?"

"No, I'm up by 6:30 and sometimes he doesn't get up until after I've left for work."

"WHY DO YOU WANT A DIVORCE?"

"We just can't seem to communicate."
***
Will I Live to see 80?
Will I Live to see 80?

Here's something to think about.

I recently picked a new primary care doctor. After two visits and exhaustive Lab tests, He 
said I was doing fairly well for my age. 

A little concerned about that comment, I couldn't resist asking him, 'Do you think 
I'll live to be 80?'

He asked, 'Do you smoke tobacco, or drink beer, wine or hard liquor?'
'Oh no,' I replied. 'I'm not doing drugs, either!'

Then He asked, 'Do you eat rib-eye steaks and barbecued ribs?'
'I said, 'Not much... My former doctor said that all red meat is very unhealthy!'

'Do you spend a lot of time in the sun, like playing golf, boating, sailing, hiking, or bicycling?'
'No, I don't,' I said.

He asked, 'Do you gamble, drive motor-cycles, drive fast cars, or have a lot of sex?'
'No,' I said...

He looked at me and said,.. 'Then, why do you even give a shit?'
***
Chinese magican
Did you hear about the Chinese Magican who did magic with Chocolate?

I heard he had loads of Twix up his sleeve. 
***
What's the difference between a pickpocket and a peeping tom? (slightly NSFW)
A pickpocket snatches watches.
***
A son and his Dad have an intense argument and the son storms off, furious.
Before he gets out of earshot of his father, he yells "Jim Morrison was a terrible singer and an uninspired artist who never did anything worthwhile".

His father cannot believe this insolence, and screams at the top of his lungs "As long as you live in this house, you will never, EVER SLAM THE DOORS"
***
A woman, her 7 years old and a Taxi driver.
A woman and her 7 years old son were inside a Taxi. It was raining and all the twilight girls were standing by the roadside.

The Boy asked; "Mummy, what are all those women doing?."

His Mother replied; "They are waiting for their husbands to come back from work."

The Taxi driver turned around and said; "Why don't you tell him the truth?. Little boy, they are prostitutes, they sleep with men for money."

The Boy's eyes got wide and asked; "Mummy is that true?"

His mother, glaring hard at the driver replied; "Yes.!!"

After a few minutes, the boy asked; "Mummy, what happens to the babies those women have?."

She replied; "Most of them become Taxi drivers.
***
Two old men sit on a bench (NSFW)
Two old men sit on a bench chatting about their relationships. The first man moans how his wife never wants sex and has been turning him down for years. 

He eventually turns to the other man and sighs,

"Well, anyway, how's that new wife of yours?"

The second man breathes deeply and looks down at the ground,

"Terrible", he replies, "just terrible"

"Oh, how so?" 

The second man turns and looks almost tearful in his confession.

"Well she's 22, blonde, huge tits and always wanting sex! And I mean it's just constant. Suck and fuck and suck and fuck and suck and fuck..."

The second man becomes quiet as the first man stares in disbelief, finally the first man has to open his mouth.

"Well that sounds amazing! What's so terrible about that!"

The second man looks to the sky wistfully...

"I can't remember where I live..."







***
Catholic Joke
Four Catholic men and a Catholic woman were having coffee.

The first Catholic man tells his friends, "My son is a priest, when he walks into a room, everyone calls him 'Father'."

The second Catholic man chirps, "My son is a Bishop. When he walks into a room people call him 'Your Grace'."

The third Catholic gent says, "My son is a Cardinal.. When he enters a room everyone says 'Your Eminence'."

The fourth Catholic man then says, "My son is the Pope. When he walks into a room people call him 'Your Holiness'."

Since the lone Catholic woman was sipping her coffee in silence, the four men give her a subtle, "Well....?"

She proudly replies, "I have a daughter, slim, tall, 38D breast, 24" waist and 34" hips. When she walks into a room, people say, "Oh My God."

***
Since we're on a vacuum kick...
A little old lady answered a knock on the door one day, only to be confronted by a well-dressed young man carrying a vacuum cleaner.

"Good morning," said the young man. "If I could take a couple minutes of your time, I would like to demonstrate the very latest in high-powered vacuum cleaners."

"Fuck off!" said the old lady. "I haven't got any money" and she tried to close the door. Quick as a flash, the young man wedged his foot in the door and pushed it wide open.

"Don't be too hasty!" he said. "Not until you have at least seen my demonstration." And with that, he emptied a bucket of horse shit all over her hallway carpet. "If this vacuum cleaner does not remove all traces of this horse shit from your carpet, Madam, I will personally eat the remainder."

"Well," she said, "I hope you've got a fucking good appetite, because the electricity was cut off this morning."
***
The dirty professor
The old professor started each lecture with a dirty joke. After a real objectionable example of that one day, the female students got together and decided that next time, when this happens again, they will all walk out in unison.  

The professor got wind of this plot. Next morning, after he entered the lecture hall, he said: "Good morning! Have you heard about the shortage of prostitutes in India?"  

Now all the female students stood up and headed toward the exit.  

The professor continued: "Oh, ladies, please wait, the boat to India doesn't leave until tomorrow!"
***
More money is spent on boob jobs and Viagra than on Alzheimer's research!
More money is spent on boob jobs and Viagra than on Alzheimer's research! By 2040 the elderly will have perky tits, stiff cocks and no fucking idea why!
***
A lady walks into a pet store...
She sees a beautiful parrot with a sign on its cage: $10 OBO The lady asks the pet shop owner, "Why so cheap?" The owner says "This bird used to live in a brothel, so he says a lot of inappropriate things." The lady can't pass up the deal and decides to get the bird anyway. She gets the bird home and the first thing the bird says is "Finally cleaned up this dump, and the new madam isn't bad looking." The lady finds it amusing. Her two teen daughters get home and the bird says "New whores in the house, business will be booming tonight." The girls are shocked but laugh it off. A few hours later the woman's husband gets home and the bird says "Hey Jim."
***
A tourist is sitting in a bar in Ireland...
Suddenly, an elderly man walks in, and the entire bar erupts in laughter.  He goes and sits at the bar.

The young tourist slides over to him and asks, "Why were they all laughing at you?"

The old man looks at him, and says "Do you see this bar?"

"Yes, it's quite beautiful"

"Aye, I built this bar, and every bar in this town.  But do they call me Seamus the Bar-builder?  No.

"How about that fence?  Do you like that fence?"

"Of course" said the tourist.

"Aye, I built that fence, and it runs all through town.  But do they call me Seamus the Fence-builder?  No.

"But you fuck one goat..."
***
A 65 year old woman had a heart attack and was taken to the hospital.

While on the operating table she had a near death experience. Seeing God, she asked "Is my time up?" God said, "No, you have another 33 years, 2 months and 8 days to live."
Upon recovery, the woman decided to stay in the hospital and have a face-lift, liposuction, breast implants and a tummy tuck.
She even had someone come in and change her hair color and brighten her teeth! Since she had so much more time to live, she figured she might as well make the most of it.
After her last operation, she was released from the hospital. While crossing the street on her way home, she was killed by an ambulance.
Arriving in front of God, she demanded, "I thought you said I had
Another 33 years? Why didn't you pull me out of the path of the ambulance?"
God replied, "I didn't recognize you!"
***
A man wakes up with a huge hangover after getting blackout drunk the night before
painfully opens his eyes, looks around - "phew! At least I'm home". On the nightstand he sees a glass of water, an aspirin and a note saying "Honey, breakfast is ready, I love you with all my heart - xoxo, your wife".

Not understanding a thing, he walks to the kitchen and realizes that the house is sparkling clean. He sees his son in the living room and asks him about what had happened the night before. The son says:

— Well, you came home as usual, blackout drunk, threw up in the corridor, peed all over the bathroom, gave mom a black eye and went to bed. Then, when she started to pull off your pants, you screamed:

 "Get away from me, bitch, I'm married!"
***
Lawyer and the devil
So a young lawyer is sitting in his office when the devil appears in front of him.

"I've got an offer for you" the devil explains 

"Go on...." Says the young lawyer

"Well from here out your practice will grow 10 fold, your partners will all respect you, your clients will all love you, you'll have a golden tongue with any jury, you'll get all the vacation days you could ever want, and you'll live to be 100" replies the devil..."all I ask is that you wife's soul, your children's souls, and your children's children's souls rot in hell for eternity"

The lawyer leans back in his chair and inquisitively asks, "what's the catch?"
***
Do you know how fast you were going?
Heisenberg, Schrodinger, and Ohm are in a car and they get pulled over.  Heisenberg is driving and the cop asks him "Do you know how fast you were going?"

"No, but I know exactly where I am"  Heisenberg replies.

The cop says "You were doing 55 in a 35."  Heisenberg throws up his hands and shouts "Great! Now I'm lost!"

The cop thinks this is suspicious and orders him to pop open the trunk.  He checks it out and says "Do you know you have a dead cat back here?"

"We do now, asshole!" Shouts Schrodinger.

The cop moves to arrest them.  Ohm resists.
***
A sad, depressed guy is walking along the beach...
Suddenly he hears a booming voice from above, and it yells, "**DIG**!"

Confused, the man stops and he hears the voice again, this time louder. "**DIG**!"

So he immediately falls to his knees and starts digging in the sand. Suddenly he hits something solid. A buried chest. "**OPEN**!" Yells the booming voice. 

So the man opens the chest to find hundreds of thousands of dollars inside. "**CASINO**!" Booms the voice. 

So the man runs off the beach, flags down a cab and tells the driver to head to the nearest casino. After 20 minutes the cab arrives. "**ENTER**!" Booms the voice. 

The man enters the casino. "**ROULETTE**!"

So the man heads straight to the roulette table and awaits further instruction. "**RED 21**!"

The man then puts the entire contents of the chest on red 21. The croupier spins the wheel and the result is black 4. The booming voice yells "**FUCK**!"
***
Irish fisherman
It was raining hard and a big puddle had formed in front of an Irish pub.
 
An old man stood beside the puddle holding a stick with a string on the end and jiggled it up and down in the water.
A curious gentleman asked what he was doing.
 
'Fishing,' replied the old man.
 
'Poor old fool' thought the gentleman, so he invited the old man to have a drink in the pub.
 
Feeling he should start some conversation while they were sipping their whisky, the gentleman asked,
‘And how many have you caught?'
 
'You're the eighth.'

***
A vacationing penguin is driving through Arizona...
...and sees that the car's oil-pressure light is on.He gets out to look and sees oil dripping out of the motor. He drives to the nearest town and stops at the first gas station.

After dropping the car off, the penguin goes for a walk around town. He sees an ice cream shop, and being a penguin in Arizona, decides that something cold would really hit the spot. He gets a big dish of vanilla ice cream and sits down to eat. Having no hands, he makes a real mess trying to eat with his little flippers. After finishing his ice cream, he goes back to the gas station and asks the mechanic if he's found the problem.

The mechanic looks up from the engine and says, "It looks like you've blown a seal."

"No, no," the penguin replies, wiping his mouth, "it's just ice cream."
***
Humorists of Reddit! I challenge your joke inventing skills! First comment gives the punch line; the reply is the rest of the joke!
edit: Thanks guys for some hilarious jokes! Keep 'em coming. I wanted to let you know that I've messaged the mods about this thread. Maybe it could be a weekly thread? Who knows. 
***
So the American people's choices for President of the United States will most likely be Donald Trump or Hilary Clinton.
That's it. That's the joke. There is no punchline.
***
Two whales were swimming together in the Pacific Ocean...
When they come across a whaling vessel. One whale looks to the other and says "we should swim under it and blow our air out, and hopefully the boat will capsize!"  The second whale agrees, thinking that every whaler deserves a fate like that, so they swim under the boat, and exhale as hard as they can. The boat tips over and all the men on board are stranded, floating I the water. The first whale then says "we should eat these sailors so they don't ever even have the chance to hunt another one of us again!"  The second whale, with a look of disgust on her face, replies "Look. I went ahead with the blowjob, but there is no WAY you're going to get me to eat the seamen!"
***
A priest was driving A nun to church...
But suddenly the priest stops and tells the nun
"Im sorry sister but i have been dreaming of doing this"
he proceeds to stop driving and he put his hands under her robes and stroking  her legs.
The nun replies with
"Father, remember Psalm 143:24"
The Priest responds with
"Im sorry sister but the flesh is weak"
The Father sees the cross in their car and is reminded that he should not be doing this
He says
"Im sorry sister, i have given to temptation"
The nun sighs and they continue driving.

When they reach the church, out of curiosity the priest finds a bible and checks Psalm 143:24
it says.
"Go further up and you will find what you seek"
***
There is no language wherein a double positive can form a negative
A linguistics professor was lecturing to his English class one day. “In English,” he said, “a double negative forms a positive. In some languages, though, such as Russian, a double negative is still a negative. However, there is no language wherein a double positive can form a negative.”

A voice from the back of the room piped up, “Yeah, right.”
***
Tom Jones Syndrome
A woman goes to a doctor's office to get results back from a test she took a few weeks ago. The doctor sits her down and tells her "You have TJS, Tom Jones Syndrome." The woman, scared, asks "Is it rare?" and the doctor replies "It's not unusual"
***
Right and Wrong
Mrs Cameron, a primary teacher, was teaching her class about the difference between right and wrong.

"All right children, let's take an example," Mrs Cameron said. "If I were to get into a man's pocket and take his wallet with all his money, what would I be?"

Little Tony raises his hand, and with a confident smile says, "You'd be his wife."
***
The Captain's Parrot
** A friend of mine just sent me this one


A magician was working on a cruise ship.

Since the audience was different each week, the magician did the same tricks over and over again.
There was only one problem: The captain's parrot saw the shows each week and began to understand how the Magician did every trick.

Once he understood, he started shouting in the middle of the show, "Look, it's not the same hat!" or, "Look, he's hiding the flowers under the table!" Or "Hey, why are all the cards the ace of spades?"

The magician was furious but couldn't do anything. It was, after all, the Captain's' parrot.

Then one stormy night on the Pacific, the ship unfortunately sank.

The magician luckily found himself on a piece of wood floating in the middle of the sea, as fate would have it ... With the parrot.

They stared at each other with hatred, but did not utter a word.

This went on for a day... And then 2 days. And then 3 days. Finally on the 4th day, the parrot could not hold back any longer and said...

"OK, I give up. Where's the fucking ship?
***
A man enters a pet shop...
...and wants to buy a polar bear. The shop assistant takes the man to the bear's cage and says: "The polar bear is absolutely tamed, but whatever you do, don't touch his nose."
The man goes home with his new pet and everything is OK. Until the man can't no longer withstand: "I have to try what happens, when I touch his nose!" So he touches the nose and the polar bear leaps towards him and chases the man throughout the house.
Finally the man runs out of breath and the polar bear catches him. With his paw the bear taps the man's shoulder and says: "You are it!"
***
During the crusades a man entrusts his friend with the key to his daughter's chastity belt when he is away...
The man entrusted with the key replies with 'Ah yes sir you can count on me'

The father rides onwards and 30 minutes on into his journey his friend speeds to his company on horseback, and shouts at him 'Sir! You left the wrong key!'
***
An Italian and a Greek get in a fight over sex
Greek: the Greeks invented sex centuries before the Italians!

Italians: maybe so but we improved on it  by introducing it to women!
***
Right and Wrong
Mrs Cameron, a primary teacher, was teaching her class about the difference between right and wrong.

"All right children, let's take an example," Mrs Cameron said. "If I were to get into a man's pocket and take his wallet with all his money, what would I be?"

Little Tony raises his hand, and with a confident smile says, "You'd be his wife."

Classic, Short English Jokes
***
After a plane crash, only one woman and two men survived and are lost on a virgin island...
...so they start organizing their new lives, because they have no hope of ever seeing help. While one of them is in charge of hunting and picking fruits, the others build a house, etc.

One day however, the woman decides to convoke both men and expose her frustration:

"It's been so long since any of us had sex, and I think it's driving us crazy" *both men nod* "and, given the circumstances, I feel like we could all use some good sex. So here's the plan: I stay with you *pointing at the first man* for five days, then you *pointing at the second* the next five. And repeat."

Everyone seems satisfied with this turn of events, and life happily continues on the island. The survivors even built a second house, so that each man would have his and not interfere while the other was "busy" in the other house.

However, one day, as worse came to worst, the woman suddenly died of a tropical illness.

Both men then meet, and, in a very sad mood, look at each other: "Hey man, it's gonna be tough, but I really can't live without the sex anymore." "Yeah, we need to find something" ... "So, you for five days, me for the next five, repeat?..." *the second one sadly nods*

And so, life continued, surely, far less fun than before.

Many weeks after this discussion however, both men once again discuss: "Man, I'm sorry, but I can't take it anymore, we need to do something!" "I was about to propose the same thing..."

"Where should we bury her?"
***
A chicken farmer went to a local bar.... Sat next to a woman and ordered a glass of champagne..
The woman perks up and says, 'How about that? I just ordered a glass of champagne, too!'

'What a coincidence' the farmer says. 'This is a special day for me.... I am celebrating'

'This is a special day for me too, I am also celebrating!' says the woman.

'What a coincidence!' says the farmer! As they clinked glasses the man asked, 'What are you celebrating?'

'My husband and I have been trying to have a child and today my gynecologist told me that I am pregnant!'

'What a coincidence,' says the man. 'I'm a chicken farmer and for years all of my hens were infertile, but today they are all laying fertilized eggs.'

'That's great!' says the woman. 'How did your chickens become fertile?'

'I used a different cock,' he replied.

The woman smiled and said, 'What a coincidence.'
***
An 86-year-old man went to his doctor for his quarterly check-up...
The doctor asked the man how he was feeling, and the 86-year-old said, "things are great, and I've never felt better! I now have a 20-year-old bride who is pregnant with my child. What do you think about that, doc?"

The doctor considered the question for a minute, and then began to tell a story.

"I have an older friend, much like you, who is an avid hunter and never misses a season. One day he was setting off to go hunting. In a bit of a hurry, he accidentally picked up his walking cane instead of his gun."

"As he neared a lake, he came across a very large male beaver sitting at the water's edge. He realized he left his gun at home, and so, he couldn't shoot the magnificent creature. Out of habit he raised his cane, aimed it at the animal as if it was his favorite hunting rifle, and yelled 'bang bang'. Miraculously, two shots rang out and the beaver fell dead."

"Now, what do you think of that?" asked the doctor.

The 86-year-old replied, "logic would strongly suggest that somebody else pumped a few rounds into that beaver."

The doctor replied, "my point exactly."
***
The Lion and the Monkey
A lion and lioness are sitting in their den, when a monkey climbs up a nearby tree and starts insulting the mighty lion.

The lioness starts to get angry and says, "King of the jungle, how dare you allow this puny monkey to insult you? You must punish him."

"You are right, but you know what? I am king of the jungle and I must not lower myself to his level. Let's ignore it."

The lioness, astonished, sat in silence. Yet the monkey kept on. After sometime, the lioness looses her patience.

"I cannot allow this any longer. I'm going to teach that monkey a lesson."

So the lioness chases after the monkey. After a long chase she finds herself out of the jungle and at a construction site. She sees the monkey going through a narrow pipe and leaps in after him. The pipe apparently was not large enough, and the lioness gets stuck.

Seeing that the lioness is stuck, the monkey walks around behind her.

"Who's a bad girl? Who's a bad girl?!!" he yells as he screws her from behind, over and over again. The monkey has his way and then finally leaves with a big smile on his face.

After an hour long struggle, the lioness finally frees herself from the pipe. Injured, and completely embarrassed, she returns home to the jungle and to her king.

"So how did the hunt go?" the lion curiously asked.

The lioness couldn't even look at him.

"Aaahhh, he took you to the construction site didn't he?"

***
Theory vs reality
   A boy comes home with the assignment of learning theory vs reality. So he asks his dad for help. "Ok son, ask your sister if she'd sleep with Justin Bieber for a million bucks." Kid comes back and says "Yeah dad she would."
   "Ok now ask your mom if she'd sleep with Brad Pitt for a million bucks." Kid ask his mom. "Mom said she sure would sleep with Brad Pitt for a million bucks." 
Dad says "Now in THEORY we have two million dollars, in REALITY..... we live with a couple of whores."
***
A United States Marine was deployed to Afghanistan.
While he was there he received a "Dear John" letter from his girlfriend. In the letter she explained that she had slept with two guys while he had been gone and she wanted to break up with him.

To add injury to the insult, she said she wanted back the picture of herself that she had given him.

So the Marine did what any squared-away Marine would do. He went around to his buddies and collected all the unwanted photos of women he could find.

In all, he got more than 25 pictures of various women (some with clothes and some without).

He then mailed them to his now-former girlfriend with the following note:

"I don't remember which one you are. Please remove your picture and send the rest back." 
***
An elderly couple see a doctor about how to deal with their short term memory loss.
The doctor says to help them remember certain things they should write it down on a piece of paper. One night the couple is watching TV, when the husband starts walking to the kitchen. His wife asks "Can you bring me some strawberries?"

"Sure."

"Aren't you going to write it down so you don't forget?"

"No no. It's fine."

"Well I also want some whip cream. You should write it down so you'll remember."

"Don't worry. I've got it."

"I also want some chocolate syrup on top. You *really* should write it down, dear."

"I got it. Strawberries, whip cream, and chocolate syrup."

The wife sighs as her husband disappears into the kitchen.


After 15 minutes the husband finally comes back carrying a plate of eggs, bacon, and sausage. The wife looks up at him and asks "Where's my toast?"
***
A man proposes to his girlfriend. She has one condition.
A man proposes to his girlfriend of one year. She says yes, but has one condition. "I will marry you but I want to get married in Minnesota," the woman says. "There, you can meet my family and we can have a beautiful ceremony. Only then can we consummate the marriage."  The woman, who is a virgin, says she has no experience with sex and wants her first time to be a memorable one. The man, because she is young and beautiful, obliges, and suggests they leave for Minnesota as soon as possible.

The next day, they got on a bus from New York. The only other passengers were members of a high school hockey team. 

After 100 miles on the road, the bus breaks down and everyone has to get off the bus while it is repaired. While the man and woman wait, the man suggests the two go off into the woods and have a little fun since the bus won't leave for another hour. She is flattered, but says: "I think we should wait," and so they get back on the bus. 

After another hundred miles, the bus breaks down again. Everyone gets off the bus and waits for it to be repaired. Again, the man asks his girlfriend to sneak off while they wait. "How about now?" he asks. "This journey is taking forever and I cannot wait any longer!" Flattered, she insists they wait until they arrive in Minnesota. Everyone soon gets back on the bus. 

For a third time, the bus breaks down. The man figures it is not worth bothering his girlfriend a third time. "She might become annoyed and not want to marry me," he thinks. Suddenly, she takes his hand, brings him into the woods and she experiences her first time. 

As they are walking back to the bus, the man cannot help but say: "That was wonderful. You are a skillful lover! But what made you change your mind about having your first time after the wedding?"

The women looks at him and says: "Well, the hockey team said 'By the time we get to Minnesota, the fucking season would be over.'"
***
A Canadian walks into a cafe, and the barista asks, "Would you like a latte?"
And the Canadian responds to him "Nah, just a bit, eh."
***
A woman was sure that her husband was cheating on her...
and having an affair with the maid. So she laid down a trap.

One evening she suddenly sent the maid home for the weekend & didn't tell the husband.

That night when they went to bed, the husband gave the old story: Excuse me my dear, my stomach aches, & went to the bathroom.

The wife promptly went into the maid's bed. She switched the lights off. When he came in silently, he wasted no time or words but quickly got on top of her...

When he finished & was still panting, the wife said: You didn't expect to find me in this bed, did you? And then she switched on the light...

No madam, said the gardener…
***
Mickey Mouse and Minnie Mouse were in divorce court
The judge said to Mickey, "You say here that your wife is crazy."

Mickey replied, "I didn't say she was crazy, I said she's fucking Goofy."
***
A Baptist preacher sits next to a cowboy on a flight...
After the plane took off, the cowboy asked for a whiskey and soda, which was brought and placed before him.

The flight attendant then asked the preacher if he would like a drink.

Appalled, the preacher replied, "I'd rather be tied up and taken advantage of by women of ill-repute, than let liquor touch my lips."

The cowboy then handed his drink back to the attendant and said, "Me too, I didn't know we had a choice."

***
Two hillbillies walk into a restaurant..
While having a bite to eat, they talk about their moonshine operation.
Suddenly, a woman at a nearby table, who is eating a sandwich, begins to cough. 
After a minute or so, it becomes apparent that she is in real distress. One of the hillbillies looks at her and says, Kin ya swallar?' 
The woman shakes her head no. Then he asks, 'Kin ya breathe?'
The woman begins to turn blue, and shakes her head no. 
The hillbilly walks over to the woman, lifts up her dress, yanks down her drawers, and quickly gives her right butt cheek a lick with his tongue.
The woman is so shocked that she has a violent spasm, and the obstruction flies out of her mouth.As she begins to breathe again, the Hillbilly walks slowly back to his table. His partner says, 'Ya know, I'd heerd of that there 'Hind Lick Maneuver' but I ain't niver seed nobody do it!'
***
God is travelling around the world to spread his religon
He gets to India and asks the public, 'Will you take my commandments to be yours?' The public says no and decides to try elsewhere.

He gets to China and asks, 'Will you follow my commandments?' And the public replies no.

He gets to Israel and asks, 'Will you take my commandments?' The crowd begins to look at each other questioningly and a single man steps forward.

'How much do they cost?'

God replies, 'They're free.'

The crowd shouts back, 'WE'LL TAKE TEN!'
***
Just heard Dad tell this joke to Mum.
Just heard Dad telling this joke to Mum...

A 5 year old and a 3 year old are upstairs in their bedroom

'You know what?' says the 5 year old, 'I think it's about time we started swearing.'

The 3 year old nods his head in approval, so the 5 year old says, 

'When we go downstairs for breakfast I'm gonna swear first, then you 
swear after me, ok?'

'Ok' the 3 year old, agrees with enthusiasm. 

The mother walks into the kitchen and asks the 5 year old what he wants for breakfast. 

'Shit mum, I don't know, I suppose I'll have some Fruit Loops '

**WHACK**...**she spanks him**

He flew out of his chair, tumbled across the kitchen floor, got up, and ran upstairs crying his eyes out. 

She looked at the 3 year old and asked with a stern voice, 'And what do YOU want for breakfast, young man?' 

'I don't know mum, but it won't be fucking Fruit Loops'

***
A little boy goes to the circus for the first time with his mom and dad...
His dad gets up and goes for a piss. While he's gone, one of the elephants rises up and rests his feet on a giant red ball. The little boy sees the elephant's genitals flop down and is shocked.

"Mommy! What's that thing under the elephant, that long hanging thing?"

Embarrassed, the mother says, "Oh, that's nothing. Don't worry about that."

Dad comes back and the mom leaves to go to the bathroom. The elephant rises up on the ball again and his member flops down for all to see.

"Dad, what's that big long thing under the elephant's tummy?" the boy asks, pointing.

The dad decides to be straight with him. "That's the elephant's penis, my boy."

"Really? When I asked mom about it, she said it was 'nothing'."

The dad grins. "Son, I've spoiled that woman."
***
One of my favourite jokes
My wife told me that she wanted to give me a deepthroat blowjob today.

"Really!" I exclaimed.

"No," She said, "April Foogargagggrraggggle."

That'll teach her to try and be funny...

***
My mate picks up women by pretending to be gay
He says it lures them into a false sense of security and when their guard drops he sleeps with them. 

I thought that it couldn't reallly hurt my chances just to try. 

3 years later, Mark and I now own a house together, 2 turtles, 3 fish and we are scheduled to be married next week. Still no sign of getting any pussy though. 

Maybe this strategy isn't for me...
***
A guy walks into a bar with a frog...
...and sits down to order a drink, setting his frog (in its cage) on the bar. A few seats away from him sits a beautiful, young woman. They're the only two at the bar, so after awhile, with curiosity eating away at her, she asks,

"So what's with the frog?"

The guy responds, "Well, he's no ordinary frog. He can do this special trick."

The girl, now interested, asks, "What's the trick?"

To which the guy responds, "Ah- well... It's kind of a taboo sort of thing. It would make you uncomfortable."

But, the girl insists, until finally the guy gives in and tells her what the trick is. "My frog, he, well, he eats pussy."

The girl is shocked, but also somewhat excited, so she asks, "Can I try it?"

The guy says, "Okay, sure. I've got a few hours to kill. I have a hotel room across the street, here's the key, just take him over there and let him do his thing."

So the girl takes the frog and heads over to the hotel. After a little while, the phone at the bar rings, and the bartender hands it to the guy. The girl is on the other end. 

"Hey, so, I'm sitting up here, spread-eagled, naked on the bed, and the frog is just staring at me, not doing anything. What gives?"

The guy lets out a sigh and says, "Okay, hang on,  I know what to do. I'll be right over." And sure enough, there was the girl, naked on the bed, the frog just staring at her. So the guy walks up to the frog, shakes his fist at it and says,

"I'm only gonna show you how to do this *one more time*!"
***
A guy goes to the supermarket and notices an attractive woman waving at him...
She says hello and he’s rather taken aback because he can’t place where he knows her from. 

So he says, "Do you know me?" 

To which she replies, "I think you’re the father of one of my kids." 

Now his mind travels back to the only time he has ever been unfaithful to his wife and says, "My God, are you the stripper from my bachelor party that I made love to on the pool table with all my buddies watching while your partner whipped my butt with wet celery?" 

She looks into his eyes and says calmly, "No, I’m your son’s teacher."
***
I was in sex education class ..
...when the teacher pointed at the diagram and asked, "What is this called?"

I put my hand up and answered, "That's a pussy, Miss Stevens."

She rolled her eyes, and replied, "Give me a medical term, please."

"Oh, sorry," I replied. "That's a pussy, Doctor Stevens."
***
A Russian is travelling to Poland...
and he is stopped to be checked by an officer.

"Name?" the officer asked.

"Vlad Dobrynin," the man answered.

"Nationality?"

"Russian."

"Occupation?"

"No, no, just visiting."
***
Jehovah's Witness
Sunday morning the weather was too bad to play golf. I was wondering around with nothing to do when i heard the door bell ring. I opened it to see a well dressed man standing there who said, "I'm a Jehovah's Witness, do you have a moment for Jesus Christ?"

With nothing else going on I said, "Come in and sit down."

We sat down, I offered him a cup of coffee and asked, "What would you like to talk about?"

The young man replied, "Beats the shit out of me, I've never gotten this far."
***
A dying grandma tells her grandchild....
A dying grandma tells her grandchild, "I want to leave you my farm. That includes the barn, livestock, the harvest, the tractor, and other equipment, the farmhouse and $24,548,750.45 in cash." The grandchild, absolutely floored and about to become rich says, "Oh grandma, you are SO generous! I didn't even know you had a farm. Where is it?" With her last breath, Grandma whispered, "Facebook..." 


***
Donald Trump has been kidnapped by terrorists!
I heard it on the radio while I was driving down the freeway on my way to work. But then I was stuck in traffic. 

Some guys came up to my car, knocked on my window and said "Sir, as you must have heard, Donald Trump has been kidnapped by terrorists! They have demanded a 50 Billion dollar ransom, or else they will douse him in gasoline and burn him alive! We are going car to car asking for a contribution."

"Oh Dear!" I exclaimed. "What is the average contribution people are giving to this great and noble cause?"

"About a gallon, sir"
***
A kindergarten student told his teacher he'd found a cat...
A kindergarten student told his teacher he'd found a cat, but it was dead. "How do you know that the cat was dead?" she asked her student. "Because I pissed in its ear and it didn't move," answered the child innocently. "You did WHAT?!?!?!" the teacher yelled in shock. "You know," explained the boy, "I leaned over and went 'Pssst!' and it didn't move."

***
I was cleaning little Suzie's room when I found whips, handcuffs and chains under her bed, along with a very erotic porn magazine! What ever are we going to do?
One day a man came home from work to find his wife crying hysterically in the kitchen. "What's wrong, dearest?" asked the confused husband. "Oh darling," sobbed the wife, "I was cleaning little Suzie's room when I found whips, handcuffs and chains under her bed, along with a very erotic porn magazine! What ever are we going to do?" "Well," replied the man, "I guess a spanking is out of the question?"
***
A lawyer opens his car door on the side of the road
as a car flies past and takes off his door. Stunned, he quickly looks around and spots a police officer nearby. "Officer, you saw that guy just hit my brand new Porsche, you have to do something!" The officer can't believe what he is seeing and shakily replies, "Sir, how can you lawyers be so materialistic? Do you not realize that your entire left arm is also missing?" The lawyer quickly looks at his left arm and yells, "No, my Rolex!"
***
A man in his backyard...
After a stressful day, one man comes home and sits in his backyard, drinking a beer.

As he's getting up to get a snack, he stops and asks, "Jesus, what is the meaning of life?"

To which Jesus replies,"You slave in the sun to support the ones you love. You make money so you can buy things for your family to keep them happy."

The man asks,"Jesus, why is life so hard?"

To which Jesus replies,"That, no one may ever know. You have to overcome many obstacles to be successful."

The man asks again,"How was the universe created?"

Jesus replies,"I'm sorry, señor, but can you stop asking questions? I'm trying to mow your lawn."

EDIT: Thanks for getting me onto the front page!
***
I went into a Muslim bookstore the other day.
The owner said can I help you? I said I'm looking for the new Donald Trump book about the Muslims and the illegal Mexicans. He said fuck you, get the hell out of here and never come back. I said, that's the one, do you have it in paperback?
***
An ugly man walks into a bar and a beautiful woman approaches him...
... the woman asks the man, "How would you like to get out of here?" and the man is stunned. He never thought a woman like her would ever approach him so he agrees. They both get into his car and drive really far. He stops at a cliff with the view of the whole city. Within seconds they start taking off their clothes. After 15 minutes of vigorous sex they finally finish. They both put their clothes on and they both just sit there awkwardly. The woman speaks up and says "I'm a prostitute and its going to be 100 dollars for my service." The man is stunned and saddened that she didn't really like him. He gives her the money and they both sit there awkwardly. The woman tells him that she is ready to leave and the man replies "I'm a taxi driver and its going to be 150 dollars for the ride here and back."
***
Terrifying Story
A guy in a taxi wanted to speak to the driver so he leaned forward and tapped him on the shoulder. The driver screamed, jumped up in the air and yanked the wheel over. The car mounted the curb, demolished a lamppost and came to a stop inches from a shop window. The startled passenger said "I didn't mean to frighten you, just wanted to ask you something." Taxi driver says "Not your fault Sir. It's my first day as a cab driver, I've been driving a hearse for the past 25 years".
***
A black hole and a nebula go out to lunch...
A black hole and a nebula are at a restaurant. The nebula orders a ginormous amount of food and the black hole only orders a drink and a small appetizer. 
The nebula says the the black hole, "Are you sure you don't want more?" 
The black hole replies, "Nah, I eat light" 
***
Text from his neighbor
   I am so sorry Bob. I've been riddled with guilt and I have to confess. I have been tapping your wife, day and night when you're not around. In fact, more than you. I do not get any at home, but that's no excuse. I can no longer live with the guilt and I hope you will accept my sincerest apology with my promise that it won't happen again.

   The man, anguished and betrayed, went into his bedroom, grabbed
his gun, and without a word, shot his wife and killed her. 

A few moments later, a second text came in: Damn autocorrect! I meant "wifi", not "wife"
***
A couple of women were playing golf one sunny Saturday morning...
The first of the twosome teed off and watched in horror as her ball headed directly toward a pair of men playing the next hole.

Indeed, the ball hit one of the men, and he immediately clasped his hands together at his crotch, fell to the ground and proceeded to roll around in evident agony. 

The woman rushed down to the man and immediately began to apologize.
 
"Please allow me to help," she said. "I'm a physical therapist and I know I could relieve your pain if you'd allow."
 
"Er --", the man started to say. 

"No, I insist," she replied.
 
"But --" 

"I insist," she repeated, and despite his objections, she gently moved his hands to the side and loosened his pants. 

Then she put her hands inside and began to massage him. 

After a moment she asked him, "How does that feel?" 

To which he replied, "Well, it feels great, but my thumb still hurts like hell."
***
A couple struggles to have sex due to many kids.
A couple married for 10 years have had a great number of children.They of course were very happy with them but each time they've tried to have sex, invariably someone would interrupt.So one evening they devised a plan.At dinner when the whole family would sit down to eat, they will warn the kids not to get off the table, the mother will excuse herself for not feeling well and the father would then go over to 'check' her.

So they did, the family sat down and the father says to them "Kids, whoever gets off the table before finishing up dinner, shall be punished." They began to eat and the mother after complaining of a headache, stands and goes to the bedroom.After a minute the father excuses hismself to check on Mom, and does the same.At one point one of the kids gets curious and heads over to investigate.When he approaches the bedroom he's able to see mom and dad having sex through the keyhole.He dashes right back to the dining room and exclaims panically:

"Guys, do not get off the table, whoever does, Dad is f*cking in the ass! "
***
An eccentric billionaire throws a lavish party...
Please bear with me as I heard/read this one years ago so I might not recall the details correctly:

An eccentric billionaire is throwing a lavish party with guests from all over the world. As the party is well under way he asks his guests to walk over to his Olympic sized  swimming pool where he had it filled with all kinds of dangerous creatures, sharks, piranhas, crocodiles, you name it it is there! So he tells his guests "I will give anything to the person who is brave enough to jump in the pool and swim across!" The place falls silent as the guests only whisper amongst themselves in bewilderment. "Anything that person can dream of will be his!" the billionaire tells the guests again. Suddenly a large splash is heard and a guy is seen struggling to swim through, and miraculously he makes it across! The room erupts in cheers and the billionaire approaches the man who swam across, and tells him "I am a man of my word, and since you made it across what do you desire? Money, mansions, my daughters hand in marriage?" The man still visibly shaken and struggling to catch his breath replies "I just want to know the name of the son of a bitch who pushed me in the pool!"
***
Personally, I don't believe in "bros before hoes" or "hoes before bros"
There needs to be a balance. A homie-hoe-stasis if you will.
***
Selling Coke.
The disappointed salesman of Coke returns from his Middle East assignment. A friend asked, "Why weren't you successful with the Arabs?"

The salesman explained, "When I got posted in the Middle East, I was very confident that I will make a good sales pitch as Cola is virtually unknown there. But, I had a problem I didn't know to speak Arabic.

So, I planned to convey the message through 3 posters. The first poster is a man crawling through the hot desert sand... totally exhausted and panting. Second, the man is drinking our Cola and Third, our man is now totally refreshed. Then these posters were pasted all over the place".

"That should have worked", said the friend."

He replied, "Well, I didn't know Arabic, neither did I realize that Arabs read from right to left..."
***
A Proctologist is giving an exam...
A Proctologist is giving an exam, and as he is nearing the end of the patient's visit, he goes to write a prescription. He reaches into his pocket and pulls out, to his surprise, a rectal thermometer. 
He looks at it and, exclaims, "Damn it! Some asshole has my pen!"
***
A woman goes to her Gynecologist. "What seems to be the problem?" asked the doctor.
Woman: "Something is terribly wrong. I keep finding postage stamps from
Costa Rica in my Vagina." The Doctor had a look, chuckled and said, "Those Aren't postage stamps my dear, they're the stickers off the bananas."
***
How the world works...
A small boy asks his Dad, "Daddy, what is politics?" Dad says, "Well son, let me try to explain it this way: I'm the breadwinner of the family, so let's call me Capitalism. Your mom, she's the administrator of the money, so we'll call her the Government. We're here to take care of your needs, so we'll call you the People. The nanny, we'll consider her the Working Class. And your baby brother, we'll call him the Future. Now, think about that and see if that makes sense." So the little boy goes off to bed thinking about what Dad has said. Later that night, he hears his baby brother crying, so he gets up to check on him. He finds that the baby has severely soiled his diaper. The little boy goes to his parents' room and finds his mother sound asleep. Not wanting to wake her, he goes to the nanny's room. Finding the door locked, he peeks in the keyhole and sees his father having sex with the nanny. He gives up and goes back to bed. The next morning, the little boy says to his father, "Dad, I think I understand the concept of politics now." The father says, "Good, son, tell me in your own words what you think politics is all about." The little boy replies, "Well, while Capitalism is screwing the Working Class, the Government is sound asleep, the People are being ignored and the Future is in Deep Shit.
***